Missouri, session 2026, HB2925.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 64.401, 66.265, 67.799, 67.990, 67.1422, 67.1531, 67.1880,
68.235, 68.250, 71.800, 71.802, 80.460, 90.500, 92.010, 92.031, 92.035, 94.060, 94.070,
94.250, 94.260, 94.340, 94.350, 94.400, 95.150, 95.390, 137.037, 137.065, 137.565, 137.570,
137.1040, 137.1050, 162.223, 162.441, 162.840, 164.021, 164.151, 167.231, 178.881,
182.010, 182.020, 182.030, 182.100, 182.140, 182.650, 182.655, 182.715, 182.717, 184.350,
184.351, 184.353, 184.357, 184.359, 184.600, 184.604, 184.614, 190.040, 190.065, 190.074,
190.296, 198.260, 198.263, 198.310, 204.250, 205.563, 205.979, 206.070, 206.120, 210.860,
233.172, 233.200, 233.345, 233.455, 233.460, 233.510, 235.175, 238.232, 247.470, 249.110,
249.929, 249.1106, 249.1150, 250.060, 256.445, 257.360, 257.370, 262.598, 263.452,
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2925 2
263.472, 278.240, 278.280, 321.225, 321.240, 321.241, 321.243, 321.244, 321.610, 321.620,
650.399, and 650.408, RSMo, are repealed and ninety-nine new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 64.401, 66.265, 67.799, 67.990, 67.1422, 67.1531, 67.1880,
68.235, 68.250, 71.800, 71.802, 80.460, 90.500, 92.010, 92.031, 92.035, 94.060, 94.070,
94.250, 94.260, 94.340, 94.350, 94.400, 95.150, 95.390, 115.706, 137.037, 137.065, 137.565,
137.1040, 137.1050, 162.223, 162.441, 162.840, 164.021, 164.151, 167.231, 178.881,
182.010, 182.020, 182.030, 182.100, 182.140, 182.650, 182.655, 182.715, 182.717, 184.350,
184.351, 184.353, 184.357, 184.359, 184.600, 184.604, 184.614, 190.040, 190.065, 190.074,
190.296, 198.260, 198.263, 198.310, 204.250, 205.563, 205.979, 206.070, 206.120, 210.860,
233.172, 233.200, 233.345, 233.455, 233.460, 233.510, 235.175, 238.232, 247.470, 249.110,
249.929, 249.1106, 249.1150, 250.060, 256.445, 257.360, 257.370, 262.598, 263.452,
263.472, 278.240, 278.280, 321.225, 321.240, 321.241, 321.243, 321.244, 321.610, 321.620,
650.399, and 650.408, to read as follows:
64.401. 1. Persons residing in an area adjacent to and within three miles of a
municipality that has formed and established a park system under sections 90.010 to 90.020
and 90.500 to 90.570 may petition to become part of the park system in the manner prescribed
in this subsection. The petition shall include a description of the territory to be embraced by
the park system, the provision for a tax to support the park system at the rate of tax which
residents of the municipality are required to pay to support the park system, and the signatures
of five percent of the qualified voters within the area outside the municipality as determined
by the county clerk on the basis of the number of votes cast in the area for governor in the last
election held prior to filing of the petition. The petition shall be filed with the governing body
of the municipality and the county clerk. The governing body of the municipality shall within
thirty days of receipt of the petition vote to approve or reject the request of the adjacent
property owners to become part of the municipal parks system at a regularly scheduled
meeting of the governing body of the municipality. The governing body of the municipality
shall notify the county clerk of its action. If the governing body of the municipality rejects
the request, no further action on the matter shall be taken for a period of one year after the
date that the governing body rejects the request. After such period of time, the persons
residing in the area may submit a new petition pursuant to this subsection. If the governing
body of the municipality approves the request, the county clerk shall proceed as prescribed in
subsections 2 and 3 of this section.
2. Upon approval of the issue by the governing body of the municipality as prescribed
in subsection 1 of this section, the county clerk shall present the petition to the county
commission who shall thereupon set the petition for hearing not less than thirty days nor more
than forty days after the filing.

HCS HB 2925 3
3. Notice shall be given by the county commission of the time and place where the
hearing will be held, by publication on three separate days in one or more newspapers having
a general circulation within the territory proposed to be incorporated as part of the park
system, the first of which publications shall be not less that twenty days prior to the date set
for the hearing and if there is no such newspaper, then notice shall be posted in ten of the most
public places in the territory, not less than twenty days prior to the date set for the hearing.
This notice shall include a description of the territory as set out in the petition, the question of
incorporation for park system services and the rate of tax which residents within the area
outside the municipality would be required to pay to support the park system as set out in the
petition.
4. If the county commission finds that the petition and notice meet the requirements
of subsections 1, 2 and 3 of this section, and that the boundaries as defined are reasonable
boundaries for the incorporation of the area into the park system, the county commission shall
order the submission of the question.
5. The question shall be submitted to the voters within the area outside the
municipality [substantially in the following form:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the area be part of the public park system of the ______ (city,
town, village) and shall a ______ cent tax on each one hundred dollars
of assessed valuation within the area be levied for public parks?]
[ YES] [ NO]
6. If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters within the area
outside the municipality voting thereon are in favor of the proposal, then the area shall be part
of the municipal park system as of the first day of the year following the year of the election.
7. The results of the election shall be certified by the election official of the county
not less than thirty days after the election. In the event the proposal fails to receive a majority
of the votes within the area outside the municipality in favor of the proposal, then such
proposal shall not be resubmitted at any election held within one year of the date of the
election the proposal was rejected.
8. If the area outside the municipality votes to join the municipal park system, then
such an area shall have proportional representation on the park board in accordance with its
population to the population of the municipality, except that such area shall be entitled to at
least one representative on the park board. The county clerk shall determine the number of
additional representatives by dividing the population of the municipality based on the last
decennial census by nine to produce the quotient and shall allocate to the area that has voted
to join the district one representative per quotient or part thereof which representative or
representatives shall be in addition to the nine representatives from the municipality. The
county commission shall appoint board members who shall have resided in the area outside

HCS HB 2925 4
the municipality which is included within the municipal park system for terms of three years.
Where the area is in more than one county, the county commissions of each county shall, as
nearly as practicable, evenly appoint such members with the county commission of the county
having the largest area within the system appointing a greater number of board members if the
members cannot be appointed evenly. Residents of such area residing outside the municipal
boundaries shall have the same right of access to parks and park facilities in the municipal
park system as residents of the municipality.
9. The provisions of sections 90.010 to 90.020 and 90.500 and 90.570 shall apply to
all areas outside the municipality that are included in the municipal park system under the
provisions of this section.
66.265. 1. Any county of the first classification having a charter form of government
and containing part of a city with a population of three hundred thousand or more inhabitants
may, after voter approval pursuant to subsection 2 of this section, levy an annual tax for the
purpose of providing law enforcement services within such county in an amount not to exceed
fourteen cents per one hundred dollars assessed valuation.
2. The ballot of submission shall be [substantially in the following form:] submitted
as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall ______ County impose a property tax upon all real and tangible
personal property within the county at a rate of ______ (insert the
amount) cents per one hundred dollars assessed valuation for the
purpose of providing revenue for law enforcement within the county?]
[ YES] [ NO]

If a majority of the qualified voters voting on the question within the county vote in favor of
the tax, such tax shall be levied and collected pursuant to this section. If a majority of the
voters voting on the question within the county vote against the tax, no such tax shall be
levied and collected pursuant to this section.
3. The county collector of each county in which the authority is located shall collect
the property taxes upon all real property and tangible personal property within that county in
the same manner as any other property taxes are collected. The governing body of the county
shall use the proceeds of the tax prescribed in this section solely for providing law
enforcement services in the county.
67.799. 1. A regional recreational district may, by a majority vote of its board of
directors, impose an annual property tax for the establishment and maintenance of public
parks and recreational facilities and grounds within the boundaries of the regional recreational
district not to exceed sixty cents per year on each one hundred dollars of assessed valuation
on all property within the district, except that no such tax shall become effective unless the

HCS HB 2925 5
board of directors of the district submits to the voters of the district, at a county or state
general, primary or special election, a proposal to authorize the tax.
2. The question shall be submitted [in substantially the following form:] as provided
in section 115.706.
[Shall a ______ cent tax per one hundred dollars assessed valuation be
levied for public parks and recreational facilities?]
[ YES] [ NO]

If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the proposal, then the tax shall become effective. If a majority of the votes cast by
the qualified voters voting are opposed to the proposal, then the board of directors shall have
no power to impose the tax unless and until the board of directors of the district submits
another proposal to authorize the tax and such proposal is approved by a majority of the
qualified voters voting thereon.
3. The property tax authorized in subsections 1 and 2 of this section shall be levied
and collected in the same manner as other ad valorem property taxes are levied and collected.
4. (1) A regional recreational district may, by a majority vote of its board of directors,
impose a tax not to exceed one-half of one cent on all retail sales subject to taxation pursuant
to sections 144.010 to 144.525 for the purpose of funding the creation, operation and
maintenance of public parks, recreational facilities and grounds within the boundaries of a
regional recreational district. The tax authorized by this subsection shall be in addition to all
other sales taxes allowed by law. No tax pursuant to this subsection shall become effective
unless the board of directors submits to the voters of the district, at a county or state general,
primary or special election, a proposal to authorize the tax, and such tax shall become
effective only after the majority of the voters voting on such tax approve such tax.
(2) In the event the district seeks to impose a sales tax pursuant to this subsection, the
question shall be submitted in substantially the following form:
Shall a ______ cent sales tax be levied on all retail sales within the
district for public parks and recreational facilities?
YES NO

If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the proposal, then the tax shall become effective. If a majority of the votes cast by
the qualified voters voting are opposed to the proposal, then the board of directors shall have
no power to impose the tax unless and until another proposal to authorize the tax is submitted
to the voters of the district and such proposal is approved by a majority of the qualified voters

HCS HB 2925 6
voting thereon. The provisions of sections 32.085 and 32.087 shall apply to any tax approved
pursuant to this subsection.
5. As used in this section, "qualified voters" or "voters" means any individuals
residing within the proposed district who are eligible to be registered voters and who have
registered to vote under chapter 115 or, if no individuals eligible and registered to vote reside
within the proposed district, all of the owners of real property located within the proposed
district who have unanimously petitioned for or consented to the adoption of an ordinance by
the governing body imposing a tax authorized in this section. If the owner of the property
within the proposed district is a political subdivision or corporation of the state, the governing
body of such political subdivision or corporation shall be considered the owner for purposes
of this section.
67.990. 1. The governing body of any county or city not within a county may, upon
approval of a majority of the qualified voters of such county or city voting thereon, levy and
collect a tax not to exceed five cents per one hundred dollars of assessed valuation, or in any
county of the first classification with more than eighty-five thousand nine hundred but less
than eighty-six thousand inhabitants, the governing body may, upon approval of a majority of
the qualified voters of the county voting thereon, levy and collect a tax not to exceed ten cents
per one hundred dollars of assessed valuation upon all taxable property within the county or
city or for the purpose of providing services to persons sixty years of age or older. The tax so
levied shall be collected along with other county or city taxes, in the manner provided by law.
All funds collected for this purpose shall be deposited in a special fund for the provision of
services for persons sixty years of age or older, and shall be used for no other purpose except
those purposes authorized in sections 67.990 to 67.995. Deposits in the fund shall be
expended only upon approval of the board of directors established in section 67.993, if in a
county, and only in accordance with the fund budget approved by the county governing body.
2. The question of whether the tax authorized by this section shall be imposed shall be
submitted [in substantially the following form:] as provided in section 115.706.
[OFFICIAL BALLOT]
[Shall ______ (name of county/city) levy a tax of ______ cents per
each one hundred dollars assessed valuation for the purpose of
providing services to persons sixty years of age or older?]
[ YES ] [ NO ]
67.1422. 1. Notwithstanding sections 67.1531, 67.1545, and 67.1551, if the petition
was filed pursuant to subdivision (5) of subsection 2 of section 67.1421 by a governing body
of the city, the governing body may adopt an ordinance approving the petition and submit a
ballot to the qualified voters of the district[; the question shall be in substantially the
following form:] as provided in section 115.706.

HCS HB 2925 7
[Shall the community improvement district to be known as the "______
Community Improvement District" approved by the ______ (insert
governing body) be established for the purpose of (here summarize the
proposed improvements and services) and be authorized to impose a
real property tax upon (all real property) within the district at a rate of
not more than ten cents per hundred dollars assessed valuation for a
period of ten years from the date on which such tax is first imposed for
the purpose of providing revenue for ______ (insert general description
of purpose) in the district?]
[ YES] [ NO]
[If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".]

The governing body of the city shall not submit the question to the qualified voters of the
district on more than one occasion.
2. A district levying a real property tax pursuant to this section may repeal or amend
such real property tax or lower the tax rate of such tax if such repeal, amendment or lower rate
will not impair the district's ability to repay any liabilities which it has incurred, money which
it has borrowed or obligations that it has issued to finance any improvements or services
rendered within the district.
3. An election conducted under this section may be conducted in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 115 or by mail-in ballot.
67.1531. 1. The district may levy by resolution a tax upon real property or on any
business located within the boundaries of the district; provided however, no such resolution
shall be final nor shall it take effect until the qualified voters approve, by mail-in ballot, the
tax which the resolution seeks to impose. If a majority of the votes cast by the qualified
voters voting on the proposed tax are in favor of the tax, then the resolution and any
amendments thereto shall be in effect. If a majority of the votes cast by the qualified voters
voting are opposed to the tax, then the resolution seeking to levy the tax shall be deemed to be
null and void.
2. The district may levy a real property tax rate lower than the tax rate ceiling
approved by the qualified voters pursuant to subsection 1 of this section and may increase that
lowered tax rate to a level not exceeding the tax rate ceiling without approval of the qualified
voters.

HCS HB 2925 8
3. The ballot shall be [substantially in the following form:] submitted as provided in
section 115.706.
[(1) ]
[Shall the ______ (insert name of district) Community
Improvement District ("District") impose a real property tax
upon (all real property) within the district at a rate of not more
than ______ (insert amount) dollars per hundred dollars assessed
valuation for a period of ______ (insert number) years from the
date on which such tax is first imposed for the purpose of
providing revenue for ______ (insert general description of
purpose) in the district?]
[ YES] [ NO]
[; and
(2) In the county seat of a county of the first classification without a charter form of
government containing a population of at least two hundred thousand:]
[Shall the ______ (insert name of district) Community
Improvement District ("District" ) impose a real property tax
within the district at a rate of not more than ______ (insert
amount) dollars per hundred dollars of assessed valuation and/or
a business license tax in an amount not to exceed ______ upon
all persons who are engaged in the business of ______ for a
period of ______ (insert number) years from the date on which
such tax is first imposed for the purpose of providing revenue for
______ (insert general description of purpose) in the district?]
[ YES] [ NO]
[If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X"
in the box opposite "NO".]
4. No district levying a real property tax or a business license tax pursuant to this
section may repeal or amend such real property tax or business license tax or lower the tax
rate of such tax if such repeal, amendment or lower rate will impair the district's ability to
repay any liabilities which it has incurred, money which it has borrowed or obligations that it
has issued to finance any improvements or services rendered within the district.
67.1880. 1. If approved by at least four-sevenths of the qualified voters voting on the
question in the district, the district may impose a property tax in an amount not to exceed the
annual rate of thirty cents on the hundred dollars assessed valuation. The district board may
levy a property tax rate lower than its approved tax rate ceiling and may increase that lowered

HCS HB 2925 9
tax rate to a level not exceeding the tax rate ceiling without voter approval. The property tax
shall be uniform throughout the district.
2. The ballot of submission shall be [substantially in the following form:] submitted
as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the ______ Law Enforcement District impose a property tax
upon all real and tangible personal property within the district at a rate
of not more than ______ (insert amount) cents per hundred dollars
assessed valuation for the purpose of providing revenue for the
development of a project (or projects) in the district (insert general
description of the project or projects, if necessary)?]
[ YES] [ NO]
[If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".]
3. The county collector of each county in which the district is partially or entirely
located shall collect the property taxes and special benefit assessments made upon all real
property and tangible personal property within that county and the district, in the same
manner as other property taxes are collected.
4. Every county collector having collected or received district property taxes shall, on
or before the fifteenth day of each month and after deducting his or her commissions, remit to
the treasurer of that district the amount collected or received by him or her prior to the first
day of the month. Upon receipt of such money, the district treasurer shall execute a receipt
therefor, which he or she shall forward or deliver to the collector. The district treasurer shall
deposit such sums into the district treasury, credited to the appropriate project or purpose.
The collector and district treasurer shall make final settlement of the district account and
commissions owing, not less than once each year, if necessary.
68.235. 1. For the purposes of providing funds to pay all, or any portion of, the
qualified project costs associated with any approved project, subsequent to the establishment
of a district pursuant to this act, and subsequent to the circuit court's certification of a question
regarding any proposed real property tax needed to fund a project, a port authority may levy
by resolution a tax upon real property within the boundaries of the district; provided however,
no such resolution shall be final nor shall it take effect until the qualified voters approve, by
mail-in ballot election conducted in accordance with section 68.250, the circuit court's
certified question regarding such proposed real property tax, provided that such resolution
shall be final and no mail-in ballot election shall be required where the port authority is the
owner of all of the real property within the proposed district. If a majority of the votes cast by
the qualified voters voting on the proposed real property tax are in favor of the tax, then the

HCS HB 2925 10
resolution shall become effective. If a majority of the votes cast by the qualified voters voting
are opposed to the real property tax, then the resolution seeking to levy the real property tax
shall be deemed to be null and void on the date on which the election may no longer be
challenged pursuant to section 68.250. The port authority may levy a real property tax rate
lower than the tax rate ceiling approved by the qualified voters pursuant to this subsection and
may, by resolution, increase that lowered tax rate to a level not exceeding the tax rate ceiling
without approval of the qualified voters.
2. The ballot shall be [substantially in the following form:] submitted as provided in
section 115.706.
[Shall the ______ (insert name of district) impose a real property tax
upon (all real property) within the district at a rate of not more than ___
___ (insert amount) dollars per hundred dollars assessed valuation for a
period of ______ (insert number) years from the date on which such
tax is first imposed for the purpose of providing revenue for ______
(insert general description of project or projects) in the district?]
[ YES] [ NO]
[If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".]
3. A port authority may repeal or amend by resolution any real property tax imposed
pursuant to this section before the expiration date of such real property tax unless the repeal or
amendment of such real property tax will impair the port authority's ability to repay any
obligations the port authority has incurred to pay any part of the cost of a port improvement
project.
68.250. 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 115 except the provisions of
section 115.125 and section 115.706, when applicable, an election for any proposed real
property tax or proposed sales and use tax, or both, within a district pursuant to this act shall
be conducted in accordance with the provisions of this section.
2. After the board has passed a resolution approving the levy of a real property tax or
a sales and use tax, or both, the board shall provide written notice of such resolution, along
with the circuit court's certified question regarding the real property tax or the sales and use
tax, or both, as applicable, to the election authority. The board shall be entitled to repeal or
amend such resolution provided that written notice of such repeal or amendment is delivered
to the election authority prior to the date that the election authority mails the ballots to the
qualified voters.

HCS HB 2925 11
3. Upon receipt of written notice of a port authority's resolution, along with the circuit
court's certified question, for the levy of a real property tax or a sales and use tax, or both, the
election authority shall:
(1) Specify a date upon which the election shall occur, which date shall be a Tuesday
and shall be, unless otherwise approved by the board and election authority and applicable
circuit court pursuant to section 115.125, not earlier than the tenth Tuesday, and not later than
the fifteenth Tuesday, after the date the board passes the resolution and shall not be on the
same day as an election conducted pursuant to the provisions of chapter 115;
(2) Publish notice of the election in a newspaper of general circulation within the
municipality two times. The first publication date shall be not more than forty-five, but not
less than thirty-five, days prior to the date of the election and the second publication date shall
be not more than twenty, and not less than ten, days prior to the date of the election. The
published notice shall include, but not be limited to, the following information:
(a) The name and general boundaries of the district;
(b) The type of tax proposed (real property tax or sales and use tax or both), its rate or
rates, and its purpose or purposes;
(c) The date the ballots for the election shall be mailed to qualified voters;
(d) The date of the election;
(e) The applicable definition of qualified voters;
(f) A statement that persons residing in the district shall register to vote with the
election authority on or before the thirtieth day prior to the date of the election in order to be a
qualified voter for purposes of the election;
(g) A statement that the ballot shall be returned to the election authority's office in
person, or by depositing the ballot in the United States mail addressed to the election
authority's office and postmarked not later than the date of the election; and
(h) A statement that any qualified voter that did not receive a ballot in the mail or lost
the ballot received in the mail may pick up a mail-in ballot at the election authority's office,
specifying the dates and time such ballot will be available and the location of the election
authority's office;
(3) The election authority shall mail the ballot, a notice containing substantially the
same information as the published notice and a return addressed envelope directed to the
election authority's office with a sworn affidavit on the reverse side of such envelope for the
qualified voter's signature, to each qualified voter not more than fifteen days and not less than
ten days prior to the date of the election. For purposes of mailing ballots to real property
owners, only one ballot shall be mailed per capita at the address shown on the official, or
recorded, real estate records of the county recorder, or the city recorder of deeds if the district

HCS HB 2925 12
is located in a city not within a county, as of the thirtieth day prior to the date of the election.
Such affidavit shall be in substantially the following form:
FOR REGISTERED VOTERS:
I hereby declare under penalties of perjury that I reside in the ______
Port Improvement District No. ______ (insert name of district) and I
am a registered voter and qualified to vote in this election.
_______________
Qualified Voter's Signature
_______________
Printed Name of Qualified Voter
FOR REAL PROPERTY OWNERS:
I hereby declare under penalty of perjury that I am the owner of real
property in the ______ Port Improvement District No. ______ (insert
name of district) and qualified to vote in this election, or authorized to
affix my signature on behalf of the owner (named below) of real
property in the ______ Port Improvement District No. ______ (insert
name of district) which is qualified to vote in this election.
_______________
Signature
_______________
Print Name of Real Property Owner
If Signer is Different from Owner:
Name of Signer: ______
State Basis of Legal Authority to Sign: ______

All persons or entities having a fee ownership in the property shall sign the ballot. Additional
signature pages may be affixed to this ballot to accommodate all required signatures.
4. Each qualified voter shall have one vote. Each voted ballot shall be signed with the
authorized signature.
5. Mail-in ballots shall be returned to the election authority's office in person, or by
depositing the ballot in the United States mail addressed to the election authority's office and
postmarked no later than the date of the election. The election authority shall transmit all
voted ballots to a team of judges of not less than four. The judges shall be selected by the
election authority from lists it has compiled prior to the date by which the mail-in ballots must
be returned. Upon receipt of the voted ballots, the judges shall verify the authenticity of the
ballots, canvass the votes, and certify the results. Certification by the election judges shall be

HCS HB 2925 13
final and shall be immediately transmitted to the election authority. Any qualified voter who
voted in such election may contest the result in the same manner as provided in chapter 115.
6. The results of the election shall be entered upon the records of the election
authority and two certified copies of the election results shall be filed with the port authority
and entered upon the records of the port authority.
7. The port authority shall reimburse the election authority for the costs it incurs to
conduct an election under this section.
8. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary, nothing in this act shall prevent a port
authority from proposing both a real property tax levy question and a sales and use tax levy
question to the district's qualified voters in the same election.
9. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary, this section shall not apply when the port
authority is the owner of all of the real property within the proposed district.
71.800. 1. For the purpose of paying for all costs and expenses incurred in the
operation of the district, the provision of services or improvements authorized in section
71.796, and incidental to the leasing, construction, acquisition, and maintenance of any
improvements provided for under sections 71.790 to 71.808 or for paying principal and
interest on notes or bonds authorized for the construction or acquisition of any said
improvement, the district may impose a tax upon the owners of real property within the
district which shall not exceed eighty-five cents on the one-hundred-dollar assessed valuation.
In any city other than a city not within a county, real property subject to partial tax abatement
under either the provisions of the urban redevelopment corporations law of Missouri or the
provisions of sections 99.700 to 99.710 shall for the purpose of assessment and collection of
ad valorem real estate taxes levied under the provisions of this section be assessed and ad
valorem real estate taxes shall be collected as if the real estate were not subject to the tax
abatement. The collection of delinquent receipts of said tax shall be in the same manner and
form as that provided by law for all ad valorem property taxes. Taxes levied and collected
under sections 71.790 to 71.808 shall be uniform upon the same class of subjects within the
territorial limits of the authority levying the tax.
2. For the purpose of paying for all costs and expenses incurred in the operation of the
district and the provision of services or improvements authorized in section 71.796, the
district may impose additional tax on businesses and individuals doing business within the
district. If the governing body imposes any business license taxes, such additional taxes shall
not exceed fifty percent of the business license taxes. Whenever a hearing is held herein, the
governing body shall hear all protests and receive evidence for or against the proposed action;
rule upon all protests which determination shall be final; and may continue the hearing from
time to time. Proceedings shall terminate if protest is made by businesses in the proposed
area which pay a majority of the additional taxes within the area. For purposes of the

HCS HB 2925 14
additional tax to be imposed pursuant to this part, the governing body of the city may make a
reasonable classification of businesses, giving consideration to various factors.
3. In addition to the taxes authorized by subsections 1 and 2 of this section, any
district within a city which has a population of three hundred fifty thousand or more and is
located within more than one county upon authorization of a majority of the voters voting
thereon may impose one or more of the following special assessments on all real property
located within the district:
(1) Not more than five cents per square foot on each square foot of land;
(2) Not more than one-half of a cent per square foot on each square foot of
improvements on land; and
(3) Not more than twelve dollars per abutting foot of the lots, tracts and parcels of
land within the district abutting on public streets, roads and highways.
4. For purposes of sections 10(c), 16, and 22 of article X of the Constitution of
Missouri, and of section 137.073, the following terms as applied to an election pursuant to
this section mean:
(1) "Approval of the required majority" or "direct voter approval", a simple majority;
(2) "Qualified voters", persons or other entities who have filed an application
pursuant to subsection 6 of this section.
5. The governing body of any city in which there is a special business district may
order an election on the approval of a new tax rate ceiling or assessment limit for any tax
imposed pursuant to subsections 1 to 3 of this section. All costs of any such election shall be
borne by the district out of its existing levy. The order shall set forth the new tax rate ceiling
or assessment limit proposed. Any provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding, the tax
rate ceiling may be increased or decreased, from any rate as revised under the provisions of
section 137.073 to any rate not in excess of eighty-five cents on the one-hundred-dollar
assessed valuation. Such order shall specify a date on which ballots for the election shall be
mailed. Such date shall be a Tuesday, and shall be not earlier than the eighth Tuesday from
the issuance of the order, nor later than August fifteenth of the year the order is issued and
shall not be on the same day as an election conducted under the provisions of chapter 115.
6. Application for a ballot shall be conducted as provided in this subsection:
(1) Persons entitled to apply for a ballot in an election to approve a new tax rate
ceiling for a tax imposed pursuant to subsection 1 or 3 of this section shall be:
(a) A resident individual of the district; or
(b) A person, including an individual, partnership, limited partnership, corporation,
estate, or trust, which owns real property within the special business district;
(2) A person entitled to apply for a ballot in an election to approve a new tax rate
ceiling for a tax imposed pursuant to subsection 2 of this section shall be a person, including

HCS HB 2925 15
an individual, partnership, limited partnership, corporation, estate, or trust, which possesses a
license to do business in the district;
(3) Only persons entitled to apply for a ballot in elections pursuant to this section
shall apply. Such persons shall apply with the clerk of the city in which the special business
district is organized. Each person applying shall provide:
(a) Such person's name, address, mailing address, and phone number;
(b) An authorized signature; and
(c) Evidence that such person is entitled to vote. Such evidence shall be:
a. For resident individuals, proof of registration from the election authority;
b. For owners of real property, a tax receipt or deed or other document which
evidences an equitable ownership, and identifies the real property by location;
c. For holders of business licenses, a copy of such business license;
(4) No person shall apply later than the fourth Tuesday before the date for mailing
ballots specified in the governing body's order.
7. The clerk shall mail a ballot to each applicant of the district along with a return
addressed envelope directed to the city clerk's office with a sworn affidavit on the reverse side
of such envelope for the voter's signature. Such affidavit shall be in the following form:
I hereby declare under penalties of perjury that I am qualified to vote,
or to affix my authorized signature in the name of an entity which is
entitled to vote, in this election.
________________________
Authorized Signature Subscribed and sworn to
before me this ______ day
of ______, 20______
________________________
Printed Name of Voter
________________________ ________________________
Address of Voter Signature of notary or other
officer authorized to administer
oaths
________________________
Mailing Address of Voter
(if different)
8. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the question shall be submitted
[in substantially the following forms:] as provided in section 115.706.

HCS HB 2925 16
(1) [Shall the special business district of ______ be authorized to impose a
tax on owners of real property in a sum not to exceed ______ cents on
100 the one hundred dollar assessed valuation?]
101 [ YES] [ NO]
102 [If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
103 "YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
104 opposite "NO".]
105 [(2)] Shall the special business district of ______ be authorized to impose its
106 business license tax on businesses and individuals doing business
107 within the special business district in an amount not to exceed ______
108 percent of the business license tax imposed by ______?
109 YES NO
110 If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
111 "YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
112 opposite "NO".
113 [(3)] (2) Shall the special business district of ______ be authorized to impose a
114 special assessment not to exceed ______ cents per square foot on each
115 square foot of land within the district?
116 YES NO
117 If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
118 "YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
119 opposite "NO".
120 [(4)] (3) Shall the special business district of ______ be authorized to impose a
121 special assessment not to exceed ______ cents per square foot on each
122 square foot of improvements on land within the district?
123 YES NO
124 If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
125 "YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
126 opposite "NO".
127 [(5)] (4) Shall the special business district of ______ be authorized to impose a
128 special assessment not to exceed ______ dollars per abutting foot of the
129 lots, tracts and parcels of land within the district abutting on public
130 streets, roads and highways?
131 YES NO

HCS HB 2925 17
132 If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
133 "YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
134 opposite "NO".
135 [(6)] (5) Shall the special business district of ______ change its tax on ______ to
136 ______?
137 YES NO
138 If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
139 "YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
140 opposite "NO".
141
142 Each ballot shall be plain paper, through which printing or writing cannot be read.
143 9. Each qualified voter shall have one vote. Each voter which is not an individual
144 shall determine how to cast its vote as provided for in its articles of incorporation, articles of
145 partnership, bylaws, or other document which sets forth an appropriate mechanism for the
146 determination of the entity's vote. If a voter has no such mechanism, then its vote shall be
147 cast as determined by a majority of the persons who run the day-to-day affairs of the voter.
148 Each voted ballot shall be signed with the authorized signature.
149 10. Voted ballots shall be returned to the city clerk's office by mail or hand delivery
150 no later than 5:00 p.m. on the sixth Tuesday after the date for mailing the ballots as set forth
151 in the governing body's order. The city clerk shall transmit all voted ballots to a team of
152 judges of not less than four, with an equal number from each of the two major political
153 parties. The judges shall be selected by the city clerk from lists compiled by the election
154 authority. Upon receipt of the voted ballots the judges shall verify the authenticity of the
155 ballots, canvass the votes, and certify the results. Certification by the election judges shall be
156 final and shall be immediately transmitted to the governing body. Any voter who applied for
157 such election may contest the result in the same manner as provided in chapter 115.
158 11. If approved, the new tax rate ceiling or assessment limit shall be effective for the
159 tax year in which the election is held, the provisions of section 67.110 to the contrary
160 notwithstanding.
71.802. 1. Any district established under the provisions of sections 71.790 to 71.808
may, upon approval of the constitutionally required percentage of the voters of the district
voting thereon, incur indebtedness and issue bonds or notes for the payment thereof. Notice
of the election, the amount and the purpose of the loan shall be given.
2. The question shall be submitted [in substantially the following form:] as provided
in section 115.706.

HCS HB 2925 18
[Shall the special business district incur indebtedness for the purpose of ______ in the
amount of ______ dollars, evidenced by the issuance of bonds or notes and levy a real estate
tax to pay therefor?]
3. If the constitutionally required percentage of the votes cast are for the
indebtedness, the district shall, subject to the restrictions of section 71.796 and section
71.800, be vested with the power to incur indebtedness in the name of the district, to the
amount and for the purposes specified on the ballot, and issue the bonds of the district for the
payment thereof.
4. The indebtedness authorized by this section shall not be contracted for a period
longer than twenty years, and the entire amount of the indebtedness shall at no time exceed,
including the existing indebtedness of the district, in the aggregate ten percent of the value of
taxable tangible property therein, as shown by the last completed assessment for state and
county purposes.
5. It shall be the duty of the district to provide for the collection of an annual tax
sufficient to pay the interest on the indebtedness as it falls due, and also to constitute a sinking
fund for the payment of the principal thereof within the time the principal becomes due.
80.460. 1. The chairman of the board of trustees of all towns and villages in this state
shall procure from the clerk of the county commission in which such town is located, and it
shall be the duty of said clerk to deliver to the chairman of the board of trustees within twenty
days after the date of the final adjournment of the board of equalization a certified abstract
from his assessment books, as corrected by the board of equalization, on all property within
such town subject to its taxing power and the assessed value thereof as corrected by the board
of equalization, which abstract shall be immediately transmitted to the board of trustees, and
it shall be the duty of such board of trustees to establish by ordinance the annual rates of tax
levy for the year for municipal purposes upon all subjects and objects of taxation within such
town, which tax shall not exceed the maximum rate for general municipal purposes of fifty
cents on the one hundred dollars assessed valuation; provided, however, that the rate of
taxation for general municipal purposes herein limited may be increased for such purposes for
a period not to exceed four years at any one time when such rate and purpose of increase are
submitted to a vote of the voters within such towns and two-thirds of the voters voting
thereon shall vote therefor, but such increase so voted shall be limited to a maximum rate of
taxation not to exceed thirty cents on the one hundred dollars assessed valuation. The board
of trustees of any such towns may submit a question for increase of levy when in the opinion
of such board of trustees the necessity therefor arises, and such question shall be submitted by
such board of trustees when petitioned therefor by voters equaling in number five percent or
more of the voters of such towns or villages voting for mayor or member of board of trustees
at the last election at which a mayor or member of board of trustees was elected.

HCS HB 2925 19
2. The question shall be submitted [in substantially the following form:] as provided
in section 115.706.
[Shall there be a ______ cent increase in levy on one hundred dollars assessed
valuation for general municipal purposes for ______ years?]
3. If such increase in levy shall be voted, then such increased levy shall be effective
for the number of years designated, and no longer, but such towns through their boards of
trustees may submit any such proposal for continuing such increase of levy at any time for
like periods not to exceed four years each.
90.500. 1. When one hundred voters of any incorporated city or town having less
than thirty thousand inhabitants, or any city of the third class, shall petition the mayor and
common council asking that an annual tax be levied for the establishment and maintenance of
free public parks in the incorporated city or town, and providing for suitable entertainment
therein, and shall specify in their petition a rate of taxation as provided in this section, the
mayor and common council shall submit the question to the voters.
2. The question shall be submitted [in substantially the following form:] as provided
in section 115.706.
[Shall a ______ cent tax per one hundred dollars assessed valuation be levied for
public parks?]
3. The tax specified in the notice shall be levied and collected in the same manner as
other general taxes of the incorporated city or town and shall be deposited in the park fund.
The rate of taxation authorized by this section shall be combined with any rate of tax imposed
pursuant to the provisions of section 90.010, and any tax authorized pursuant to the provisions
of this section shall cease in case the voters of such incorporated city or town shall so
determine, by a majority vote after a petition for the submission is filed in accordance with
the provisions of this section.
92.010. 1. Any constitutional charter cities in this state which may now have or
hereafter acquire seven hundred thousand or more inhabitants may levy upon all subjects and
objects of taxation a rate for general municipal purposes not to exceed the annual rate of one
dollar on the one hundred dollars assessed valuation; provided, that the city of St. Louis may
levy for county purposes, in addition to the municipal rate of taxation above provided, a rate
not exceeding the rate which would be allowed for county purposes if said city of St. Louis
were a county; provided, however, that the rate of taxation for general municipal purposes
herein limited may be increased for not to exceed four years, when the rate and purpose of the
increase are submitted to a vote and two-thirds of the voters voting thereon shall vote therefor,
but such increase so voted shall be limited to a maximum rate of taxation not to exceed thirty
cents on the one hundred dollars assessed valuation. The legislative body of any of said cities
may submit the question of an increase of levy when, in the opinion of such legislative body,

HCS HB 2925 20
necessity therefor arises, and such question shall be submitted by such legislative body when
petitioned therefor by the voters equaling in number one percent or more of the voters of the
city voting for mayor at the last city election at which a mayor was elected.
2. The question shall be submitted [in substantially the following form:] as provided
in section 115.706.
[Shall there be a ______ cent increase in tax levy on one hundred dollars valuation for
general municipal purposes for ______ years?]
3. If such increase in levy shall be voted, then such increased levy shall be effective
for the number of years designated, and no longer, but said cities, through their legislative
bodies, may submit any such proposal for continuing such increase of levy at any time for like
periods not to exceed four years each.
92.031. 1. Such cities may, in the alternative to imposing the levies for debt service
and for capital improvements and operating expenses for hospital, public health, recreation
grounds and museum purposes as provided for in section 92.030, elect by ordinance to levy
and impose an annual tax for debt service and an annual tax for capital improvements and
operating expenses for hospital, public health, recreation grounds and museum purposes such
as are referred to in subdivisions (1), (2) and (3) of subsection 2 of section 92.030, which tax
levies shall be independent of the other tax levies provided for in section 92.030.
2. In the event such cities make such election, the limits on individual and total
annual tax levy rate referred to in subdivisions (1), (2) and (3) of subsection 2 of section
92.030 for debt service and for capital improvements and operating expenses for hospital,
public health, recreation grounds and museum purposes shall not apply. The tax levy rate for
capital improvements and operating expenses for hospital, public health, recreation grounds
and museum purposes may be increased from its current rate to a rate not to exceed one dollar
per hundred dollars assessed valuation by submission to and approval by a vote of the people
as provided in section 115.706.
92.035. 1. Any city having a charter form of government and a population of at least
three hundred thousand, but less than six hundred and fifty thousand and located wholly or
partially within a county of the first class having a charter form of government, in addition to
the levy and imposition of taxes authorized by section 92.030, may, except as otherwise
provided in this section, by ordinance, levy or impose a tax not to exceed the rate of ten cents
on each one hundred dollars of assessed valuation of real and tangible personal property
located within the city. The proceeds of the tax representing a rate of at least three cents on
each one hundred dollars of assessed valuation to be used for the operation, improvement or
construction expansion of museum facilities in existence on August 13, 1978, and the
remaining proceeds of the tax to be used exclusively for the construction, operation,
improvement, or expansion of additional facilities for such museum and no other. The word

HCS HB 2925 21
"museum" as used in this section, shall not be construed to mean or include an art gallery.
General admission to the museum's facility in existence prior to August 13, 1978, shall be
free and open to the residents of such city. Before the city shall impose any tax under this
section at a rate which exceeds two cents on each one hundred dollars of assessed valuation,
the governing body of the city shall submit the proposed tax rate increase to the voters of the
city for approval or rejection at an election.
2. The question shall be submitted [in substantially the following form:] as provided
in section 115.706.
[Shall there be an increased tax levy of ______ cents on the hundred dollars assessed
valuation for museum purposes?]
3. If a majority of the votes cast upon the proposal are in favor of the levy increase,
the governing body of the city may, by ordinance, impose the additional tax. If a majority of
the votes cast upon the proposal are against the levy increase, the governing body of the city
shall not impose the increase. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a rejected proposal from
being resubmitted to a vote of the voters.
94.060. 1. All cities of the third class in this state may by ordinance levy and impose
annually for municipal purposes upon all subjects and objects of taxation within such cities a
tax which shall not exceed the maximum rate of one dollar on the one hundred dollars
assessed valuation; provided, however, that the rate of tax levy of one dollar on the one
hundred dollars assessed valuation for municipal purposes may be increased for such
purposes for a period not to exceed four years at any one time when such rate and purpose of
increase are submitted to a vote of the voters within such cities and two-thirds of the voters
voting thereon shall vote therefor, but such increase so voted shall be limited to a maximum
rate of taxation not to exceed thirty cents on the one hundred dollars assessed valuation.
2. The city council may submit the question of increasing the levy when in the
opinion of such city council the necessity therefor arises, and the question shall be submitted
by such city council when petitioned therefor by voters equaling in number five percent or
more of the voters of such cities voting for mayor at the last election at which a mayor was
elected.
3. The question shall be submitted [in substantially the following form:] as provided
in section 115.706.
[Shall there be a ______ cent increase in tax levy on one hundred dollars valuation for
general municipal purposes for ______ years in the city of ______?]
4. If such increase in levy shall be voted, then such increased levy shall be effective
for the number of years designated, and no longer, but cities through their city councils may
submit the question of continuing such increase of levy at any time for like periods not to
exceed four years each.

HCS HB 2925 22
94.070. 1. In addition to the levy aforesaid for general municipal purposes, all cities
of the third class are hereby authorized to levy annually not to exceed the following rates of
taxation on all property subject to its taxing power for the following special purposes:
(1) For library purposes in the manner and at the rate authorized under the provisions
of sections 182.140 to 182.301;
(2) For hospitals, public health, and museum purposes twenty cents on the one
hundred dollars assessed valuation; and
(3) For recreational grounds in the manner and at the rate authorized under the
provisions of sections 90.500 to 90.570.
2. In lieu of the twenty cents levied on the one hundred dollars assessed valuation for
hospitals, public health, and museum purposes in subdivision (2) of subsection 1 of this
section, any city of the third classification with more than ten thousand eight hundred but less
than ten thousand nine hundred inhabitants and located in more than one county may levy a
tax at the rate of thirty cents on the one hundred dollars assessed valuation for hospital, public
health, and museum purposes.
3. A question submitted under this section shall be submitted as provided in
section 115.706.
94.250. 1. All cities of the fourth class in this state may by city ordinance levy and
impose annually for municipal purposes upon all subjects and objects of taxation within such
cities a tax which shall not exceed the maximum rate of one dollar on the one hundred dollars
assessed valuation.
2. The maximum rate of taxation for general municipal purposes may be increased for
not to exceed four years at any one time when the rate and purpose of such increase are
submitted to a vote and two-thirds of the voters voting thereon vote in favor of the increase,
but the increase so voted shall be limited to a maximum rate of taxation not to exceed thirty
cents on the one hundred dollars assessed valuation. The board of aldermen of such cities
may submit the question, and the question shall be submitted by the board of aldermen when
petitioned therefor by voters equaling in number five percent or more of the voters of such
cities voting for mayor at the last election at which a mayor was elected.
3. The question shall be submitted [in substantially the following form:] as provided
in section 115.706.
[Shall there be a ______ cent increase in tax levy on one hundred dollars valuation for
general municipal purposes for ______ years in the city of ______?]
4. If the increase in levy is voted, the increased levy shall be effective for the number
of years designated, and no longer, but such cities through their boards of aldermen may
submit proposals for continuing the increase of levy at any time for like periods not to exceed
four years each.

HCS HB 2925 23
94.260. 1. In addition to the levy aforesaid for general municipal purposes, all cities
of the fourth class are hereby authorized to levy annually not to exceed the following rates of
taxation on all property subject to its taxing powers for the following special purposes:
(1) For library purposes in the manner and at the rate authorized under the provisions
of sections 182.140 to 182.301;
(2) For hospital, public health, and museum purposes, twenty cents on the one
hundred dollars assessed valuation; and
(3) For recreation grounds in the manner and at the rate authorized under the
provisions of sections 90.500 to 90.570.
2. A question submitted under this section shall be submitted as provided in
section 115.706.
94.340. 1. All cities and towns in this state organized and operating under special
charters granted by the legislature, known as special charter cities and towns, may by
ordinance levy and impose annually for municipal purposes upon all subjects and objects of
taxation within such cities and towns a tax which shall not exceed the maximum rate of one
dollar on the one hundred dollars assessed valuation; provided, however, that the rate of
taxation for general municipal purposes herein limited may be increased for not to exceed
four years when the rate and purpose of such increase are submitted to a vote of the voters
within such cities and towns and two-thirds of the voters voting thereon shall vote therefor,
but such increase so voted shall be limited to a maximum rate of taxation not to exceed thirty
cents on the one hundred dollars assessed valuation.
2. The council of any such cities and towns may submit the question of increasing the
levy when in the opinion of such council the necessity therefor arises, and the question shall
be submitted by such council when petitioned therefor by voters equaling in number five
percent or more of the voters of such cities and towns voting for mayor at the last election at
which a mayor was elected.
3. The question shall be submitted [in substantially the following form:] as provided
in section 115.706.
[Shall there be a ______ cent increase in tax levy on one hundred dollars valuation for
general municipal purposes for ______ years in the city of ______?]
4. If such increase in levy shall be voted, then such increased levy shall be effective
for the number of years designated, and no longer, but such cities and towns through their
councils may submit any such proposal for continuing such increase of levy at any time for
like periods not to exceed four years each.
94.350. 1. In addition to the levy aforesaid for general municipal purposes, all cities
and towns under special charter are hereby authorized to levy annually not to exceed the

HCS HB 2925 24
following rates of taxation on all property subject to its taxing powers for the following
special purposes:
(1) For library purposes in the manner and at the rate authorized under the provisions
of sections 182.140 to 182.301;
(2) For hospital, public health, and museum purposes, twenty cents on the one
hundred dollars assessed valuation; and
(3) For recreation grounds in the manner and at the rate authorized under the
provisions of sections 90.500 to 90.570.
2. A question submitted under this section shall be submitted as provided in
section 115.706.
94.400. 1. All cities in this state which now have or may hereafter contain a
population of not less than ten thousand and less than three hundred thousand inhabitants
according to the last preceding federal decennial census, framing and adopting a charter for
its own government under the provisions of Section 19, Article VI of the Constitution of this
state, known as "constitutional charter cities", may by city ordinance levy and impose
annually for municipal purposes upon all subjects and objects of taxation within their
corporate limits a tax which shall not exceed the maximum rate of one dollar on the one
hundred dollars assessed valuation, and may by city ordinance levy and impose annually an
additional tax at a rate in excess of said one dollar on the one hundred dollars assessed
valuation, but not to exceed forty cents on the one hundred dollars assessed valuation for any
one or more of the following purposes, to wit: Library, hospital, public health, and museum
purposes, except that the rate of tax levy of one dollar on the one hundred dollars assessed
valuation for general municipal purposes may, in addition to the aforesaid rate and purposes
of increase which may be voted by city ordinance, be further increased for general municipal
purposes for a period not to exceed four years at any one time when such rate and purpose of
increase are submitted to a vote of the voters within such cities and two-thirds of the voters
voting thereon shall vote therefor, but such increase so voted shall be limited to a maximum
rate of taxation not to exceed thirty cents on the one hundred dollars assessed valuation.
2. The legislative body of any such cities may submit the question of increasing the
levy when in the opinion of such legislative body the necessity therefor arises and the
question shall be submitted by such legislative body when petitioned therefor by voters
equaling in number five percent of the voters of such cities voting for a mayor at the last
election at which a mayor was elected.
3. The question shall be submitted [in substantially the following form:] as provided
in section 115.706.
[Shall there be a ______ cent increase in tax levy on one hundred dollars valuation for
general municipal purposes for ______ years in the city of ______?]

HCS HB 2925 25
4. If such increase of levy shall be voted, then such increased levy shall be effective
for the number of years designated, and no longer, but such cities through their legislative
bodies may submit any such proposal for continuing such increase of levy at any time for like
periods not to exceed four years each.
5. Any city that has a levy for recreation grounds in excess of two mills on August 28,
1994, may continue the levy at that rate without any further action. Any levy for recreation
purposes which is two mills or less on August 28, 1994, shall be for purposes of computing
the amount permitted by law considered to be under section 90.010. Any increase in the levy
for recreation grounds after August 28, 1994, shall be in accordance with procedures set forth
in section 90.010.
95.150. The question shall be submitted [in substantially the following form:] as
provided in section 115.706.
[Shall ______ (name of city, town, or village) issue bonds in the amount of ______
dollars for the purpose of ______?]
95.390. The question shall be submitted [in substantially the following form:] as
provided in section 115.706.
[Shall ______ (name of city) issue bonds in the amount of ______ dollars to pay
judgments and to levy a tax therefor?]
115.706. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, no ballot
measure proposing the imposition, increase, or extension of an ad valorem property tax
by a political subdivision shall be deemed approved unless a majority of the votes cast
on the question are in favor.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, beginning on
January 1, 2027, the ballot language for a question submitted to voters by a political
subdivision desiring to levy a real property tax or personal property tax shall include at
least the following elements, as applicable:
(1) The name of the political subdivision imposing the property tax;
(2) The real property or personal property on which the property tax will be
imposed;
(3) The current tax rate ceiling, the proposed tax rate ceiling, and, if the political
subdivision is seeking authorization to increase an existing tax, the difference between
the proposed new tax rate ceiling and the current tax rate ceiling, expressed in
percentage changed and the number of cents per one hundred dollars of assessed
valuation. The percentage change shall be calculated by subtracting the current tax rate
ceiling from the proposed tax rate ceiling, dividing the result by the current tax rate
ceiling, and multiplying the quotient by one hundred;

HCS HB 2925 26
(4) The length of time for which the tax will be imposed or the expiration date of
the tax;
(5) The purpose for which the tax will be imposed;
(6) A description of additional actions a political subdivision affected by the
ballot issue will be required to take;
(7) If the political subdivision is seeking authorization to issue bonds, notes, or
other obligations:
(a) An indication that bonds, notes, or other obligations will be issued if the
proposal is approved;
(b) The kind of bonds, notes, or other obligations that will be issued including,
but not limited to, general obligation bonds or revenue bonds; and
(c) The total amount of such bonds, notes, or other obligations;
(8) A disclosure that an increase to a tax rate ceiling could result in a tax rate
increase;
(9) A statement indicating the real property or personal property that will be
affected by such tax or tax rate ceiling increase, containing wording substantially
similar to the following, as applicable:
"If approved, this proposition could increase the
property taxes of:
A residential property ______ (insert levy amount
multiplied by 100,000 multiplied by 0.0019) per
$100,000 of appraised valuation;
A commercial property ______ (insert levy amount
multiplied by 100,000 multiplied by 0.032) per
$100,000 of appraised valuation;
An agricultural property ______ (insert levy amount
multiplied by 100,000 multiplied by 0.0012) per
$100,000 of appraised valuation;
A motor vehicle ______ (insert levy amount
multiplied by 10,000 multiplied by 0.00333) per
$10,000 of appraised valuation.".
3. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, no political
subdivision or election authority shall advertise or describe any proposed tax on

HCS HB 2925 27
property in a political subdivision as not increasing taxes, or any language to that effect,
unless both:
(1) Failing to adopt the proposed measure would cause an actual increase in the
tax rate; and
(2) Adopting the proposed measure would cause the tax rate to stay the same or
decrease.
4. The ballot language statements shall fairly and accurately explain what a vote
for and what a vote against the measure represent. The ballot language shall be true
and impartial statements of the effect of a vote for and against the measure in language
neither intentionally argumentative nor likely to create prejudice for or against the
proposed measure.
137.037. 1. The county commission of any county may, at any election, submit to the
voters of the county a proposition to authorize a levy not to exceed two mills on the dollar of
assessed valuation of all tangible property taxable by the county to pay the cost of contracting
with a private person or firm to reevaluate all real property subject to taxation by that county
or to provide funding for that portion of all costs of the assessor's office which would
otherwise be paid from county general revenues.
2. The question shall be submitted [in substantially the following form:] as provided
in section 115.706.
[Shall the county commission be authorized to levy a tax not to exceed twenty cents
on the hundred dollars assessed valuation on all property taxable by the county to provide
funds annually to pay the cost of assessing and equalizing real property values subject to
taxation by the county?]
3. If the question receives a majority of the votes cast thereon, the county commission
may impose a levy for that purpose, the proceeds of which shall be placed in the assessment
fund.
137.065. 1. For county purposes the annual tax on property, not including taxes for
the payment of valid bonded indebtedness or renewal bonds issued in lieu thereof, shall not
exceed the rates herein specified: In counties having three hundred million dollars or more
assessed valuation and having by operation of law attained the classification of a county of
the first class, the rates shall not exceed thirty-five cents on the hundred dollars assessed
valuation; and in all other counties, the rate shall not exceed fifty cents, except that in any
county the maximum rates of taxation as limited in this section may be increased for not to
exceed four years, when the rate and purpose of the increase are submitted to a vote and two-
thirds of the voters of the county voting thereon shall vote therefor.
2. County commissions are hereby authorized to submit the question of increasing
maximum tax rates herein specified, and shall submit the question when petitioned therefor

HCS HB 2925 28
by not less than ten percent of the voters of the county as determined by the total vote cast for
governor in the last preceding general election for governor.
3. The question shall be submitted [in substantially the following form:] as provided
in section 115.706.
[Shall there be a levy for county purposes of ______ on the hundred dollars assessed
valuation?]
4. For any county, which by operation of law attains the classification of a county of
the first class on or after January 1, 1991, which has a tax rate ceiling at or below thirty-five
cents by application of section 137.073 or 137.115, whichever is applicable, it shall not be
necessary to further reduce such county's tax rate due to the attainment of such first class
county status.
137.565. 1. Whenever ten or more voters residing in or owners of land in any general
or special road district in any county in this state shall petition the county commission of the
county in which such district is located, asking that such commission submit the question in
such district for the purpose of voting for or against the levy of the tax provided for in Section
12(a) of Article X of the Constitution of Missouri, it shall be the duty of the county
commission, upon the filing of such petition, to submit the question. The petition so filed
shall set out the duration of the tax to be levied in a period of one, two, three, or four years
and the ballot to be used for voting shall specify the number of years duration of the tax levy,
but in no event shall the duration of the tax levy be for a period of more than four years. Such
submission shall be made by an order entered of record setting forth the date and the rate of
tax the commission will levy, which rate shall not exceed thirty-five cents on the hundred
dollars assessed valuation on all taxable real and tangible personal property in the district.
2. The question shall be submitted as provided in section 115.706.
137.1040. 1. In addition to other levies authorized by law, the county commission in
counties not adopting an alternative form of government and the proper administrative body
in counties adopting an alternative form of government, or the governing body of any city,
town, or village, in their discretion may levy an additional tax, not to exceed one quarter of
one cent on each one hundred dollars assessed valuation, on all taxable real property located
within such city, town, village, or county, all of such tax to be collected and allocated to the
city, town, village, or county treasury, where it shall be known and designated as the
"Cemetery Maintenance Trust Fund" to be used for the upkeep and maintenance of cemeteries
located within such city, town, village, or county.
2. To the extent necessary to comply with Article X, Section 22(a) of the Missouri
Constitution, for any city, town, village, or county with a tax levy at or above the limitations
provided under Article X, Section 11(b), no ordinance adopted under this section shall
become effective unless the county commission or proper administrative body of the county,

HCS HB 2925 29
or governing body of the city, town, or village submits to the voters of the city, town, village,
or county at a state general, primary, or special election a proposal to authorize the imposition
of a tax under this section. The tax authorized under this section shall be levied and collected
in the same manner as other real property taxes are levied and collected within the city, town,
village, or county. Such tax shall be in addition to all other taxes imposed on real property,
and shall be stated separately from all other charges and taxes. Such tax shall not become
effective unless the county commission or proper administrative body of the county or
governing body of the city, town, or village, by order or ordinance, submits to the voters of
the county a proposal to authorize the city, town, village, or county to impose a tax under this
section on any day available for such city, town, village, or county to hold elections or at a
special election called for that purpose.
3. The ballot of submission for the tax authorized in this section shall be [in
substantially the following form:] submitted as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall ______ (insert the name of the city, town, village, or county)
impose a tax on all real property situated in ______ (name of the city,
town, village, or county) at a rate of ______ (insert rate not to exceed
one quarter of one cent per one hundred dollars assessed valuation) for
the sole purpose of providing funds for the maintenance, upkeep, and
preservation of city, town, village, or county cemeteries?]
[ YES] [ NO]

If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the question, then the tax shall become effective on the first day of the second
calendar quarter immediately following notification to the city, town, village, or county
collector. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon
are opposed to the question, then the tax shall not become effective unless and until the
question is resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters and such question is
approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting on the question.
4. The tax imposed under this section shall be known as the "Cemetery Maintenance
Tax". Each city, town, village, or county imposing a tax under this section shall establish
separate trust funds to be known as the "Cemetery Maintenance Trust Fund". The city, town,
village, or county treasurer shall deposit the revenue derived from the tax imposed under this
section for cemetery purposes in the city, town, village, or county cemetery maintenance trust
fund. The proceeds of such tax shall be appropriated by the county commission or
appropriate administrative body, or the governing body of the city, town, or village
exclusively for the maintenance, upkeep, and preservation of cemeteries located within the
jurisdiction of such commission or body.

HCS HB 2925 30
5. All applicable provisions in this chapter relating to property tax shall apply to the
collection of any tax imposed under this section.
137.1050. 1. For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Eligible credit amount", the difference between an eligible taxpayer's real
property tax liability on such taxpayer's homestead for a given tax year, minus the real
property tax liability on such homestead in the eligible taxpayer's initial credit year;
(2) "Eligible taxpayer", a Missouri resident who:
(a) Is sixty-two years of age or older;
(b) Is an owner of record of a homestead or has a legal or equitable interest in such
property as evidenced by a written instrument; and
(c) Is liable for the payment of real property taxes on such homestead;
(3) "Homestead", real property actually occupied by an eligible taxpayer as the
primary residence. An eligible taxpayer shall not claim more than one primary residence;
(4) "Initial credit year":
(a) In the case of a taxpayer that meets all requirements of subdivision (2) of this
subsection prior to the year in which a credit is authorized pursuant to subsection 2 of this
section, the year in which such credit is authorized;
(b) For all other taxpayers, the year in which the taxpayer meets all requirements of
subdivision (2) of this subsection.

If in any tax year subsequent to the eligible taxpayer's initial credit year the eligible taxpayer's
real property tax liability is lower than such liability in the initial credit year, such tax year
shall be considered the eligible taxpayer's initial credit year for all subsequent tax years. This
provision shall not apply if an eligible taxpayer's real property tax liability is lower than such
liability in the taxpayer's initial credit year solely due to a reduction in a property tax levy
made pursuant to section 321.554.
2. (1) Any county authorized to impose a property tax may grant a property tax credit
to eligible taxpayers residing in such county in an amount equal to the taxpayer's eligible
credit amount, provided that:
(a) Such county adopts an ordinance authorizing such credit; or
(b) a. A petition in support of a referendum on such a credit is signed by at least five
percent of the registered voters of such county voting in the last gubernatorial election and the
petition is delivered to the governing body of the county, which shall subsequently hold a
referendum on such credit.
b. The ballot of submission for the question submitted to the voters pursuant to
paragraph (b) of this subdivision shall be submitted under the provisions of section 115.706
and in substantially the following form:

HCS HB 2925 31
Shall the County of ______ exempt senior citizens aged 62 and
older from increases in the property tax liability due on such
senior citizens' primary residence?
YES NO

If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the proposal, then the credit shall be in effect.
(2) An ordinance adopted pursuant to paragraph (a) of subdivision (1) of this
subsection shall not preclude such ordinance from being amended or superseded by a petition
subsequently adopted pursuant to paragraph (b) of subdivision (1) of this subsection.
3. (1) A county granting credit pursuant to this section shall apply such credit when
calculating the eligible taxpayer's property tax liability for the tax year. The amount of the
credit shall be noted on the statement of tax due sent to the eligible taxpayer by the county
collector. The county governing body may adopt reasonable procedures in order to carry out
the purposes and intent of this section, provided that the county shall not adopt any procedure
that limits the definition or scope of eligible credit amount or eligible taxpayer as defined in
this section.
(2) If an eligible taxpayer makes new construction and improvements to such eligible
taxpayer's homestead, the real property tax liability for the taxpayer's initial credit year shall
be increased to reflect the real property tax liability attributable to such new construction and
improvements.
(3) If an eligible taxpayer's homestead is annexed into a taxing jurisdiction to which
such eligible taxpayer did not owe real property tax in the eligible taxpayer's initial credit
year, then the real property tax liability for the taxpayer's initial credit year shall be increased
to reflect the real property tax liability owed to the annexing taxing jurisdiction.
4. For the purposes of calculating property tax levies pursuant to section 137.073, the
total amount of credits authorized by a county pursuant to this section shall be considered tax
revenue, as such term is defined in section 137.073, actually received.
5. A county granting a tax credit pursuant to this section shall notify each political
subdivision within such county of the total credit amount applicable to such political
subdivision by no later than November thirtieth of each year.
162.223. 1. When the voters in any two or more adjacent districts without limitation
as to size or enrollment desire to consolidate and form a new district, a petition asking for an
election upon the question of consolidation shall be filed with the boards of education of the
affected districts; provided, however, that such petition shall be signed by ten percent of those

HCS HB 2925 32
in each district who voted for school directors at the last election in which such directors were
elected, or one hundred voters, whichever is the higher number.
2. As an alternative to the procedure in subsection 1 of this section, two or more
adjacent districts may, by a majority vote of each board of education, call for an election upon
the question of consolidation.
3. The question shall be submitted [in substantially the following form:] as provided
in section 115.706.
[Shall the ______ school district and the ______ school district (and the ______
school district) form a new district with a tax rate ceiling of ______ per one hundred dollars
of assessed valuation? If this proposition is approved, the adjusted operating levy of the new
school district is estimated to be ______ (amount) per one hundred dollars of assessed
valuation.]
4. The board of directors of each affected district shall cause the question to be
included on the ballot to be submitted to the voters in each such district at the next election
day. A plat of the proposed new district shall be published and posted with the notices of
election.
5. The results of the voting on the proposal in each district affected shall be certified
to the state commissioner of education by the secretary of each board of education of each
district or by such other person or body charged with conducting such elections and, should
the majority of the votes cast in each affected district be in favor of the proposal, the state
commissioner shall declare the new district formed as of July first following the submission
of the question.
6. If the commissioner of education declares, before the closing date for filing for the
election of board members on the municipal election date, that the new district is to be formed
as of July first, no candidates shall be certified by the districts involved in the consolidation
and the board members whose terms would otherwise have expired on that date shall remain
as board members until July first. In consolidation cases where there is insufficient time from
the date the commissioner of education declares that the new district shall be formed as of
July first and July first to hold an election of board members, seven board members from the
boards of the consolidating districts shall be drawn by lot to serve until the next election at
which the new board of education can be elected. The number of board members selected
from one district shall not exceed the quotient resulting from seven divided by the number of
districts consolidating rounded down to the nearest whole number plus one. The
commissioner of education or a designee shall supervise the drawing, by lot, of the board
members which shall be approved by the state board of education.
162.441. 1. If any school district desires to be attached to a community college
district organized under sections 178.770 to 178.890 or to one or more adjacent seven-

HCS HB 2925 33
director school districts for school purposes, upon the receipt of a petition setting forth such
fact, signed either by voters of the district equal in number to ten percent of those voting in
the last school election at which school board members were elected or by a majority of the
voters of the district, whichever is the lesser, the school board of the district desiring to be so
attached shall submit the question to the voters at a November election as provided in
section 115.706.
2. As an alternative to the procedure in subsection 1 of this section, a seven-director
district may, by a majority vote of its board of education, propose a plan to the voters of the
district at a November election as provided in section 115.706 to attach the district to one or
more adjacent seven-director districts and call an election upon the question of such plan.
3. As an alternative to the procedures in subsection 1 or 2 of this section, a
community college district organized under sections 178.770 to 178.890 may, by a majority
vote of its board of trustees, propose a plan to the voters of the school district at a November
election as provided in section 115.706to attach the school district to the community college
district, levy the tax rate applicable to the community college district at the time of the vote of
the board of trustees, and call an election upon the question of such plan. The community
college proposing the annexation shall appear at a public meeting of the school district to
which the annexation is being proposed to present the annexation proposal. The school board
shall invite the community college to make this presentation at a regularly scheduled meeting
no more than one hundred twenty days prior and no less than thirty days prior to the election
to present the annexation proposal. The tax rate applicable to the community college district
shall not be levied as to the school district until the proposal by the board of trustees of the
community college district has been approved by a majority vote of the voters of the school
district at the election called for that purpose. The community college district shall be
responsible for the costs associated with the election.
4. A plat of the proposed changes to all affected districts shall be published and
posted with the notice of election.
5. The question shall be submitted [in substantially the following form:] as provided
in section 115.706.
[Shall the ______ school district become a part of and be annexed to the ______
community college district effective the ______ day of ______, ______? If this proposition is
approved, the overall tax levy in the school district will increase by the community college
tax levy of $_____ per $100 of assessed valuation and all residents of the school district will
be eligible for reduced community college tuition at the in-district rate.]
6. If a majority of the votes cast in the district proposing annexation favor annexation,
the secretary shall certify the fact, with a copy of the record, to the board of the district and to
the boards of the districts to which annexation is proposed; whereupon the boards of the

HCS HB 2925 34
seven-director districts to which annexation is proposed shall meet to consider the
advisability of receiving the district or a portion thereof, and if a majority of all the
members of each board favor annexation, the boundary lines of the seven-director school
districts from the effective date shall be changed to include the district, and the board shall
immediately notify the secretary of the district which has been annexed of its action.
7. Upon the effective date of the annexation, all indebtedness, property and money on
hand belonging thereto shall immediately pass to the seven-director school district. If the
district is annexed to more than one district, the provisions of sections 162.031 and 162.041
shall apply.
162.840. The question shall be submitted [in substantially the following form:] as
provided in section 115.706.
[Shall there be organized a special school district comprising the school districts of __
____ (described by school district name and/or number), state of Missouri, for vocational
education and for the education and training of handicapped and severely handicapped
children, embracing the entire area of these school districts, having the power to impose a
property tax not to exceed the annual rate of twenty-five cents on each hundred dollars
assessed valuation, and any additional tax that is approved hereafter by vote thereon, and to
be known as "The Special School District of ______," as prayed for by a petition filed with
state board of education on the ______ day of ______, 20______?]
164.021. 1. Whenever it becomes necessary, in the judgment of the school board of
any school district in the state, to increase the tax rate beyond the rate authorized by the
constitution for district purposes without voter approval plus the last tax rate approved by the
voters for school purposes, or when voters of the district equal in number to ten percent or
more of the number of votes cast for the member of the school board receiving the greatest
number of votes cast at the last school election in the district wherein board members were
elected, petition the board, in writing, for an increase in the tax rate, the board shall determine
the rate of taxation necessary to be levied in excess of the existing rate and submit the
proposition as to whether the rate of taxation shall be increased by the board to the voters of
the district. The proposal may be submitted at an election as provided in section 115.706.
2. If the necessary majority of the voters voting thereon, as required by Article X,
Section 11(c), of the Constitution, favor the proposed increase, the result of vote, including
the rate of taxation so voted, shall be certified by the clerk of the district to the clerk of the
commission of the proper county or counties, who, on receipt thereof, shall assess the amount
so certified, effective as of September twentieth next following, against all taxable property of
the school district as provided by law. In metropolitan districts the certification shall be made
by the secretary of the board as required by law.

HCS HB 2925 35
164.151. 1. The questions on bond issues in all districts shall be submitted [in
substantially the following form:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the ______ board of education borrow money in the amount of ______ dollars
for the purpose of ______ and issue bonds for the payment thereof resulting in an estimated
increase to the debt service property tax levy of ______ (amount of estimated increase) per
one hundred dollars of assessed valuation? If this proposition is approved, the adjusted debt
service levy of the school district is estimated to increase from ______ (amount of current
school district levy) to ______ (estimated adjusted debt service levy) per one hundred dollars
assessed valuation of real and personal property.]
2. If the constitutionally required number of the votes cast are for the loan, the board
may, subject to the restrictions of section 164.161, borrow money in the name of the district,
to the amount and for the purpose specified in the notices aforesaid, and issue bonds of the
district for the payment thereof.
167.231. 1. Within all school districts except metropolitan districts the board of
education shall provide transportation to and from school for all pupils living more than three
and one-half miles from school and may provide transportation for all pupils. State aid for
transportation shall be paid as provided in section 163.161 only on the basis of the cost of
pupil transportation for those pupils living one mile or more from school, including
transportation provided to and from publicly operated university laboratory schools. The
board of education may provide transportation for pupils living less than one mile from
school at the expense of the district and may prescribe reasonable rules and regulations as to
eligibility of pupils for transportation, and, notwithstanding any other provision of law, no
such district shall be subject to an administrative penalty when the district demonstrates
pursuant to rule established by the state board of education that such students are required to
cross a state highway or county arterial in the absence of sidewalks, traffic signals, or a
crossing guard and that no existing bus stop location has been changed to permit a district to
evade such penalty. If no increase in the tax levy of the school district is required to provide
transportation for pupils living less than one mile from the school, the board may transport
said pupils. If an increase in the tax levy of the school district is required to provide
transportation for pupils living less than one mile from school, the board shall submit the
question at a public election as provided in section 115.706. If a two-thirds majority of the
voters voting on the question at the election are in favor of providing the transportation, the
board shall arrange and provide therefor.
2. The proposal and the ballots [may] shall be [in substantially the following form:]
submitted as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the board of education of the ______ school district provide
transportation at the expense of the district for pupils living less than

HCS HB 2925 36
one mile from school and be authorized to levy an additional tax of ___
___ cents on the one hundred dollars assessed valuation to provide
funds to pay for such transportation service?]
[ YES] [ NO]
[(If you are in favor of the proposition (or question), place an X in the
box opposite "YES". If you are opposed to the proposition (or
question), place an X in the box opposite "NO".)]
3. The board of education of any school district may provide transportation to and
from school for any public school pupil not otherwise eligible for transportation under the
provisions of state law, and may prescribe reasonable rules and regulations as to eligibility for
transportation, if the parents or guardian of the pupil agree in writing to pay the actual cost of
transporting the pupil. The minimum charge would be the actual cost of transporting the
pupil for ninety school days, which actual cost is to be determined by the average per-pupil
cost of transporting children in the school district during the preceding school year. The full
actual cost shall be paid by the parent or guardian of the pupil and shall not be paid out of any
state school aid funds or out of any other revenues of the school district. The cost of
transportation may be paid in installments, and the board of education shall establish the cost
of the transportation and the time or times and method of payment.
178.881. 1. The board of trustees of any public community college district in this
state may establish a community college capital improvement subdistrict by its order for the
sole purpose of capital projects. The boundaries of any capital improvement subdistrict
established pursuant to this section shall be within the boundaries of the community college
district.
2. In the event a capital improvement subdistrict is so established, the board of
trustees may propose an annual rate of taxation for the sole purpose of capital projects, within
the limits of sections 178.770 to 178.891, which proposal shall be submitted to a vote of the
people within the capital improvement subdistrict as provided in section 115.706.
3. The question shall be submitted [in substantially the following form:] as provided
in section 115.706.
[Shall the board of trustees of ______ (name of district) be authorized,
for the purpose of ______ (name of capital project), to borrow money
in the amount of ______ dollars to be used in the capital improvement
subdistrict of ______ (name of capital improvement subdistrict) for the
purpose of ______ (name of capital project) and issue bonds for
payment thereof?]
[ YES] [ NO]

HCS HB 2925 37
4. If a majority of the votes cast on the question are for the tax as submitted, the tax
shall be levied and collected on property within the capital improvement subdistrict in the
same manner as other community college district taxes. Such funds shall be used for capital
improvements in the community college capital improvement subdistrict.
5. Where a tax has not been approved by the voters within a five-year period from the
establishment of a community college capital improvement subdistrict, such capital
improvement subdistrict shall be dissolved by the board of trustees.
182.010. 1. Whenever voters equal to five percent of the total vote cast for governor
at the last election in any county, outside of the territory of all cities and towns in the county
which at the time of election as hereinafter provided maintain and control free public and tax
supported libraries pursuant to other provisions of this chapter, except as provided in section
182.030, shall petition the county governing body in writing, asking that a county library
district of the county, outside of the territory of all the aforesaid cities and towns, be
established and be known as "______ County library district", and asking that an annual tax
be levied for the purpose herein specified, and specifying in their petition a rate of taxation,
then the county governing body, if it finds the petition was signed by the requisite number of
voters and verified in accordance with the provisions of section 126.040, pertaining to
initiative petitions, shall enter of record a brief recital of the petition, including a description
of the proposed county library district, and of its finding; and shall order that the questions of
the petition be submitted to the voters of the proposed county library district as provided in
section 115.706. The order of the county governing body and the notice shall specify the
name of the county and the rate of taxation mentioned in the petition.
2. The question shall be submitted [in substantially the following form:] as provided
in section 115.706.
[Shall there be established a ______ County library district?
Shall there be a tax of ______ (insert amount) on each one hundred dollars assessed
valuation for a county library?]
3. In case the boundary limits of any city or town hereinabove mentioned are not the
same as the boundary limits of the school district of the city or town, and the school district
embraces territory outside the boundary limits of the city or town and within the boundary
limits of the proposed county library district, then all voters, otherwise qualified and residing
in the school district, but outside the limits of the city or town and within the limits of the
proposed county library district, shall be eligible to vote on the proposition, and may cast a
vote thereon at the designated polling place within the county. The ballots shall be certified to
county governing body as provided in section 179.020.

HCS HB 2925 38
4. In case the proposed tax is sought as an increased tax for the maintenance of a
library already established hereunder, over a lesser tax rate theretofore voted and adopted,
then such fact shall be recited in the petition and the notice of the submission of the question.
5. The question shall be submitted [in substantially the following form:] as provided
in section 115.706.
[Shall there be a tax increase of ______ (insert amount) over the present ______ tax
for the county library?]
6. If a majority of all the votes cast on the question are for the tax as submitted, the
tax specified in the notice shall be levied and collected in the same manner as other county
library taxes as provided in section 182.020, and shall be known as and become a part of the
"County Library Fund" to be administered as provided in section 182.020.
182.020. 1. If, from returns of the submission of the question, the majority of all the
votes cast are in favor of establishing a county library district and for the tax for a free county
library, the county governing body shall enter of record a brief recital of the returns and that
there has been established "______ county library district", and thereafter such "______
county library district", shall be considered established; and the tax specified in the notice,
subject to the provisions of this section, shall be levied and collected, from year to year.
2. At least once in every month the county collector in each county of the first and
second classes, including such counties having a charter form of government, shall pay over
to the treasurer of the county library district all moneys received and collected by him to
which the district is entitled and take duplicate receipts from the treasurer, one of which he
shall file with the secretary of the county library district and the other he shall file in his
settlement with the county governing body. The county collector in the counties of the third
and fourth classes shall pay over to the county treasurer at least once in every month all
moneys received and collected by him which are due the county library district and shall take
duplicate receipts therefor, one of which he shall file in his settlement with the county
governing body. The county treasurer in such counties shall pay over to the treasurer of the
county library district, at least once in every month, all moneys so received by him to which
the district is entitled. Upon payment he shall take duplicate receipts from the treasurer of the
county library district, one of which he shall file with the secretary of the county library
district, and the other he shall file in his settlement with the county governing body.
3. The tax may be reconsidered whenever the voters of any county library district
shall so determine by a majority vote on such questions after petition, order, and notice of the
election and of the purpose thereof, first having been made, filed, and given, as in the case of
establishing such county library district. At least five years must elapse after the county
library district has been established and a tax therefor has been levied before a question to
reconsider the tax may be submitted under this subsection.

HCS HB 2925 39
4. Whenever the county library board of trustees finds it appropriate, it may order an
election as provided in section 115.706 on the question of increasing the tax established
pursuant to subsection 2 of section 182.010 or increased pursuant to subsection 5 of section
182.010. Notice of the election shall be published in the same manner as is notice of an
election to establish a county library district under section 182.010. The notice and order
shall each recite the amount of the proposed increase. The question shall be submitted [in
substantially the following form:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the ______ per hundred dollars assessed valuation tax for the county library be
increased to ______ per hundred dollars assessed valuation?]

If a majority of votes cast on the question are in favor of the increase, then the increased tax
shall be levied and collected in the same manner as the tax was at its previous lower rate.
5. As used in sections 182.010 to 182.120, the words "county commission" or "county
governing body" shall be construed to mean the proper commission or official in any county
operating under a special charter.
182.030. Whenever voters equal to five percent of the total vote cast for governor at
the last election in an existing municipal library district within the geographical boundaries of
a proposed or existing county library district shall petition in writing the county commission
to be included in the proposed or existing county library district, subject to the official
approval of the existing county library board, the voters of the municipal library district shall
be permitted to vote on the question for establishing or joining the county library district, and
on the proposition for a tax levy for establishing and maintaining a free county library as
provided in section 115.706. If the question carries by a majority vote, the municipal library
district shall become a part of the county library district at the beginning of the next fiscal
year and the property within the municipal library district shall be liable to taxes levied for
free county library purposes. If a majority of voters in the existing municipal library district
oppose the county library district, the existing municipal library district shall continue.
182.100. 1. Whenever, in any county library district which has decided or shall
hereafter decide to establish and maintain a free county library under the provisions of
sections 182.010 to 182.120, the county library board of trustees, by written resolution
entered of record, deems it necessary that free county library buildings be erected in the
county and voters equal to five percent of the total vote cast for governor at the last election of
any county library district shall petition the county governing body in writing asking that an
annual tax be levied at and as an increased rate of taxation for the library buildings and
specify in their petition a rate of taxation annually, and not to be levied for more than ten
years, on all taxable property in such county library district, then the county governing body,
if it finds the petition was signed by the requisite number of voters, shall enter of record a

HCS HB 2925 40
brief recital of the petition, and of its finding, and shall order that the question of the petition
be submitted to the voters of the county library district at an election as provided in section
115.706. The order and the notice shall specify the rate of taxation mentioned in the petition.
2. The question shall be submitted [in substantially the following form:] as provided
in section 115.706.
[Shall there be a tax of ______ (insert amount) on each one hundred dollars assessed
valuation for the erection of a free county library building?]
3. If the majority of the voters of the county library district voting on the question
vote in favor of the tax, the tax specified in the notice shall be levied and collected in like
manner with other taxes of the county library district, and shall be known as the "County
Library Building Fund", and shall be subject to the exclusive control of the county library
board of trustees. At least once in every month the county collector in all counties of the first
and second classes, including such counties having a charter form of government, shall pay
over to the treasurer of the county library district all money received and collected by him for
the fund and take duplicate receipts from the treasurer, one of which he shall file with the
secretary of the county library district and the other he shall file in his settlement with the
county governing body. The county collector in counties of the third and fourth classes shall
pay over to the county treasurer, at least once in every month, all moneys received and
collected by him for the county library building fund and shall take duplicate receipts
therefor, one of which he shall file in his settlement with the county governing body. The
county treasurer in such county shall pay over to the treasurer of the county library district, at
least once in every month, all moneys so received by him for the fund; upon payment he shall
take duplicate receipts from the treasurer of the county library district, one of which he shall
file with the secretary of the district, and the other he shall file in the settlement with the
county governing body. This fund shall be used for expenses incident to the erection and
furnishing of the library building. The tax hereby provided for the erection of free county
library buildings in such county shall be in addition to the tax levied for the establishment and
maintenance of such county library.
182.140. 1. Whenever voters equal to five percent of the total vote cast for governor
at the last election in any city petition the mayor, common council or other proper governing
body in writing asking that an annual tax be levied for the establishment and maintenance of a
free public library in the city, and specify in their petition a rate of taxation on all the taxable
property in the city, the governing body shall direct that the question be submitted to the
voters of the city at an election as provided in section 115.706. The order of the governing
body and the notice shall specify the name of the city and the rate of taxation mentioned in the
petition.

HCS HB 2925 41
2. The question shall be submitted [in substantially the following form:] as provided
in section 115.706.
[Shall there be a tax of ______ (insert amount) on each one hundred dollars assessed
valuation for a public library?]
3. If, from returns of the election, the majority of all the votes cast on the question are
in favor of the tax, the governing body shall enter of record a brief recital of the returns and
that there has been established a public library and thereafter the free public library shall be
established, and shall be a body corporate, and known as such.
4. The tax specified in the notice, subject to the provisions of this section, shall be
levied and collected, from year to year, in like manner with other general taxes of the city.
The proceeds of the levy, together with all interest accruing on same, with library fines,
collections, bequests and donations in money, shall be deposited in the city library fund. At
least once in every month the proper city finance officer shall pay over to the treasurer of the
library district all moneys received and collected for the city library fund, including interest
on such moneys, and shall take duplicate receipts from the treasurer, one of which he shall file
with the secretary of the library district and the other of which he shall file in his settlement
with the city governing body.
5. In case the proposed tax is sought as an increased tax for the maintenance of a free
public library already established over a lesser tax rate theretofore voted and adopted, then
such fact shall be recited in the petition and the notice of the election or whenever the city
library board of trustees finds it appropriate it may order an election as provided in section
115.706 on the question of increasing the tax established pursuant to this section. Notice of
the election shall be published in the same manner as is notice of an election to establish a city
library district under this section. The notice and order shall each recite the amount of the
proposed increase.
6. The question shall be submitted [in substantially the following form:] as provided
in section 115.706.
[Shall there be a tax increase of ______ (insert amount) over the present ______ tax
for the public library?]
7. If a majority of all the votes cast on the question is for the tax submitted, the tax
specified in the notice shall be levied and collected in like manner with other general taxes of
the city, and shall be known as and become a part of the "City Library Fund" and be
administered as provided in section 182.200.
8. The tax may be reconsidered whenever the voters of the city determine by a
majority vote given at an election.
9. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter to the contrary, any city may
establish, operate and maintain a free public library in accordance with the provisions of this

HCS HB 2925 42
section if the city is located within the boundaries of a county library district that has been
established, but has not levied and collected a library tax pursuant to section 182.020 within a
year of when the county library district was first established.
10. The authority granted by this section shall be in addition to those powers granted
in section 94.400.
182.650. 1. Whenever a consolidated public library district has been created it may
levy a tax at a rate of not less than twenty cents on the one hundred dollars of assessed
valuation of all taxable property in the districts to be served by the consolidated public library
district; except that, any increase in the rate of taxation to be assessed shall, on resolution
adopted by the board of trustees of the consolidated public library district, be submitted to the
county commission or county executive officers of the counties included within the district, to
be submitted to the voters of the respective counties for approval.
2. The county commissions or county executive officers, after receipt of the
resolution pursuant to the provisions of this section, shall order that the proposed increase in
the rate of taxation be submitted to the voters of the consolidated public library district at an
election as provided in section 115.706. The order of the commission and the notice shall
specify the name of the county and the rate of taxation mentioned in the petition.
3. The question shall be submitted [in substantially the following form:] as provided
in section 115.706.
[Shall there be a ______ cent tax increase over the ______ cent tax per hundred
dollars assessed valuation for the ______ consolidated public library district?]
4. If a majority of all the votes cast on the question shall be for the tax increase as
submitted, the increased tax specified in the notice shall be levied and collected in like
manner with other county taxes and shall be paid and forwarded to the treasurer of the board
of trustees of the consolidated public library district by the county collector.
5. If a majority of the votes cast on the question shall be against the tax rate as
submitted, then the tax rate shall remain at the previously existing levy.
6. Whenever in any consolidated public library district which has decided to establish
and maintain a free library in any district served under the provisions of sections 182.610 to
182.670, the consolidated public library district board of trustees, by written resolution
entered of record, deems it necessary that free library buildings be erected in the district, it
shall notify the county commission or chief executive in writing asking that an annual tax be
levied at and as an increased rate of taxation for the library buildings and specify in its
resolution an additional rate of taxation of ______ cents on the hundred dollars annually, and
not to be levied for more than ten years on all taxable property in such consolidated public
library district, then the county commission or county executive officer shall enter of record a
brief recital of the resolution and shall order that the question be submitted to the voters of the

HCS HB 2925 43
consolidated public library district as provided in section 115.706. The order of the
commission or county executive officer and notice shall specify the rate of taxation
mentioned in the resolution.
7. The question shall be submitted [in substantially the following form:] as provided
in section 115.706.
[Shall there be a ______ cent tax for erection of library buildings?]
8. If the majority of the voters of the county library district voting on the question
vote in favor of the tax, the tax specified in the notice shall be levied and collected in like
manner with other taxes of the county, and delivered to the treasurer of the board of trustees
of the consolidated public library district, and shall be subject to the exclusive control of the
consolidated public library district board of trustees, and the fund shall be disbursed by the
consolidated public library district treasurer only upon proper instrument of payment of the
board, and be used for expenses incident to the erection and furnishing of the library
buildings. The levy herein providing for the erection of library buildings shall be in addition
to the tax levied for the establishment and maintenance of the consolidated public library
district.
182.655. 1. The board of trustees of the consolidated public library district may
provide for the purchase of ground and for the erection of public library buildings, and for the
improvement of existing buildings, and for the furnishing of said buildings and may provide
for the payment of the same by the issue of bonds or otherwise, subject to the conditions and
limitations set forth in this section.
2. No bonds shall be issued in an amount in excess of the constitutional limitations of
the value of taxable, tangible property in the consolidated public library district, as shown by
the last completed assessment for state and county purposes, nor shall such indebtedness be
incurred unless it has been approved by the vote of the constitutionally required percentage of
the voters of the consolidated public library district voting on the question at a municipal
election as provided in section 115.706. The ballot for approval shall state in boldfaced type
the tax rate necessary to retire the bonds as nearly accurate as may be and shall be submitted
as provided in section 115.706.
3. The boards of trustees shall provide for the collection of an annual tax on all
taxable, tangible property in the consolidated public library district sufficient to pay the
interest and principal of the indebtedness as they shall fall due and to retire the same within
twenty years from the date contracted.
4. If, upon the returns from the election, which shall be certified to the board of
trustees of the district, it appears that the question to incur indebtedness has been assented to
by the constitutionally required percentage of the voters voting on the question, the board of
trustees shall enter of record a brief recital of the returns and shall declare that the

HCS HB 2925 44
consolidated public library district board of trustees may issue bonds of the consolidated
public library district in a total amount not in excess of that authorized by the voters. The
board shall offer such bonds at public sale and shall provide such method as it may deem
necessary for the advertisement of the sale of each issue of said bonds before the same are
sold. The bonds shall be issued, payable to bearer and in denominations of not less than one
hundred dollars, or some multiple thereof, payable in not more than twenty years from the
date they bear, bearing interest from date at a rate not exceeding the rate allowable by law,
payable semiannually, and with interest coupons attached to conform to the face thereof. All
bonds shall be signed by the president of the board of trustees, attested by the signature of the
treasurer, and each bond shall have impressed thereon the corporate seal of the consolidated
public library district.
182.715. 1. Whenever an urban public library district is created pursuant to section
182.703, the vote for creation of the urban public library district shall provide that any levy
for library purposes established pursuant to section 137.030 shall be transferred to the urban
public library district and such urban public library district shall be authorized to levy a tax at
this established levy rate. Any increase above this levy rate shall, on resolution adopted by
the board of trustees of the urban public library district, be submitted to the voters of the
urban public library district for approval, in accordance with the provisions of section
137.030 and in compliance with section 115.706.
2. If a majority of all the votes cast on the question shall be for the tax increase as
submitted, the increased tax specified in the notice shall be levied and collected in like
manner with other county taxes and shall be paid and forwarded to the treasurer of the board
of trustees of an urban public library district by the county collector.
3. If a majority of the votes cast on the question shall be against the tax rate as
submitted, then the tax rate shall remain at the previously existing levy.
4. Whenever in any urban public library district which has decided to establish and
maintain a free library in any district served under the provisions of sections 182.701 to
182.723, the urban public library district board of trustees, by written resolution entered of
record, deems it necessary that free library buildings be erected in the district it shall notify
the appropriate election authorities that the question should be submitted to the voters of the
urban public library district. The resolution and the notice shall specify the rate of taxation
necessary.
5. The question shall be submitted [in substantially the following form:] as provided
in section 115.706.
[Shall there be a ______ cent tax for erection of library buildings?]
6. If the majority of the voters of the urban public library district voting on the
question vote in favor of the tax, the tax specified in the notice shall be levied and collected in

HCS HB 2925 45
like manner with other taxes of the district, and delivered to the treasurer of the board of
trustees of the urban public library district, and shall be subject to the exclusive control of the
urban public library district board of trustees and the fund shall be disbursed by the urban
public library district treasurer only upon proper instrument of payment of the board of
trustees, and be used for expenses incident to the erection and furnishing of the library
buildings. The levy herein providing for the erection of library buildings shall be in addition
to the tax levied for the establishment and maintenance of the urban public library district.
182.717. 1. The board of trustees of an urban public library district may provide for
the purchase of ground and for the erection of public library buildings, and for the
improvement of existing buildings, and for the furnishing of the buildings and may provide
for the payment of the same by the issue of bonds or otherwise, subject to the conditions and
limitations set forth in this section.
2. No bonds of the public library district shall be issued in an amount in excess of the
constitutional limitations of the value of taxable, tangible property in an urban public library
district, as shown by the last completed assessment for state and county purposes, nor shall
such indebtedness be incurred unless it has been approved by the vote of the constitutionally
required percentage of the voters of an urban public library district voting on the question at
an election as provided in section 115.706. The ballot for approval shall state in boldfaced
type the tax rate necessary to retire the bonds as nearly accurate as may be and shall be
submitted as provided in section 115.706.
3. The board of trustees shall provide for the collection of an annual tax on all
taxable, tangible property in an urban public library district sufficient to pay the interest and
principal of the indebtedness as they shall fall due and to retire the same within twenty years
from the date contracted.
4. If, upon the returns from the election, which shall be certified to the board of
trustees, it appears that the question to incur indebtedness has been assented to by the
constitutionally required percentage of the voters voting on the question, the board of trustees
shall enter of record a brief recital of the returns and shall declare that the urban public library
district board of trustees may issue bonds of the urban public library district in a total amount
not in excess of that authorized by the voters. The board of trustees shall offer such bonds at
public sale and shall provide such method as it may deem necessary for the advertisement of
the sale of each issue of said bonds before the same are sold. The bonds shall be issued,
payable to bearer and in denominations of not less than one hundred dollars, or some multiple
thereof, payable in not more than twenty years from the date they bear, bearing interest from
date at a rate not exceeding the rate allowable by law, payable semiannually, and with interest
coupons attached to conform to the fact thereof. All bonds shall be signed by the president of

HCS HB 2925 46
the board of trustees, attested by the signature of the treasurer, and each bond shall have
impressed thereon the corporate seal of the urban public library district.
184.350. 1. Whenever qualified voters representing five percent of the votes cast at
the last preceding election for governor in any constitutional charter city not located within a
county and qualified voters representing five percent of the votes cast at the last preceding
election for governor in a constitutional charter county adjoining such city shall file verified
petitions for the establishment of a metropolitan zoological park and museum district,
comprising a zoological subdistrict, and art museum subdistrict or a St. Louis Science Center
subdistrict with the respective election officials of such city and county, respectively,
requesting such election officials to submit a proposition for the establishment of a
metropolitan zoological park and museum district comprised of a zoological subdistrict, and
art museum subdistrict and a St. Louis Science Center subdistrict at the next general or
primary election for the election of state officers or special election for the submission of such
proposition, such election officials shall communicate to their corresponding counterparts and
the chief executive officers of the respective city and county the fact a verified petition has
been filed. At such time that both election officials have received the verified petitions
described above, then such officials shall submit the above described proposition or
propositions to the qualified voters of such city and county at the next general or primary
election for the election of state officers or special election as provided in section 115.706.
Such election officials shall give legal notice at least sixty days prior to such general or
primary election or special election in at least two newspapers that such proposition or
propositions shall be submitted at the next general or primary election or special election held
for submission of this proposition.
2. Such proposition shall be submitted [to the voters in substantially the following
form at such election:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall there be established a Metropolitan Zoological Park and
Museum District comprising the City of ______ and the County of ___
___ which district shall consist of all or any one of the following
subdistricts:]
[a. Zoological Subdistrict with a tax rate not in excess of four cents on
each $100 of assessed valuation of all taxable property within the
district.]
[FOR] [AGAINST]
[b. Art Museum Subdistrict with a tax rate not in excess of four cents
on each $100 of assessed valuation of taxable property within the
district.]
[FOR] [AGAINST]

HCS HB 2925 47
[c. St. Louis Science Center Subdistrict with a tax rate not in excess of
one cent on each $100 of assessed valuation of taxable property within
the district. ]
[FOR] [AGAINST]
3. In the event that a majority of the voters voting on such propositions in such city
and the majority of voters voting on such propositions in such county at said election cast
votes "FOR" one or more of the propositions, then the district shall be deemed established
and the tax rate, as established by the board, for such subdistrict shall be deemed in full force
and effect as of the first day of the year following the year of said election. The results of the
aforesaid election shall be certified by the election officials of such city and county,
respectively, to the respective chief executive officers of such city and county not less than
thirty days after the day of election. In the event one or more of the propositions shall fail to
receive a majority of the votes "FOR" in either the city or the county, then such proposition
shall not be resubmitted at any election held within one year of the date of the election the
proposition was rejected. Any such resubmissions of one or more of such propositions shall
substantially comply with the provisions of sections 184.350 to 184.384.
4. All costs of the election shall be paid as provided by sections 115.063 and 115.065.
184.351. 1. The board of directors of any metropolitan zoological park and museum
district, as established pursuant to the provisions of sections 184.350 to 184.384, on behalf of
the district may request the election officials of any city and county containing all or part of
such district to submit a proposition to increase the maximum tax rate for the St. Louis
Science Center subdistrict set in section 184.350, to the qualified voters of such district at any
general or primary or special election as provided in section 115.706. Such election officials
shall give legal notice as provided in chapter 115.
2. Such proposition shall be submitted [to the voters in substantially the following
form at such election:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the Zoological Park and Museum District of the City of ______
and County of ______ be authorized to increase the St. Louis Science
Center Subdistrict to a tax rate not in excess of six cents on each $100
of assessed valuation of taxable property within the district for the
purpose of operating, maintaining and otherwise financially supporting
the subdistrict? The tax rate shall be set annually by the board based on
the budget submitted by the St. Louis Science Center and approved by
the board. This rate shall replace the present tax rate of ______ cent for
the St. Louis Science Center Subdistrict.]
[ YES] [ NO]

HCS HB 2925 48
3. In the event that a majority of the voters voting on such proposition in such city and
the majority of voters voting on such proposition in such county at such election cast votes
"YES" for the proposition, then the tax rate for such subdistrict shall be deemed in full force
and effect as of the first day of the second month following the election. The results of the
aforesaid election shall be certified by the election officials of such city and county,
respectively, to the respective chief executive officers of such city and county not less than
thirty days after the day on which such election was held. All costs of the election shall be
paid as provided by sections 115.063 and 115.065. In the event the proposition shall fail to
receive a majority of the votes "YES" in either the city or the county, then such proposition
shall not be resubmitted at any election held within one year of the date of the election at
which such proposition was rejected.
184.353. 1. (1) The board of directors of any metropolitan zoological park and
museum district, as established according to the provisions of sections 184.350 to 184.384, on
behalf of the district may request the election officials of any city and county containing all or
part of such district to submit the following described proposition to the qualified voters of
such district at any general, primary or special election as provided in section 115.706. Such
election officials shall give legal notice at least sixty days prior to such general, primary or
special election in at least two newspapers that such proposition shall be submitted at any
general, primary or special election held for submission of the proposition as provided in
section 115.706.
(2) Such proposition shall be submitted [to the voters in substantially the following
form at such election:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the Metropolitan Zoological Park and Museum District of the
City of ______ and County of ______ be authorized to provide for a
Botanical Garden Subdistrict and be authorized to provide the
Botanical Garden Subdistrict with a tax rate not in excess of four cents
on each $100 of assessed valuation of taxable property within the
district?]
[ YES] [ NO]
(3) In the event that a majority of all the voters voting on such proposition in such city
and a majority of voters voting on such proposition in such county cast "YES" votes on the
proposition, then the botanical garden subdistrict shall be deemed established and the tax rate,
as established by the board for such subdistrict, shall be deemed in full force and effect as of
the first day of the second month following the election. The results of the election shall be
certified by the election officials of such city and county, respectively, to the respective chief
executive officers of such city and county not less than thirty days after the day of the
election. The cost of the election shall be paid as provided by sections 115.063 and 115.065.

HCS HB 2925 49
In the event the proposition shall fail to receive a majority of the "YES" votes in either the
city or the county, then the proposition shall not be resubmitted at any election held prior to
the next general or primary election in such city or county in the following year. Any such
resubmission shall subsequently comply with the provisions of sections 184.350 to 184.384.
(4) If the botanical garden subdistrict shall be established, then its commissioners, or
any person with whom its commissioners contract, may establish and charge fees for
admission to the premises of the botanical garden subdistrict, or to the premises of any person
with whom its commissioners contract, not to exceed one dollar for adults and fifty cents for
children under sixteen years of age. Any increase in the fees shall be presented prior to
implementation for approval or disapproval to the board of the metropolitan zoological park
and museum district of which the botanical garden subdistrict is a member.
2. (1) The board of directors of any metropolitan zoological park and museum
district, as established according to the provisions of sections 184.350 to 184.384, on behalf
of the district may request the election officials of any city and county containing all or part of
such district to submit the following described proposition to the qualified voters of such
district at any general, primary or special election as provided in section 115.706. Such
election officials shall give legal notice at least sixty days prior to such general, primary or
special election in at least two newspapers that such proposition shall be submitted at any
general, primary or special election held for submission of the proposition as provided in
section 115.706.
(2) Such proposition shall be submitted [to the voters in substantially the following
form at such election:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the Metropolitan Zoological Park and Museum District of the
City of ______ and County of ______ be authorized to provide for a
Transport Museum Subdistrict and be authorized to provide the
Transport Museum Subdistrict with a tax rate not in excess of four
cents on each $100 of assessed valuation of taxable property within the
district?]
[ YES] [ NO]
(3) In the event that a majority of all the voters voting on such proposition in such city
and a majority of voters voting on such proposition in such county cast "YES" votes on the
proposition, then the transport museum subdistrict shall be deemed established and the tax
rate, as established by the board for such subdistrict, shall be deemed in full force and effect
as of the first day of the second month following the election. The results of the election shall
be certified by the election officials of such city and county, respectively, to the respective
chief executive officers of such city and county not less than thirty days after the day of the
election. The cost of the election shall be paid as provided by sections 115.063 and 115.065.

HCS HB 2925 50
In the event the proposition shall fail to receive a majority of the "YES" votes in either the
city or the county, then the proposition shall not be resubmitted at any election held prior to
the next general or primary election in such city or county in the following year. Any such
resubmission shall subsequently comply with the provisions of sections 184.350 to 184.384.
(4) If the transport museum subdistrict shall be established, then its commissioners, or
any person with whom its commissioners contract, may establish and charge fees for
admission to the premises of the transport museum subdistrict, or to the premises of any
person with whom its commissioners contract, not to exceed one dollar for adults and fifty
cents for children under sixteen years of age. Any increase in the fees shall be presented prior
to implementation for approval or disapproval to the board of the metropolitan zoological
park and museum district of which the transport museum subdistrict is a member.
3. (1) The board of directors of any metropolitan zoological park and museum
district, as established according to the provisions of sections 184.350 to 184.384, on behalf
of the district may request the election officials of any city and county containing all or part of
such district to submit the following described proposition to the qualified voters of such
district at any general, primary or special election as provided in section 115.706. Such
election officials shall give legal notice at least sixty days prior to such general, primary or
special election in at least two newspapers that such proposition shall be submitted at any
general, primary or special election held for submission of the proposition as provided in
section 115.706.
(2) Such proposition shall be submitted [to the voters in substantially the following
form at such election:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the Metropolitan Zoological Park and Museum District of the
City of ______ and the County of ______ be authorized to provide for
a Missouri History Museum Subdistrict and be authorized to provide
the Missouri History Museum Subdistrict with a tax rate not in excess
of four cents on each $100 of assessed valuation of taxable property
within the district?]
[ YES] [ NO]
(3) In the event that a majority of all the voters voting on such proposition in such city
and a majority of voters voting on such proposition in such county cast "YES" votes on the
proposition, then the Missouri history museum subdistrict shall be deemed established and the
tax rate, as established by the board for such subdistrict, shall be deemed in full force and
effect as of the first day of the second month following the election. The results of the
election shall be certified by the election officials of such city and county, respectively, to the
respective chief executive officers of such city and county not less than thirty days after the
100 day of the election. The cost of the election shall be paid as provided by sections 115.063 and

HCS HB 2925 51
101 115.065. In the event the proposition shall fail to receive a majority of the "YES" votes in
102 either the city or the county, then the proposition shall not be resubmitted at any election held
103 prior to the next general or primary or special election in such city or county in the following
104 year. Any such resubmission shall subsequently comply with the provisions of sections
105 184.350 to 184.384.
106 4. (1) The board of directors of any metropolitan zoological park and museum
107 district, as established according to the provisions of sections 184.350 to 184.354, on behalf
108 of the district may request the election officials of any city and county containing all or part of
109 such district to submit the following described proposition to the qualified voters of such
110 district at any general, primary or special election as provided in section 115.706. Such
111 election officials shall give legal notice at least sixty days prior to such general, primary or
112 special election in at least two newspapers that such proposition shall be submitted at any
113 general, primary or special election held for submission of the proposition as provided in
114 section 115.706.
115 (2) Such proposition shall be submitted [to the voters in substantially the following
116 form at such election:] as provided in section 115.706.
117 [Shall the Metropolitan Zoological Park and Museum District of the
118 City of ______ and County of ______ be authorized to provide for a
119 Symphony Orchestra Subdistrict and be authorized to provide the
120 Symphony Orchestra Subdistrict with a tax rate not in excess of four
121 cents on each $100 of assessed valuation of taxable property within the
122 district?]
123 [ YES] [ NO]
124 (3) In the event that a majority of all the voters voting on such proposition in such city
125 and a majority of voters voting on such proposition in such county cast "YES" votes on the
126 proposition, then the symphony orchestra subdistrict shall be deemed established and the tax
127 rate, as established by the board for such subdistrict, shall be deemed in full force and effect
128 as of the first day of the second month following the election. The results of the election shall
129 be certified by the election officials of such city and county not less than thirty days after the
130 day of election. The cost of the election shall be paid as provided by sections 115.063 and
131 115.065. In the event the proposition shall fail to receive a majority of the "YES" votes in
132 either the city or the county, then the proposition shall not be resubmitted at any election held
133 prior to the next general or primary in such city or county in the following year. Any such
134 resubmission shall subsequently comply with the provisions of sections 184.350 to 184.384.
135 (4) If the symphony orchestra subdistrict shall be established, then its commissioners,
136 or any person with whom its commissioners contract, may charge such prices from time to
137 time for tickets for performances conducted under the auspices of the subdistrict or as they or

HCS HB 2925 52
138 such person deem proper; provided, however, that no fewer than fifty tickets for each such
139 performance conducted at the principal concert hall of such subdistrict or such person shall be
140 made available without charge for distribution to members of the general public and no fewer
141 than fifty tickets shall be made available without charge for distribution to students in public
142 and private elementary, secondary schools and colleges and universities in the metropolitan
143 zoological park and museum district and all performances of the symphony orchestra
144 conducted at the principal concert hall of the symphony orchestra within the district shall be
145 offered for broadcast live on a public or commercial AM or FM radio station located in and
146 generally receivable in the district or on a public or commercial broadcast television station
147 located in or generally receivable in the district. The symphony orchestra subdistrict shall
148 institute a fully staffed educational music appreciation program to benefit all of the citizens of
149 the taxing district at a nominal charge.
150 (5) Immediately following the effective date of the symphony orchestra subdistrict
151 tax rate any person receiving funds from said tax rate shall become ineligible for program
152 assistance funding from the Missouri state council on the arts.
153 5. The board of directors of any metropolitan zoological park and museum district, as
154 established according to the provisions of sections 184.350 to 184.384, on behalf of the
155 district may request the election officials of any city and county containing all or part of such
156 district to submit the following described proposition to the qualified voters of such district at
157 any general, primary or special election as provided in section 115.706. Such election
158 officials shall give legal notice at least sixty days prior to such general, primary or special
159 election in at least two newspapers that such proposition shall be submitted at any general,
160 primary or special election held for submission of the proposition as provided in section
161 115.706. Such proposition shall be submitted [to the voters in substantially the following
162 form at such election:] as provided in section 115.706.
163 [Shall a Recreational and Amateur Sports Subdistrict be authorized and
164 provided for by the Metropolitan Zoological Park and Museum District
165 of the City of ______ and the County of ______ and such subdistrict be
166 authorized to establish a tax rate not in excess of four cents on each
167 $100 of assessed valuation of taxable property within the district for a
168 period not to exceed nine years?]
169 [ YES] [ NO]
170
171 In the event that a majority of all the voters voting on such proposition in such city and a
172 majority of voters voting on such proposition in such county cast "YES" votes on the
173 proposition, then the recreation and amateur sports subdistrict shall be deemed established
174 and the tax rate, as established by the board for such subdistrict, shall be deemed in full force

HCS HB 2925 53
175 and effect as of the first day of the second month following the election for a period not to
176 exceed nine years. The results of the election shall be certified by the election officials of
177 such city and county, respectively, to the respective chief executive officers of such city and
178 county not less than thirty days after the day of the election. The cost of the election shall be
179 paid as provided by sections 115.063 and 115.065. In the event the proposition shall fail to
180 receive a majority of the "YES" votes in either the city or the county, then the proposition
181 shall not be resubmitted at any election held prior to the next general or primary or special
182 election in such city or county in the following year. Any such resubmission shall
183 subsequently comply with the provisions of sections 184.350 to 184.384.
184 6. (1) The board of directors of any metropolitan zoological park and museum
185 district, as established according to the provisions of sections 184.350 to 184.384, on behalf
186 of the district may request the election officials of any city and county containing all or part of
187 such district to submit the following described proposition to the qualified voters of such
188 district at any general, primary or special election as provided in section 115.706. Such
189 election officials shall give legal notice at least sixty days prior to such general, primary or
190 special election in at least two newspapers that such proposition shall be submitted at any
191 general, primary or special election held for submission of the proposition as provided in
192 section 115.706.
193 (2) Such proposition shall be submitted [to the voters in substantially the following
194 form at such election:] as provided in section 115.706.
195 [Shall the Metropolitan Zoological Park and Museum District of the
196 City of ______ and County of ______ be authorized to provide for an
197 African-American History Museum and Cultural Subdistrict and be
198 authorized to provide the African-American history museum and
199 cultural subdistrict with a tax rate not in excess of four cents on each
200 $100 of assessed valuation of taxable property within the district?]
201 [ YES] [ NO]
202 (3) In the event that a majority of all the voters voting on such proposition in such city
203 and a majority of voters voting on such proposition in such county cast "YES" votes on the
204 proposition, then the African-American history museum and cultural subdistrict shall be
205 deemed established and the tax rate, as established by the board for such subdistrict, shall be
206 deemed in full force and effect as of the first day of the second month following the election.
207 The results of the election shall be certified by the election officials of such city and county,
208 respectively, to the respective chief executive officers of such city and county not less than
209 thirty days after the day of the election. The cost of the election shall be paid as provided by
210 sections 115.063 and 115.065. In the event the proposition shall fail to receive a majority of
211 the "YES" votes in either the city or the county, then the proposition shall not be resubmitted

HCS HB 2925 54
212 at any election held prior to the next general or primary election in such city or county in the
213 following year. Any such resubmission shall subsequently comply with the provisions of
214 sections 184.350 to 184.384.
215 (4) If the African-American history museum and cultural subdistrict shall be
216 established, then its commissioners, or any person with whom its commissioners contract,
217 may establish and charge fees for admission to the premises of the African-American history
218 museum and cultural subdistrict, or to the premises of any person with whom its
219 commissioners contract, not to exceed one dollar for adults and fifty cents for children under
220 sixteen years of age. Any increase in the fees shall be presented prior to implementation for
221 approval or disapproval to the board of the metropolitan zoological park and museum district
222 of which the African-American history museum and cultural subdistrict is a member.
184.357. 1. The board of directors of any metropolitan zoological park and museum
district as established pursuant to the provisions of sections 184.350 to 184.384, on behalf of
the district, may request the election officials of any city and county of such district to submit
a proposition or propositions to increase the tax rate for the zoological park subdistrict and the
art museum subdistrict set in section 184.350 and to increase the rate for the botanical garden
subdistrict set in section 184.353 to the qualified voters of such district at any general,
primary or special election as provided in section 115.706. Such election officials, upon
receipt of such request in the form of a verified resolution or resolutions approved by the
majority of the members of such district board of directors, shall set the date of such election
and give notice of such election as provided by sections 115.063 and 115.065 and section
115.706.
2. Such proposition or propositions shall be jointly or severally submitted [to the
voters in substantially the following form at such election:] as provided in section 115.706.
[(1) Shall the Metropolitan Zoological Park and Museum District of the
City of ______ and County of ______ be authorized to increase the tax
rate for the zoological park subdistrict up to the maximum tax rate of
eight cents, or any percent thereof, on each $100 of assessed valuation
of taxable property within the district for the purpose of operating,
maintaining and otherwise financially supporting the subdistrict? The
tax rate shall be set annually by the board based on the budget
submitted by the zoological park subdistrict and approved by the board.
This tax rate shall replace the present tax rate of ______ cents for the
zoological park subdistrict.]
[ YES] [ NO]
[(2) Shall the Metropolitan Zoological Park and Museum District of the
City of ______ and County of ______ be authorized to increase the tax

HCS HB 2925 55
rate for the art museum subdistrict up to the maximum tax rate of eight
cents, or any percent thereof, on each $100 of assessed valuation of
taxable property within the district for the purpose of operating,
maintaining and otherwise financially supporting the subdistrict and
approved by the board? The tax rate shall be set annually by the board
based on the budget submitted by the art museum subdistrict and
approved by the board. This tax rate shall replace the present tax rate of
______ cents for the art museum subdistrict.]
[ YES] [ NO]
[(3) Shall the Metropolitan Zoological Park and Museum District of the
City of ______ and County of ______ be authorized to increase the tax
rate for the botanical garden subdistrict up to the maximum tax rate of
six cents, or any percent thereof, on each $100 of assessed valuation of
taxable property within the district for the purpose of operating,
maintaining and otherwise financially supporting the subdistrict and
approved by the board? The tax rate shall be set annually by the board
based on the budget submitted by the botanical garden subdistrict and
approved by the board. This tax rate shall replace the present tax rate of
______ cents for the botanical garden subdistrict.]
[ YES] [ NO]
[(4) Shall the Metropolitan Zoological Park and Museum District of the
City of ______ and County of ______ be authorized to increase the tax
rate for the Missouri history museum subdistrict up to the maximum
tax rate of six cents, or any percent thereof, on each $100 of assessed
valuation of taxable property within the district for the purpose of
operating, maintaining, and otherwise financially supporting the
subdistrict and approved by the board? The tax rate shall be set
annually by the board based on the budget submitted by the Missouri
history museum subdistrict and approved by the board. This tax rate
shall replace the present tax rate of ______ cents for the Missouri
history museum subdistrict.]
[ YES] [ NO]

In the event that a majority of the voters voting on such proposition or propositions in such
city and the majority of the voters voting on such proposition or propositions in such county
cast votes "YES" on the proposition or propositions, then the tax rate for such subdistrict shall

HCS HB 2925 56
be deemed in full force and effect as of the first day of the second month following the
election. The results of the aforesaid election shall be certified by the election officials of
such city and county, respectively, to the respective chief executive officers of such city and
county not less than thirty days after the day on which such election was held. The cost of the
election shall be paid as provided by sections 115.063 and 115.065. In the event the
proposition or propositions shall fail to receive a majority of the votes "YES" in either the city
or the county, then the proposition or propositions shall not be resubmitted at any election
held within one year of the date of the election the proposition or propositions were rejected .
184.359. 1. Notwithstanding any of the provisions of chapter 137, the board of
directors of any metropolitan zoological park and museum district, as established according to
the provisions of sections 184.350 to 184.384, on behalf of such district, may request the
election officials of any city and county containing all or part of such district to submit to the
qualified voters of such district at any municipal, special, primary or general election or
elections as provided in section 115.706a referendum or referendums to permit or restore, in
part, or, in whole, the tax rate or rates authorized for any subdistrict of such district from time
to time under the provisions of sections 184.350 to 184.384.
2. Such proposal or proposals shall be submitted to the voters [in substantially the
following form] at such election or elections[:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the Metropolitan Zoological Park and Museum District of the
City of ______ and the County of ______ be authorized to increase the
tax rate for the ______ Subdistrict to ______ cents on each $100 of
assessed valuation of taxable property within the District? This tax rate
shall replace the present tax rate of ______ for the ______ Subdistrict.]
[ YES] [ NO]
3. The proposed tax rate shall not exceed the maximum tax rate authorized by the
voters from time to time pursuant to sections 184.350 to 184.384, prior to reduction or
reductions in such rate following any reassessment pursuant to chapter 137.
4. In the event that a majority of the voters voting thereon in such city and a majority
of the voters voting thereon in such county cast votes in favor of the proposal or proposals,
then the tax rate or rates for such subdistrict or subdistricts shall be deemed in full force and
effect as of the first day of the second month following the election. The results of the
election shall be certified by the election officials of such city and county, respectively, to
such district not less than thirty days after the day of the election. The cost of the election
shall be paid as provided by sections 115.063 and 115.065. In the event any proposal shall
fail to receive a majority of the "YES" votes in either the city or the county, then such
proposal shall not be resubmitted at any election held within one year of the date of the
election on which such proposal was rejected.

HCS HB 2925 57
5. Such proposal or proposals to the qualified voters of the district may be submitted
by a verified resolution of the district board of directors to the respective election officials of
the city and county wherein the district is located.
184.600. 1. A metropolitan zoo district may be established in any city with a
population of one hundred thousand or more inhabitants located within a first class county
which does not adjoin any other first class county, after voter approval pursuant to this
section. A zoo district shall consist of such institutions and places for the collection and
exhibition of animals and animal life, for the instruction and recreation of the people, for the
promotion of zoology and kindred subjects, for the encouragement of zoological study and
research and for the increase of public interest in wild animals and in the protection of wild
animal life. The boundaries of any such metropolitan zoo district shall be the corporate
boundaries of the city, any lands annexed into the city after the establishment of the district
and areas adjacent to the city which petition and vote to become part of the district pursuant to
section 184.602. The question shall be submitted to the qualified voters of the city at a local
or state general, primary or special election as provided in section 115.706 upon the petition
of five percent of the qualified voters of the city as determined on the basis of the number of
votes cast in the city for governor at the last election held prior to the filing of the petition[,
except that such election shall not be held prior to 1992]. The election officials shall give
legal notice at least sixty days prior to such general or primary election or special election in
at least one newspaper of general circulation within the city that such proposition shall be
submitted at the next general or primary election or special election held for submission of
this proposition as provided in section 115.706. A municipality shall include in the ballot a
provision for a tax to support the district in an amount not to exceed ten cents per one hundred
dollars assessed valuation of all taxable property within the district.
2. Citizens living in a first class county in an area adjacent to and within two miles of
a city that has formed or has called an election to form a metropolitan zoo may petition the
county commission where the city is located to become part of the metropolitan zoo district
by filing with the county commission a petition containing a description of the area to be
included in the district and the signatures of five percent of the qualified voters of the area as
determined by the county clerk on the basis of the number of votes cast in the area for
governor at the last election held prior to the filing of the petition. The question shall be
submitted to the qualified voters of the area at a local or state general, primary or special
election as provided in section 115.706 upon the certification by the county clerk that the
petition contains the signatures of the required number of qualified voters. The election
officials shall give legal notice at least sixty days prior to such general or primary election or
special election in at least one newspaper of general circulation within the county that such
proposition shall be submitted at the next general or primary election or special election held

HCS HB 2925 58
for submission of this proposition as provided in section 115.706. The commission shall
include in the ballot as requested in the petition a provision for a tax to support the district at
the rate of tax which residents of the city are required to pay to support the district.
3. If the election is held in the city such proposition shall be submitted [to the voters
in substantially the following form] at such election[:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall there be established a Metropolitan Zoo District comprising the
City of ______ with a tax rate not to exceed ______ cents on each one
hundred dollars of assessed valuation of all taxable property within the
district?]
[FOR] [AGAINST]
4. If the election is held in an area outside the city such proposition shall be submitted
[to the voters in substantially the following form at such election:] as provided in section
115.706.
[Shall the area be part of a Metropolitan Zoo District with the City of _
_____ with a tax rate not to exceed ______ cents on each one hundred
dollars of assessed valuation of all taxable property within the area?]
[FOR] [AGAINST]
5. In the event that a majority of the voters voting on such proposition in the city at
such election cast votes "FOR" the proposition, then the district shall be established and the
tax rate shall be in full force and effect as of the first day of the year following the year of the
election. The results of the election shall be certified by the election officials of the city not
less than thirty days after the day of election. In the event the proposition fails to receive a
majority of the votes "FOR" in the city, then such proposition shall not be resubmitted at any
election held within one year of the date of the election the proposition was rejected.
6. In the event that a majority of the voters voting on such proposition in an area
outside the city at such election cast votes "FOR" the proposition, then the area shall be part
of the metropolitan zoo district as of the first day of the year following the year of the election
provided the voters in the city have voted to form such a district. The results of the election
shall be certified by the election official of the county not less than thirty days after the
election. In the event the proposition fails to receive a majority of the votes "FOR" in the area
outside the city, then such proposition shall not be resubmitted at any election held within one
year of the date of the election the proposition was rejected.
184.604. 1. The board of directors of any metropolitan zoo district, as established
pursuant to the provisions of section 184.600, on behalf of the district may request the
election officials of the city to submit a proposition to increase the maximum tax rate for the
district set in section 184.600, to the qualified voters of such district at any general or primary

HCS HB 2925 59
or special election as provided in section 115.706. Such election officials shall give legal
notice as provided in chapter 115.
2. Such proposition shall be submitted to the voters [in substantially the following
form at such election :] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the Metropolitan Zoo District of the City of ______ be
authorized to increase the tax rate to an amount not to exceed ______
cents on each one hundred dollars of assessed valuation of taxable
property within the district for the purpose of operating, maintaining
and otherwise financially supporting the district? This rate shall replace
the present tax rate of ______ cents for the Metropolitan Zoo District.]
[ YES] [ NO]
3. In the event that a majority of the voters voting on such proposition in the district at
such election cast votes "YES" for the proposition, then the new tax rate for the district shall
be in full force and effect as of the first day of the year following the election. The results of
the election shall be certified by the election officials of the city not less than thirty days after
the day on which such election was held. In the event the proposition fails to receive a
majority of the votes "YES" in the district, then such proposition shall not be resubmitted at
any election held within one year of the date of the election at which such proposition was
rejected.
184.614. 1. Before incurring any indebtedness under the provisions of section
184.612, the board of the district shall provide for the collection of an annual tax on all
taxable tangible property therein sufficient to pay the interest and principal of the
indebtedness as they fall due and to retire the same within twenty years from the date
contracted. The tax levy shall be in addition to that tax levy authorized by the voters as
provided in sections 184.600 and 184.604.
2. For the purpose of incurring additional indebtedness as provided in section
184.612, the board of the district shall submit the question to the voters of the district as
provided in section 115.706.
3. The question shall be submitted [in substantially the following form:] as provided
in section 115.706.
[Shall the ______ Metropolitan Zoo District issue bonds in the amount of ______
dollars for the purpose of ______?]
190.040. 1. For the organization of a district which shall levy a property tax, the
question shall be submitted [in substantially the following form:] as provided in section
115.706.
[Shall there be organized in the counties of ______, state of Missouri, an ambulance
district for the establishment and operation of an ambulance service to be located within the

HCS HB 2925 60
boundaries of said proposed district and having the power to impose a property tax not to
exceed the annual rate of thirty cents on the hundred dollars assessed valuation without voter
approval, and such additional tax as may be approved hereafter by vote thereon, to be known
as "______ Ambulance District" as prayed for by petition filed with the county clerk of _____
_ County, Missouri, on the ______ day of ______, 20______?]
2. For the organization of a district which shall levy a sales tax, the question shall be
submitted [in substantially the following form:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall there be organized in the counties of ______ , state of Missouri, an ambulance
district for the establishment and operation of an ambulance service to be located within the
boundaries of said district and having the power to impose a sales tax in an amount not to
exceed one-half of one percent without voter approval, and such additional tax as may be
approved hereafter by vote thereon, to be known as "______ Ambulance District" as prayed
for by petition filed with the county clerk of ______ County, Missouri, on the ______ day of
______, 20______?]
3. If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters voting thereon
are in favor of the proposal, then the sales tax authorized in this section shall be in effect and
the governing body of the ambulance district shall lower the level of its tax rate by an amount
which reduces property tax revenues by an amount equal to fifty percent of the amount of
sales tax collected in the preceding year. If a majority of the votes cast by the qualified voters
voting are opposed to the proposal, then the governing body of the ambulance district shall
not impose the sales tax authorized in this section unless and until the governing body of such
ambulance district resubmits a proposal to authorize the governing body of the ambulance
district to impose the sales tax authorized by this section and such proposal is approved by a
majority of the qualified voters voting thereon.
4. All revenue received by a district from the tax authorized pursuant to this section
shall be deposited in a special trust fund, and be used solely for the purposes specified in the
proposal submitted pursuant to this section for so long as the tax shall remain in effect.
5. All sales taxes collected by the director of revenue pursuant to this section, less one
percent for cost of collection, which shall be deposited in the state's general revenue fund
after payment of premiums for surety bonds as provided in section 32.087, shall be deposited
in a special trust fund, which is hereby created, to be known as the "Ambulance District Sales
Tax Trust Fund". The moneys in the ambulance district sales tax trust fund shall not be
deemed to be state funds and shall not be commingled with any funds of the state. The
director of revenue shall keep accurate records of the amount of money in the trust and the
amount collected in each district imposing a sales tax pursuant to this section, and the records
shall be open to inspection by officers of the county and to the public. Not later than the tenth
day of each month, the director of revenue shall distribute all moneys deposited in the trust

HCS HB 2925 61
fund during the preceding month to the governing body of the district which levied the tax.
Such funds shall be deposited with the board treasurer of each such district.
6. The director of revenue may make refunds from the amounts in the trust fund and
credit any district for erroneous payments and overpayments made, and may redeem
dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of such district. If any district abolishes
the tax, the district shall notify the director of revenue of the action at least ninety days prior
to the effective date of the repeal and the director of revenue may order retention in the trust
fund, for a period of one year, of two percent of the amount collected after receipt of such
notice to cover possible refunds or overpayment of the tax and to redeem dishonored checks
and drafts deposited to the credit of such accounts. After one year has elapsed after the
effective date of abolition of the tax in such district, the director of revenue shall remit the
balance in the account to the district and close the account of that district. The director of
revenue shall notify each district of each instance of any amount refunded or any check
redeemed from receipts due the district.
7. Except as modified in this section, all provisions of sections 32.085 and 32.087
shall apply to the tax imposed pursuant to this section.
190.065. 1. For the purpose of purchasing any property or equipment necessary or
incidental to the operation of an ambulance service, the board of directors may borrow money
and issue bonds for the payment thereof in the manner provided herein. The question of the
loan shall be decided by the submission of the question ordered by the board of directors of
the district as provided in section 115.706.
2. The question shall be submitted [in substantially the following form:] as provided
in section 115.706.
[Shall the ______ ambulance district borrow money in the amount of ______ dollars
for the purpose of ______ and issue bonds for the payment thereof?]
3. If the constitutionally required percentage of the votes cast are for the loan, the
board shall, subject to the restrictions of subsection 4, be vested with the power to borrow
money in the name of the district, to the amount and for the purposes specified on the ballot,
and issue the bonds of the district for the payment thereof.
4. The loans authorized by this section shall not be contracted for a period longer than
twenty years, and the entire amount of the loan shall at no time exceed, including the existing
indebtedness of the district, in the aggregate, ten percent of the value of taxable tangible
property therein, as shown by the last completed assessment for state and county purposes,
the rate of interest to be agreed upon by the parties, but in no case to exceed the highest legal
rate allowed by contract; when effected, it shall be the duty of the directors to provide for the
collection of an annual tax sufficient to pay the interest on the indebtedness as it falls due, and

HCS HB 2925 62
also to constitute a sinking fund for the payment of the principal thereof within the time the
principal becomes due.
190.074. To levy and collect taxes as herein provided, the board shall fix a rate of
levy, not to exceed ten cents on the one hundred dollars valuation of the taxable tangible
property within the district as shown by the last completed assessment, the revenues from
which shall be deposited in a special fund and used only for the pension program of the
district, by submitting the [following] question to the voters at the municipal general, or a
state primary or general election in such district or at any election at which a member of the
board of directors is to be elected[:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the board of directors of ______ Ambulance District be authorized to levy an
annual tax rate of ______ cents per one hundred dollars valuation, the revenues from which
shall be deposited in a special fund and used only for the pension program of the district? ]

If a majority of the qualified voters casting votes thereon be in favor of the question, the board
of directors shall accordingly levy a tax in accordance with the provisions of this section, but
if a majority of the voters casting votes thereon do not vote in favor of the levy authorized by
this subsection, any levy previously authorized shall remain in effect.
190.296. 1. For the purpose of purchasing any property or equipment necessary or
incidental to the operation of central dispatching of emergency services, the board may
borrow money and issue bonds for the payment thereof in the manner provided herein. The
question of the loan shall be decided by the submission of the question to the eligible voters
of the county at the first municipal election held in a calendar year as provided in section
115.706.
2. The question shall be submitted [in substantially the following form:] as provided
in section 115.706.
[Shall the ______ emergency services board borrow money in the amount of ______
dollars for the purpose of ______ and issue bonds for the payment thereof?]
3. If the constitutionally required percentage of the votes cast are for the loan, the
board shall, subject to the restrictions of subsection 4 of this section, be vested with the power
to borrow money in the name of the board, to the amount and for the purposes specified on
the ballot, and issue the bonds of the board for the payment thereof.
4. The loans authorized by this section shall not be contracted for a period longer than
twenty years, and the entire amount of the loan shall at no time exceed, including the existing
indebtedness of the board, in the aggregate, ten percent of the value of taxable tangible
property therein, as shown by the last completed assessment for state and county purposes,
the rate of interest to be agreed upon by the parties, but in no case to exceed the highest legal
rate allowed by contract; when effected, it shall be the duty of the directors to direct a portion

HCS HB 2925 63
of the tax collected pursuant to section 190.292 in an amount sufficient to pay the interest on
the indebtedness as it falls due, and also to constitute a sinking fund for the payment of the
principal thereof within the time the principal becomes due.
5. This section shall only apply to any county of the third classification without a
township form of government and with more than twenty-four thousand five hundred but less
than twenty-four thousand six hundred inhabitants.
198.260. The question of whether or not a nursing home shall be organized shall be
submitted [in substantially the following form:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall there be organized in the counties of ______ , state of Missouri, a nursing home
district for the establishment and operation of a nursing home to be located within the
boundaries of the proposed district and having the power to impose a property tax not to
exceed the annual rate of thirty-five cents on the hundred dollars assessed valuation without
voter approval, and such additional tax as may be approved hereafter by vote thereon, to be
known as "______ Nursing Home District" as prayed for by petition filed with the county
clerk of ______ County, Missouri, on the ______ day of ______, 20______?]
198.263. Any district which has a lower tax levy than the maximum levy authorized
by section 198.250 may increase its levy up to, but not in excess of, such maximum levy if a
majority of the voters of the district who vote on the increase approve the increase. The ballot
of submission for a tax increase under this section shall be [in substantially the following
form:] submitted as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the ______ Nursing Home District be authorized to increase the
annual rate of property tax from ______ cents to ______ cents on the
hundred dollars assessed valuation?]
[ YES] [ NO]
[(Place an "X" in the square opposite the answer for which you wish to
vote.)]

If a majority of the qualified voters casting votes thereon are in favor of the increase, the
board of directors of the district shall levy the annual rate of tax approved; but if a majority of
the voters casting votes thereon are opposed to the increase, any annual tax rate in effect at the
time of the election shall remain in effect; provided, however, that if the voters of the district
have previously approved a levy and the levy has not been imposed, the board of directors
may impose such previously approved levy or portion thereof, subject to other provisions of
the law with respect to limitation on tax revenues.
198.310. 1. For the purpose of purchasing nursing home district sites, erecting
nursing homes and related facilities and furnishing the same, building additions to and
repairing old buildings, the board of directors may borrow money and issue bonds for the

HCS HB 2925 64
payment thereof in the manner provided herein. The question of the loan shall be submitted
by an order of the board of directors of the district as provided in section 115.706. Notice of
the submission of the question, the amount and the purpose of the loan shall be given as
provided in section 198.250.
2. The question shall be submitted [in substantially the following form:] as provided
in section 115.706.
[Shall the ______ Nursing Home District borrow money in the amount of ______
dollars for the purpose of ______ and issue bonds in payment thereof?]
3. If the constitutionally required percentage of the votes cast are for the loan, the
board shall, subject to the restrictions of subsection 4, be vested with the power to borrow
money in the name of the district, to the amount and for the purposes specified on the ballot,
and issue the bonds of the district for the payment thereof.
4. The loans authorized by this section shall not be contracted for a period longer than
twenty years, and the entire amount of the loan shall at no time exceed, including the existing
indebtedness of the district, in the aggregate, ten percent of the value of taxable tangible
property therein, as shown by the last completed assessment for state and county purposes,
the rate of interest to be agreed upon by the parties, but in no case to exceed the highest legal
rate allowed by contract; when effected, it shall be the duty of the directors to provide for the
collection of an annual tax sufficient to pay the interest on the indebtedness as it falls due, and
also to constitute a sinking fund for the payment of the principal thereof within the time the
principal becomes due.
204.250. 1. If the construction and maintenance of a common system of trunk sewers
and sewage treatment plants is necessary to secure proper sanitary conditions for the
preservation of public health in a natural drainage area the major portion of which lies within
a county of the first class containing all or part of a city having a population of four hundred
fifty thousand or more, or in a county of the first class not having a charter form of
government, or in a county of the second, third or fourth class, and which natural drainage
area contains all or portions of several drainage basins, several municipalities or sewer
districts, and if a common sewer district encompassing the entire area would be eligible for
federal aid and assistance under the provisions of Title 33, Section 1151 et seq. of the United
States Code Annotated, as now or as may hereafter be amended, the area may be established
and incorporated as a common sewer district under sections 204.250 to 204.470 in the
following manner: The county commission, or in charter counties, the county executive with
the concurrence by resolution of the county legislature, of the county within which the major
portion of the area lies may petition the circuit court having jurisdiction over the major
portion for the appointment of commissioners as herein provided, and to take further action as
may be necessary for the submission to the legal voters residing in the area of the question

HCS HB 2925 65
whether the area shall be organized and incorporated as a common sewer district under
sections 204.250 to 204.470.
2. The petition shall set forth a description in general terms of the territory to be
embraced in, suggest a name for the proposed common sewer district and state the aim and
purposes for which the district is created.
3. Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, if a sanitary sewage
disposal or treatment system is necessary for any number of buildings used solely or primarily
for residential or commercial purposes which are situated in such geographical proximity and
manner to one another that the creation of a sewage disposal or treatment system is feasible,
and such buildings are situated in or are in geographical proximity to an existing common
sewer district formed pursuant to this chapter, and if sanitary sewage disposal or treatment
services are not otherwise available for service to such buildings, regardless of whether the
buildings lie in a natural drainage area or natural drainage basin, such area may be established
as a common sewer subdistrict of an existing common sewer district formed pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter by complying with the procedures set forth in subsections 4 to 7 of
this section.
4. The circuit court of the circuit proposing to create a sewer subdistrict pursuant to
subsection 3 of this section may, by order of the court, for good cause shown, submit the
question of creating such subdistrict to all owners of record of all real property within such
proposed subdistrict at a general or special election called for that purpose as provided in
section 115.706. Such order shall set forth the project name for the proposed subdistrict, the
general nature of the proposed subdistrict, the estimated cost of the sewer improvements for
such subdistrict, the boundaries of the proposed subdistrict to be assessed for sewer
improvements, [and] the proposed method or methods of assessment, and other information
as provided in section 115.706. The court may thereafter create a sewer subdistrict of an
existing common sewer district formed pursuant to this chapter when the question of creating
such subdistrict has been approved by the vote of the percentage of electors within such
subdistrict voting thereon that is equal to the percentage of voter approval required for the
issuance of general obligation bonds of the city or county wherein such subdistrict is located
under Article VI, Section 26 of the Constitution of this State. The notice of election
containing the question of creating a sewer subdistrict shall contain the project name for the
proposed subdistrict, the general nature of the proposed subdistrict, the estimated cost of the
sewer improvements for such subdistrict, the boundaries of the proposed subdistrict to be
assessed for sewer improvements, the proposed method or methods of assessment, [and] a
statement that the final cost of such sewer improvements assessed against property within the
subdistrict and the amount of general obligation bonds issued therefor shall not exceed the
estimated cost of such sewer improvements, as stated in such notice, by more than twenty-

HCS HB 2925 66
five percent, and other information as provided in section 115.706. The ballot upon which
the question of creating a sewer subdistrict is submitted to the qualified voters residing within
the proposed subdistrict shall contain a question [in substantially the following form:] as
provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the ______ Circuit Court be authorized to create a sewer subdistrict proposed
for the ______ (common sewer district name) and authorize the common sewer district to
incur indebtedness and issue general obligation bonds to pay for all or part of the cost of the
creation and maintenance of such subdistrict, the cost of all indebtedness so incurred to be
assessed by the ______ (common sewer district name) on the property within the subdistrict?]
5. As an alternative to the procedure described in subsection 4 of this section, the
circuit court of the circuit may create such a sewer subdistrict when a proper petition has been
signed by the owners of record of at least two-thirds by area of all real property located within
such proposed subdistrict. The petition, in order to become effective, shall be filed with the
circuit court. A proper petition for the creation of a sewer subdistrict shall set forth the
proposed subdistrict name, the general nature of the proposed subdistrict, the estimated cost
of the sewer improvements for such subdistrict, the boundaries of the proposed subdistrict to
be assessed for sewer improvements, the proposed method or methods of assessment, a notice
that the names of the signers may not be withdrawn later than seven days after the petition is
filed with the court, and a notice that the final cost of such assessments against property
within the subdistrict and the amount of general obligation bonds issued therefor shall not
exceed the estimated cost of sewer improvements, as stated in such petition, by more than
twenty-five percent.
6. Upon receiving the requisite voter approval at an election or upon the filing of a
proper petition with the court, the court may by order determine the advisability of the
subdistrict and may order that the subdistrict be established and that preliminary plans and
specifications for the subdistrict be made. Such order shall state and make findings as to the
subdistrict name, the nature of the subdistrict, the estimated cost of the sewer improvements
for such subdistrict, the boundaries of the subdistrict to be assessed for sewer improvements,
the proposed method or methods of assessment, and shall also state that the final cost of such
assessments against the property within the subdistrict and the amount of general obligation
bonds issued therefor shall not, without a new election or petition, exceed the estimated cost
of such sewer improvements by more than twenty-five percent.
7. The boundaries of the proposed subdistrict shall be described by metes and bounds,
streets or other sufficiently specific description. The area of the subdistrict finally determined
to be assessed may be less than, but shall not exceed, the total area comprising such district.
205.563. 1. The governing body of any city of the fourth classification with more
than two hundred but fewer than three hundred inhabitants and located in any county of the

HCS HB 2925 67
second classification with more than forty-eight thousand two hundred but fewer than forty-
eight thousand three hundred inhabitants may impose, by order or ordinance, an annual real
property tax to fund the construction, operation, and maintenance of a community health
center. The tax authorized in this section shall not exceed thirty-five cents per year on each
one hundred dollars of assessed valuation on all taxable real property within the city. Any
such city may enter into an agreement or agreements with taxing jurisdictions located at least
partially within the incorporated limits of such city to levy the tax authorized under this
section upon real property located within the jurisdiction of such district, but outside the
incorporated limits of such city, provided that any taxing jurisdiction desiring to levy such tax
shall first receive voter approval of such measure in the manner and form contained in this
section and section 115.706. The tax authorized in this section shall be in addition to all
other property taxes imposed by law, and shall be stated separately from all other charges and
taxes.
2. No order or ordinance adopted under this section shall become effective unless the
governing body of the city submits to the voters residing within such city at a state general,
primary, or special election a proposal to authorize the city to impose a tax under this section
as provided in section 115.706.
3. The question shall be submitted [in substantially the following form:] as provided
in section 115.706.
[Shall the city of ______ and ______ district (if applicable) be
authorized to impose a tax on owners of real property in an amount
equal to ______ (insert amount not to exceed thirty-five cents) per one
hundred dollars assessed valuation for the purpose of constructing,
operating, and maintaining a community health center?]
[ YES] [ NO]
[If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".]

If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the question, then the tax shall become effective in the tax year immediately
following its approval. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters
voting thereon are opposed to the question, then the tax shall not become effective unless and
until the question is resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters and such question is
approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting on the question.
4. The tax authorized under this section shall be levied and collected in the same
manner as other real property taxes are levied and collected within the city.

HCS HB 2925 68
5. The governing body of any city that has imposed a real property tax under this
section may submit the question of repeal of the tax to the voters on any date available for
elections for the city. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters
voting thereon are in favor of repeal, that repeal shall become effective on the first day of the
tax year immediately following its approval. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by
the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the repeal, then the tax shall remain
effective until the question is resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters and the
repeal is approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting on the question.
6. Whenever the governing body of any city that has imposed a real property tax
under this section receives a petition, signed by a number of registered voters of the city equal
to at least two percent of the number of registered voters of the city voting in the last
gubernatorial election, calling for an election to repeal the tax, the governing body shall
submit to the voters of such city a proposal to repeal the tax. If a majority of the votes cast on
the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in favor of the repeal, the repeal shall
become effective on the first day of the tax year immediately following its approval. If a
majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed
to the repeal, then the tax shall remain effective until the question is resubmitted under this
section to the qualified voters and the repeal is approved by a majority of the qualified voters
voting on the question.
7. If the real property tax authorized under this section is repealed or terminated by
any means, all funds collected under the tax shall continue to be used solely for the designated
purposes.
205.979. 1. The board of trustees may request that the governing body of the county
or counties request the election officials of any county or city not within a county containing
all or part of such service area to submit to the qualified voters of such county, or city not
within a county, at a general, primary, or special election as provided in section 115.706, the
proposition contained in subsection 3 of this section. Such election officials shall give legal
notice at least sixty days prior to such general, primary, or special election in at least two
newspapers that such proposition shall be submitted at any general, primary, or special
election held for submission of the proposal as provided in section 115.706. A request by
the board of trustees for a proposition to be submitted to the voters as set out in this section
shall be considered a request of the county, or city not within a county, for purposes of section
115.063.
2. The tax may not be levied to exceed forty cents per each one hundred dollars
assessed valuation therefor.
3. The ballot to be used for voting on the proposition shall be [substantially in the
following form:] submitted as provided in section 115.706.

HCS HB 2925 69
[OFFICIAL BALLOT]
[(Check the one for which you wish to vote.) ]
[Shall (name of county) establish a community mental health fund to
establish, improve (and) (or) maintain a community mental health
service, and for which the (county) shall levy a tax of (insert exact
amount to be voted upon) cents per each one hundred dollars assessed
valuation therefor?]
[ YES] [ NO]
4. The election shall be conducted and the vote canvassed in the same manner as
other county elections.
206.070. The question shall be submitted [in substantially the following form:] as
provided in section 115.706.
[Shall there be organized in the counties of ______, state of Missouri, a hospital
district for the establishment and operation of a hospital to be located at ______ in ______
County, Missouri, and having the power to impose a property tax not to exceed the annual rate
of fifty cents on the hundred dollars assessed valuation without voter approval, and such
additional tax as may be approved hereafter by vote thereon to be known as "______ Hospital
District", as prayed for by petition filed with the county clerk of ______ County, Missouri, on
the ______ day of ______, 20______?]
206.120. 1. For the purpose of purchasing hospital sites, erecting hospitals and
related facilities and furnishing the same, building additions to and repairing old buildings,
the board of directors may borrow money and issue bonds for the payment thereof in the
manner provided herein. The question of the loan shall be submitted to the voters by an order
of the board of directors of the district.
2. The question shall be submitted [in substantially the following form:] as provided
in section 115.706.
[Shall the ______ hospital district borrow money in the amount of ______ dollars for
the purpose of ______ and issue bonds in payment thereof?]
3. If the then constitutionally required majority of the votes cast are for the loan, the
board shall, subject to the restrictions of subsection 5, be vested with the power to borrow
money in the name of the district, to the amount and for the purposes specified on the ballot,
and issue the bonds of the district for the payment thereof.
4. If less than the required majority of the votes cast are for the first loan submitted to
the voters following the organization of the district, a second question for authority to borrow
money may be submitted and if unsuccessful a third question may be submitted. If each of
the first three questions submitted to the voters for authority to borrow money for the

HCS HB 2925 70
purposes of this section is defeated, or if no successful submission for such purpose is
conducted within five years after the establishment of the district, then the district shall be
immediately dissolved by order of the county commission establishing it, and any funds
remaining on hand and belonging to the district shall forthwith be paid pro rata to those
taxpayers from whom they were collected; provided that in any district wherein a hospital is
in operation without having voted bonds, the provisions of this section as relating to
dissolution shall not apply.
5. The loans authorized by this section shall not be contracted for a period longer than
twenty years, and the entire amount of the loan shall at no time exceed, including the existing
indebtedness of the district, in the aggregate, ten percent of the value of taxable tangible
property therein, as shown by the last completed assessment for state and county purposes,
the rate of interest to be agreed upon by the parties, but in no case to exceed the highest legal
rate allowed by contract. When effected, it shall be the duty of the directors to provide for the
collection of an annual tax sufficient to pay the interest on the indebtedness as it falls due, and
also to constitute a sinking fund for the payment of the principal thereof within the time the
principal becomes due.
210.860. 1. The governing body of any county or city not within a county may, after
voter approval pursuant to this section, levy a tax not to exceed twenty-five cents on each one
hundred dollars of assessed valuation on taxable property in the county for the purpose of
providing counseling, family support, and temporary residential services to persons eighteen
years of age or less and those services described in section 210.861. The question shall be
submitted to the qualified voters of the county or city not within a county at a county or state
general, primary or special election as provided in section 115.706 upon the motion of the
governing body of the county or city not within a county or upon the petition of eight percent
of the qualified voters of the county determined on the basis of the number of votes cast for
governor in such county or city not within a county at the last gubernatorial election held prior
to the filing of the petition. The election officials of the county or city not within a county
shall give legal notice as provided in chapter 115. The question shall be submitted [in
substantially the following form:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall ______ County (City) be authorized to levy a tax of ______
cents on each one hundred dollars of assessed valuation on taxable
property in the county (city) for the purpose of establishing a
community children's services fund for purposes of providing funds for
counseling and related services to children and youth in the county
(city) eighteen years of age or less and services which will promote
healthy lifestyles among children and youth and strengthen families?]
[ YES] [ NO]

HCS HB 2925 71

If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the question, then the tax shall be levied and collected as otherwise provided by law.
If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are
opposed to the question, then the tax shall not be levied unless and until the question is again
submitted to the qualified voters of the county or city not within a county and a majority of
such voters are in favor of such a tax, and not otherwise.
2. All revenues generated by the tax prescribed in this section shall be deposited in
the county treasury or, in a city not within a county, to the board established by law to
administer such fund to the credit of a special "Community Children's Services Fund" to
accomplish the purposes set out herein and shall be used for no other purpose. Such fund
shall be administered by and expended only upon approval by a board of directors,
established pursuant to section 210.861.
233.172. 1. In any county of the first classification without a charter form of
government having a population of at least one hundred fifty thousand and either containing a
portion of a city with a population of at least three hundred fifty thousand or bordering a city
not within a county, the county commission may, by resolution, submit the question of
creating a road benefit district pursuant to sections 233.170 to 233.316, encompassing the
unincorporated areas of such county to all of the qualified voters residing within such district
at a general or special election called for that purpose as provided in section 115.706. Such
resolution shall set forth the name of the proposed road benefit district, its boundaries and a
proposed road and bridge benefit district tax levy in an amount not to exceed twenty cents per
one hundred dollars assessed valuation. The ballot upon which the question of creating a road
benefit district is submitted to the qualified voters residing within the proposed district shall
contain a question [in substantially the following form:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the ______ County, be authorized to create a road benefit district within the
following boundaries, to-wit: ______ (set forth boundaries of proposed road benefit district)
and assess a levy not to exceed ______ cents per one hundred dollars assessed valuation upon
all property within the boundaries of said road benefit district the proceeds of which levy shall
be placed in a "road benefit district fund" and used solely for the improvement, maintenance,
construction and repair of roads and bridges within the boundaries of the road benefit
district?]
2. If the ballot question is approved by a majority of the qualified voters residing
within the boundaries of the proposed district, the governing body of the county shall be
authorized to assess and collect a levy in an amount not to exceed the amount specified on the
ballot, in which event the sums so collected shall be placed in a separate "road district benefit

HCS HB 2925 72
fund" and used only for the purposes specified on the ballot within the boundaries of the road
benefit district.
3. Notwithstanding section 233.170, to the contrary, a district established pursuant to
this section may contain less than six hundred forty acres and may contain territories that are
not contiguous.
233.200. 1. The commissioners of such districts so incorporated shall have power to
issue road and bridge bonds for and on behalf of their respective districts, payable out of
funds derived from taxation of all property taxable therein to an amount including existing
indebtedness payable out of funds so derived not exceeding five percent of the assessed
valuation of such property to be ascertained by the assessment next before the last assessment
for state and county purposes. Such bonds to be issued in denominations of one hundred
dollars, or some multiple thereof, to bear interest at not exceeding the rate per annum
permitted by law, and to become due in not exceeding twenty years after the date of such
bonds. Whenever the board of commissioners of any such road district propose to issue such
bonds, they shall submit the question to the voters in the district as provided in section
115.706.
2. The notice of election shall state the amount of bonds to be issued.
3. The result of the submission of the question shall be entered upon the records of the
district. If it shall appear that the constitutionally required percentage of the voters voting on
the question shall have voted in favor of the issue of the bonds, the commissioners shall order
and direct the execution of the bonds for and on behalf of such district and provide for the
levy and collection of a direct annual tax upon all the taxable property in the district sufficient
to provide for the payment of the principal and interest of the bonds so authorized as they
respectively become due.
4. The question shall be submitted [in substantially the following form:] as provided
in section 115.706.
[Shall the ______ special road district of ______ County issue road and bridge bonds
in the amount of ______ dollars?]
5. The board of commissioners shall not sell the bonds for less than ninety-five
percent of the par value thereof, and the proceeds shall be paid over to the county treasurer,
and disbursed on warrants drawn by the president or vice president of the board of
commissioners and attested by the secretary. The proceeds of the sale of such bonds shall be
used for the purpose only of paying the cost of holding such election, and constructing,
repairing and maintaining bridges and culverts within the district, and working, repairing,
maintaining and dragging public roads within the district.
233.345. 1. The special road district commissioners of districts so incorporated shall
have power to issue road and bridge bonds for and on behalf of their respective districts,

HCS HB 2925 73
payable out of funds derived from taxation of all property taxable therein, to an amount,
including existing indebtedness payable out of funds so derived not exceeding five percent of
the assessed valuation of such property to be ascertained by the assessment next before the
last assessment for state and county purposes. Such bonds to be issued in denominations of
one hundred dollars or some multiple thereof, to bear interest at not exceeding the rate per
annum permitted by law, and to become due in not exceeding twenty years after the date of
such bonds.
2. Whenever the board of special road district commissioners of such road district
propose to issue such bonds, they shall order the question to be submitted to the voters of the
district as provided in section 115.706. The notice of election shall state the amount of
bonds to be issued.
3. The result of the submission of the question shall be entered upon the records of the
district. If it shall appear that the constitutionally required percentage of the voters voting on
the question shall have voted in favor of the issue of the bonds, the commissioners shall order
and direct the execution of the bonds for and on behalf of such district and provide for the
levy and collection of a direct annual tax upon all the taxable property in the district sufficient
to provide for the payment of the principal and interest of the bonds so authorized as they
respectively become due.
4. The question shall be submitted [in substantially the following form:] as provided
in section 115.706.
[Shall the ______ special road district of ______ County issue bonds in the amount of
______ dollars?]
5. The board of special road district commissioners shall not sell the bonds for less
then ninety-five percent of the par value thereof and the proceeds shall be paid over to the
treasurer of the special road district and disbursed on warrants drawn by the president or vice
president of the board of commissioners and attested by the secretary. The proceeds of the
sale of such bonds shall be used for the purpose only of paying the cost of holding such
election, and constructing, repairing and maintaining bridges and culverts within the district,
and working, repairing, maintaining and dragging public roads within the district.
233.455. 1. Whenever the board of commissioners of any special road district
proposes to issue bonds for road purposes, they shall order the submission of the question to
the voters and whenever twenty voters of any township shall file with the clerk of the county
commission wherein the township is located a petition in writing asking that bonds for road
purposes be issued for and on behalf of such township, it shall be the duty of the county
commission to order the submission of the question to the voters as provided in section
115.706.
2. The notice of election, in either case, shall state the amount of bonds to be issued.

HCS HB 2925 74
3. The result of the submission of the question shall be entered upon the records of
such county commission or the board of commissioners. If it shall appear that two-thirds of
the voters voting on said question shall have voted in favor of the issuance of said bonds, the
board of commissioners of the special road district, or the county commission, as the case
may be, shall order and direct the execution of the bonds for and on behalf of such special
road district or township, and shall provide for the levy and collection of a direct annual tax
upon all the taxable property in said district or township sufficient to provide for the payment
of the principal and interest of the bonds so authorized as they respectively become due.
4. It shall be the duty of the clerk of the board of commissioners on or before the first
day of May in each year, or the state auditor immediately thereafter, in case the clerk of the
board of commissioners should fail or neglect, on or before the first day of May of each year,
so to do, to certify to the county commission of the county, or counties, wherein such road
district is situated, the amount of money that will be required during the next succeeding year
to pay interest falling due on bonds issued and the principal of bonds maturing during such
year.
5. On receipt of such certificate it shall be the duty of the county commission, or
commissions, at the time it makes the levy for state, county, school and other taxes, to, by
order made, levy such a rate of taxation upon the taxable property in the road district, in such
county or counties, as will raise the sum of money required for the purposes aforesaid. On
such order being made it shall be the duty of the clerk of the county commission, or
commissions, to extend such rate of taxation upon the tax books, against all of the taxable
property in the district in such county or counties, and the same shall be collected by the
collector of the revenue at the time and in the manner, and by the same means as state, county,
school and other taxes are collected.
6. At the time the county commission is required to determine and levy the rate of
taxation for state, county, school and other taxes, to determine, order and levy such a rate of
taxation upon the taxable property in any township in such county as may have outstanding
bonds issued under this section as will be sufficient to pay interest and principal falling due
during the next succeeding year. It shall be the duty of the clerk of the county commission to
extend upon the tax books of the county such rate of taxation upon and against all of the
taxable property in such township, and when so extended the same shall be collected by the
collector of the revenue at the time, in the manner, and by the means that state, county, school
and other taxes are collected.
7. All the laws, rights and remedies of the state of Missouri for the collection of state,
county, school and other taxes, shall be applicable to the collection of taxes herein authorized
to be collected.

HCS HB 2925 75
233.460. The question shall be submitted [in substantially the following form:] as
provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the ______ special road district of ______ (Name district or township) of _____
_ county issue road bonds in the amount of ______ dollars?]
233.510. 1. The commissioners of any special road subdistrict may levy, if four-
sevenths of the voters of the subdistrict voting thereon approve, a tax on all taxable property
in the subdistrict, the proceeds of which to be used for the support of the subdistrict, including
the payment of bonds issued under section 233.513. The proposition to levy the tax
authorized by this section may be submitted by the commissioners at the next annual election
of the members of the commission or at any regularly scheduled primary or general election
or at a special election called for the purpose as provided in section 115.706. A separate
ballot containing the question shall [read as follows:] be submitted as provided in section
115.706.
[Shall the commissioners of the ______ Special Road Subdistrict be
authorized to levy a tax of ______ cents on the one hundred dollars
assessed valuation to provide funds for the support of the subdistrict?]
[FOR THE PROPOSITION]
[AGAINST THE PROPOSITION]
[(Place an X in the square opposite the one for which you wish to
vote.)]

If four-sevenths of the qualified voters casting votes thereon be in favor of the question, the
commissioners shall levy a tax in accordance with the provisions of this section, but if four-
sevenths of the voters casting votes thereon do not vote in favor of the levy authorized by this
section, no such tax shall be levied.
2. Any tax authorized pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be levied and
collected as provided by law for the levy and collection of taxes for special road districts.
Taxes authorized pursuant to this section shall be deposited with the county treasurer, who
shall disburse the moneys only to the president or vice president of the subdistrict upon
warrants signed by such officer and attested by the secretary of the subdistrict.
235.175. 1. Before the board of directors of any street light maintenance district may
increase the district's current tax levy, the proposed increase must be approved by a majority
of the voters voting thereon.
2. The proposition to increase the tax levy may be submitted by the board of directors
or upon petition of five hundred registered voters of the district. All propositions to increase
the tax levy shall be submitted at the next election permitted by section 115.123 and as
provided in section 115.706.

HCS HB 2925 76
3. A separate ballot containing the question shall [read as follows:] be submitted as
provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the board of directors of the ______ street light maintenance
district be authorized to increase the current tax levy of ______ cents
per one hundred dollars assessed valuation to ______ cents per one
hundred dollars assessed valuation to provide funds for the support of
the district?]
[ YES] [ NO]
[(If you are in favor of the tax levy, place an X in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the tax levy, place an X in the box
opposite "NO".)]
4. If a majority of the qualified voters casting votes thereon be in favor of the
increased tax levy, the board of directors shall raise the tax levy to the level approved by the
voters. If a majority of the voters casting votes thereon do not vote in favor of the increased
tax levy, any levy previously authorized shall remain in effect.
5. No street light maintenance district shall fix a rate of levy which exceeds the
maximum tax levy authorized by section 235.170.
238.232. 1. If approved by at least four-sevenths of the qualified voters voting on the
question in the district, the district may impose a property tax in an amount not to exceed the
annual rate of ten cents on the hundred dollars assessed valuation. The district board may
levy a property tax rate lower than its approved tax rate ceiling and may increase that lowered
tax rate to a level not exceeding the tax rate ceiling without voter approval. The property tax
shall be uniform throughout the district.
2. The ballot of submission shall be [substantially in the following form:] submitted
as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the ______ Transportation Development District impose a
property tax upon all real and tangible personal property within
the district at a rate of not more than ______ (insert amount)
cents per hundred dollars assessed valuation for the purpose of
providing revenue for the development of a project (or projects)
in the district (insert general description of the project or
projects, if necessary)?]
[ YES ] [ NO ]
[If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an
"X" in the box opposite "NO".]

HCS HB 2925 77
3. The county collector of each county in which the district is partially or entirely
located shall collect the property taxes and special benefit assessments made upon all real
property and tangible personal property within that county and the district, in the same
manner as other property taxes are collected.
4. Every county collector having collected or received district property taxes shall, on
or before the fifteenth day of each month and after deducting his commissions, remit to the
treasurer of that district the amount collected or received by him prior to the first day of the
month. Upon receipt of such money, the district treasurer shall execute a receipt therefor,
which he shall forward or deliver to the collector. The district treasurer shall deposit such
sums into the district treasury, credited to the appropriate project or purpose. The collector
and district treasurer shall make final settlement of the district account and commissions
owing, not less than once each year, if necessary.
5. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, all property owned by an
entity that is exempt from taxation under 26 U.S.C. Section 501(c), as amended, shall be
exempt from any special assessment levied by a district under this section so long as the
property is used in furtherance of the entity's tax exempt purposes.
247.470. 1. On or before the first day of May of each year, the board shall certify to
the county commission of the county within which the district is located a rate of levy so
fixed by the board as provided by law, with directions that at the time and in the manner
required by law for levy of taxes for county purposes such county commission shall levy a tax
at the rate so fixed and determined upon the assessed valuation of all the taxable tangible
property within the district, in addition to such other taxes as may be levied by such county
commission.
2. If the board thereafter in any year fixes and determines by resolution of the board a
rate of levy in excess of fifteen cents per one hundred dollars valuation or of the rate approved
by a vote of the majority of the voters of the district voting thereon, as provided herein for
general purposes, then the board shall order the submission of the question of levying a tax
rate in such increased amount to the voters of the district in the same manner so far as
practicable as is provided for the submission of the question to create a bonded indebtedness.
Such resolution of the board shall also fix the date upon which the election is to be held as
provided in section 115.706.
3. The question shall be submitted [in substantially the following form:] as provided
in section 115.706.
[Shall the ______ metropolitan water supply district be authorized to levy an annual
rate of taxation not exceeding ______ cents per one hundred dollars assessed valuation for
general operating purposes?]

HCS HB 2925 78
249.110. The board of trustees shall have no power to levy or collect any taxes for the
payment of any indebtedness incurred by said district unless and until the voters of the district
shall have authorized the incurring of indebtedness at an election as provided in section
115.706, but all such expenses and indebtedness incurred by said district may be paid out of
funds which may be received by said district from the sale of bonds authorized by the voters
at any such election as provided in section 115.706.
249.929. 1. To establish a sewage or storm water facility improvement district, the
governing body of any city with a population of three hundred fifty thousand or more
inhabitants which is located in more than one county, or the governing body of any county of
the first classification without a charter form of government that has a population of at least
one hundred sixty thousand inhabitants, or the governing body of any county of the first
classification without a charter form of government containing a portion of a city with a
population of at least three hundred fifty thousand inhabitants, or the governing body of any
county of the first classification without a charter form of government as of August 28, 1995,
that has a population of more than one hundred five thousand but less than one hundred
twenty thousand inhabitants, shall comply with the procedures described in subsection 2 of
this section.
2. The governing body of any city with a population of three hundred fifty thousand
or more inhabitants which is located in more than one county, or the governing body of any
county of the first classification without a charter form of government that has a population of
at least one hundred sixty thousand inhabitants, or the governing body of any county of the
first classification without a charter form of government containing a portion of a city with a
population of at least three hundred fifty thousand inhabitants, or the governing body of any
county of the first classification without a charter form of government as of August 28, 1995,
that has a population of more than one hundred five thousand but less than one hundred
twenty thousand inhabitants, proposing to create a sewage or storm water facility
improvement district may, by resolution, submit the question of creating such district to all
qualified voters residing within such district at a general or special election called for that
purpose as provided in section 115.706. Such resolution shall set forth the project name for
the proposed sewage or storm water facility improvement, the general nature of the proposed
improvement, the estimated cost of such improvement, the boundaries of the proposed
sewage or storm water facility improvement district to be assessed, and the proposed method
or methods of assessment, including any provision for the annual assessment of maintenance
costs of the improvement in each year after the bonds issued for the original sewage or storm
water facility improvement are paid in full. The governing body of the city or county may
create a sewage or storm water facility improvement district when the question of creating
such district has been approved by the vote of the percentage of electors within such district

HCS HB 2925 79
voting thereon that is equal to the percentage of voter approval required for the issuance of
general obligation bonds of such county under Article VI, Section 26 of the Constitution of
this State. The notice of election containing the question of creating a sewage or storm water
facility improvement district shall contain the project name for the proposed improvement,
the general nature of the proposed improvement, the estimated cost of such improvement, the
boundaries of the proposed sewage or storm water facility improvement district to be
assessed, the proposed method or methods of assessment, including any provision for the
annual assessment of maintenance costs of the improvement in each year after the bonds
issued for the original improvement are paid in full, and a statement that the final cost of such
improvement assessed against property within the district and the amount of general
obligation bonds issued therefor shall not exceed the estimated cost of such improvement, as
stated in such notice, by more than twenty-five percent. The question of whether to create
any sewage water facility improvement district or storm water facility improvement district,
the boundaries of which are not identical to any existing or proposed storm water facility
improvement district or any existing or proposed sewage water facility improvement district,
shall be submitted to the voters as a separate question as provided in section 115.706;
however, the question of whether to create a sewage water facility improvement district and a
storm water facility improvement district, the boundaries of which are identical, may be
submitted as a single question as provided in section 115.706. The ballot upon which the
question of creating a sewage or storm water facility improvement district is submitted to the
qualified voters residing within the proposed district shall contain a question [in substantially
the following form:] submitted as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall ______ (name of city or county) be authorized to create a
sewage or storm water facility improvement district proposed for the _
_____ (project name for the proposed improvement) and incur
indebtedness and issue general obligation bonds to pay for all or part of
the cost of sewage or storm water facility improvements within such
district, the cost of all indebtedness so incurred to be assessed by the
governing body of the ______ (city or county) on the property
benefitted by such improvements for a period of ______ years, and, if
included in the resolution, an assessment in each year thereafter with
the proceeds thereof used solely for maintenance of the sewage or
storm water facility improvement?]
[ YES] [ NO]
3. Upon receiving the requisite voter approval at an election, the governing body of
any city with a population of three hundred fifty thousand or more inhabitants which is
located in more than one county, or the governing body of a county of the first classification

HCS HB 2925 80
without a charter form of government that has a population of at least one hundred sixty
thousand inhabitants, or the governing body of any county of the first classification without a
charter form of government containing a portion of a city with a population of at least three
hundred fifty thousand inhabitants, or the governing body of any county of the first
classification without a charter form of government as of August 28, 1995, that has a
population of more than one hundred five thousand but less than one hundred twenty
thousand inhabitants, may, by resolution, determine the advisability of the improvement and
may order that the sewage or storm water facility improvement district be established and that
preliminary plans and specifications for the improvement be made. Such resolution shall
state and make findings as to the project name for the proposed improvement, the nature of
the improvement, the estimated cost of such improvement, the boundaries of the sewage or
storm water facility improvement district to be assessed, the proposed method or methods of
assessment, including any provision for the annual assessment of maintenance costs of the
improvement in each year after the bonds issued for the original improvement are paid in full,
and shall also state that the final cost of such improvement assessed against the property
within the sewage or storm water facility improvement district and the amount of general
obligation bonds issued therefor shall not, without a new election, exceed the estimated cost
of such improvement by more than twenty-five percent.
249.1106. 1. The ballot upon which the question of creating a consolidated sewer
district is submitted to the qualified voters residing within each existing sewer district or
districts shall contain a question [in substantially the following form:] submitted as provided
in section 115.706.
[Shall the ______ (governing body's name) of ______ (county's name)
be authorized to dissolve the existing ______ (name of existing sewer
district) and create a consolidated sewer district proposed for the _____
_ (name of existing sewer districts to be consolidated) and authorize
the consolidated sewer districts to incur indebtedness and issue general
obligation bonds to pay for all or part of the cost of the creation and
maintenance of such consolidated sewer district, with the cost of all
indebtedness so incurred to be assessed by the ______ (name of
consolidated sewer district) on the property within the consolidated
sewer district?]
[ YES] [ NO]
[If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".]


HCS HB 2925 81
If a majority of the total votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters of each existing
district or districts voting thereon are in favor of the proposal, then the order shall become
effective. If the proposal receives less than the required majority in at least one existing
district, then the governing body of the county shall have no power to impose the
consolidation of sewer districts as authorized pursuant to this section unless and until the
governing body of the county shall again have submitted another proposal to authorize the
governing body of the county to consolidate authorized by this section and such proposal is
approved by the required majority of the total votes cast on the proposal by the qualified
voters of each existing district or districts voting on such proposal.
2. The boundaries of the proposed consolidated sewer district shall be described by
metes and bounds, streets or other sufficiently specific description.
3. There shall be separate submissions of the question of creating a consolidated
sewer district to each group of voters within each existing sewer district or districts, and the
elections shall be held simultaneously.
249.1150. 1. There is hereby created within any county of the third classification
without a township form of government and with more than thirty-four thousand but less than
thirty-four thousand one hundred inhabitants, any county of the second classification without
a township form of government and with more than fifty-four thousand two hundred but less
than fifty-four thousand three hundred inhabitants, any county of the third classification
without a township form of government and with more than thirteen thousand seventy-five
but less than thirteen thousand one hundred seventy-five inhabitants, any county of the first
classification with more than two hundred forty thousand three hundred but less than two
hundred forty thousand four hundred inhabitants, any county of the third classification
without a township form of government and with more than nine thousand four hundred fifty
but less than nine thousand five hundred fifty inhabitants, any county of the third
classification without a township form of government and with more than twenty-eight
thousand six hundred but less than twenty-eight thousand seven hundred inhabitants, any
county of the first classification with more than thirty-nine thousand seven hundred but less
than thirty-nine thousand eight hundred inhabitants, any county of the third classification
without a township form of government and with more than thirty-one thousand but less than
thirty-one thousand one hundred inhabitants, and any county of the third classification
without a township form of government and with more than seventeen thousand nine hundred
but less than eighteen thousand inhabitants, the "Upper White River Basin Watershed
Improvement District". The watershed improvement district is authorized to own, install,
operate, and maintain decentralized or individual on-site wastewater treatment plants. The
watershed improvement district created under this section shall be a body corporate and a
political subdivision of the state of Missouri, shall be capable of suing and being sued in

HCS HB 2925 82
contract in its corporate name, and shall be capable of holding such real and personal property
necessary for corporate purposes. The district shall implement procedures to regulate the area
within the district and to educate property owners within the district about the requirements
imposed by the district.
2. Any county included in the Upper White River Basin watershed improvement
district, as established in subsection 1 of this section, may choose to opt out of the district in
one of two ways:
(1) Upon the filing of a petition signed by at least twenty percent of the property
owners residing within the county, a proposal is submitted to the qualified voters within the
district boundaries. The ballot of submission shall be in substantially the following form:
Shall the county of ______ opt out of the Upper White River Basin
Watershed Improvement District?
YES NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".

If a simple majority of the votes cast in the county favors the proposal to opt out of the
district, then the county shall no longer be included in the Upper White River Basin
watershed improvement district, and shall cease all imposition, collection, and assessment of
any taxes associated with that district, beginning on the first day of the first month following
the election. If a simple majority of the votes cast in the county opposes the proposal to opt
out of the district, then the county shall remain a part of the Upper White River Basin
watershed improvement district. However, if a proposal to opt out of the district is not
approved, the governing body of the county shall not resubmit a proposal to the voters under
this section sooner than twelve months from the date of the last proposal submitted under this
section; or
(2) Upon the issuance of an order by the county commission, a proposal is submitted
to the qualified voters within the district boundaries to opt out of the Upper White River
Basin watershed improvement district. The ballot of submission shall be in substantially the
following form:
Shall the county of ______ opt out of the Upper White River Basin
Watershed Improvement District?
YES NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".

HCS HB 2925 83

If a simple majority of the votes cast in the county favors the proposal to opt out of the Upper
White River Basin watershed improvement district, then the county shall no longer be
included in the Upper White River Basin watershed improvement district, and shall cease all
imposition, collection, and assessment of any taxes associated with that district, beginning on
the first day of the first month following the election. If a simple majority of the votes cast in
the county opposes the proposal to opt out of the Upper White River Basin watershed
improvement district, then the county shall remain a part of the Upper White River Basin
watershed improvement district. However, if a proposal to opt out of the Upper White River
Basin watershed improvement district is not approved, the governing body of the county shall
not resubmit a proposal to the voters under this section sooner than twelve months from the
date of the last proposal submitted under this section.
3. Any county who has successfully chosen to opt out of the Upper White River Basin
watershed improvement district under the provisions of subsection 2 of this section shall be
allowed to rejoin the district at any time, provided the county submits the proposal to rejoin
the district in one of two ways:
(1) Upon the filing of a petition signed by at least twenty percent of the property
owners residing within the county, a proposal is submitted to the qualified voters within the
county. The ballot of submission shall be in substantially the following form:
Shall the county of ______ rejoin the Upper White River Basin
Watershed Improvement District?
YES NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".

If a simple majority of the votes cast in the county favors the proposal to rejoin the Upper
White River Basin watershed improvement district, then the county shall rejoin the district. If
a simple majority of the votes cast in the county opposes the proposal to rejoin the district,
then the county shall remain outside the Upper White River Basin watershed improvement
district. However, if a proposal to rejoin the Upper White River Basin watershed
improvement district is not approved, the governing body of the county shall not resubmit a
proposal to the voters under this section sooner than twelve months from the date of the last
proposal submitted under this section; or
(2) Upon the issuance of an order by the county commission, a proposal is submitted
to the qualified voters within the district boundaries to rejoin the Upper White River Basin

HCS HB 2925 84
watershed improvement district. The ballot of submission shall be in substantially the
following form:
Shall the county of ______ rejoin the Upper White River Basin
100 Watershed Improvement District?
101 YES NO
102 If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
103 "YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
104 opposite "NO".
105
106 If a simple majority of the votes cast in the county favors the proposal to rejoin the Upper
107 White River Basin watershed improvement district, then the county shall rejoin the Upper
108 White River Basin watershed improvement district. If a simple majority of the votes cast in
109 the county opposes the proposal to rejoin the Upper White River Basin watershed
110 improvement district, then the county shall remain outside the Upper White River Basin
111 watershed improvement district. However, if a proposal to rejoin the Upper White River
112 Basin watershed improvement district is not approved, the governing body of the county shall
113 not resubmit a proposal to the voters under this section sooner than twelve months from the
114 date of the last proposal submitted under this section.
115 4. The watershed improvement district created under this section shall have the power
116 to borrow money and incur indebtedness and evidence the same by certificates, notes, or
117 debentures, to issue bonds and use any one or more lawful funding methods the district may
118 obtain for its purposes at such rates of interest as the district may determine. Any bonds,
119 notes, and other obligations issued or delivered by the district may be secured by mortgage,
120 pledge, or deed of trust of any or all of the property within the district. Every issue of such
121 bonds, notes, or other obligations shall be payable out of property and revenues of the district
122 and may be further secured by other property within the district, which may be pledged,
123 assigned, mortgaged, or a security interest granted for such payment, without preference or
124 priority of the first bonds issued, subject to any agreement with the holders of any other bonds
125 pledging any specified property or revenues. Such bonds, notes, or other obligations shall be
126 authorized by resolution of the district board, and shall bear such date or dates, and shall
127 mature at such time or times, but not in excess of thirty years, as the resolution shall specify.
128 Such bonds, notes, or other obligations shall be in such denomination, bear interest at such
129 rate or rates, be in such form, either coupon or registered, be issued as current interest bonds,
130 compound interest bonds, variable rate bonds, convertible bonds, or zero coupon bonds, be
131 issued in such manner, be payable in such place or places, and be subject to redemption as
132 such resolution may provide, notwithstanding section 108.170. The bonds, notes, or other

HCS HB 2925 85
133 obligations may be sold at either public or private sale, at such interest rates, and at such price
134 or prices as the district shall determine.
135 5. The county commission of any county located within the watershed improvement
136 district may authorize individual properties to be served by the district by adoption of a
137 resolution or upon the filing of a petition signed by at least twenty percent of the property
138 owners of the proposed area. The resolution or petition shall describe generally the size and
139 location of the proposed area.
140 6. In the event that any property within the watershed improvement district proposed
141 under this section lies within or is serviced by any existing sewer district formed under this
142 chapter, chapter 204, or chapter 250, the property shall not become part of the watershed
143 improvement district formed under this section unless the existing sewer district agrees to
144 refrain from providing service or to discontinue service to the property. No property shall
145 become part of the watershed district until the owner of that property has paid in full all
146 outstanding costs owed to an existing sewer district formed under this chapter, chapter 204, or
147 chapter 250.
148 7. Upon the creation of the watershed improvement district as authorized by this
149 section, a board of trustees for the district consisting of nine members shall be appointed. The
150 governing body of each county shall appoint one member to serve on the board. No trustee
151 shall reside in the same county as another trustee. Of the initial trustees appointed, five shall
152 serve terms of one year, and four shall serve terms of two years, as determined by lot. After
153 the initial appointments of the trustees, the successor trustees shall reside in the same county
154 as the prior trustee and be elected by the resident property owners of their county within the
155 district. Each trustee may be elected to no more than five consecutive two-year terms.
156 Vacancies shall be filled by the board. Each trustee shall serve until a successor is elected and
157 sworn. The trustees shall not receive compensation for their services, but may be reimbursed
158 for their actual and necessary expenses. The board shall elect a chair and other officers
159 necessary for its membership. The board shall enter into contracts with any person or entity
160 for the maintenance, administrative, or support work required to administer the district. The
161 board may charge reasonable fees and submit proposals to levy and impose property taxes to
162 fund the operation of the district to the qualified voters in the district, but such proposals shall
163 not become effective unless a majority of the qualified voters in the district voting on the
164 proposals approve the proposed levy and rate of tax. The board may adopt resolutions
165 necessary to the operation of the district.
166 8. No service shall be initiated to any property lying within the watershed
167 improvement district created under this section unless the property owner elects to have the
168 service provided by the district.

HCS HB 2925 86
169 9. Any on-site wastewater treatment system installed on any property that participates
170 in the watershed improvement district formed under this section shall meet all applicable
171 standards for such on-site wastewater treatment systems under sections 701.025 to 701.059
172 and as required by rules or regulations promulgated by the board of trustees and the
173 appropriate state agencies.
174 10. Property owners participating in the watershed improvement district formed
175 under this section shall be required as a condition of continued participation to have a
176 maintenance plan approved by the watershed improvement district for the on-site wastewater
177 treatment systems on their properties. Such property owners shall also execute a utilities
178 easement to allow the district access to the system for maintenance purposes and inspections.
179 The property owner shall provide satisfactory proof that periodic maintenance is performed
180 on the sewage system. At a minimum the system shall be installed and maintained according
181 to the manufacturer's recommendations. The level of satisfactory proof required and the
182 frequency of periodic proof shall be determined by the board of trustees.
183 11. A district established under this section may, at a general or primary election,
184 submit to the qualified voters within the district boundaries a real property tax that shall not
185 exceed five cents per one hundred dollars assessed valuation to fund the operation of the
186 district as provided in section 115.706. The ballot of submission shall be [in substantially
187 the following form:] submitted as provided in section 115.706.
188 [Shall the ______ (name of district) impose a real property tax within
189 the district at a rate of not more than ______ (insert amount) dollars per
190 hundred dollars of assessed valuation to fund the operation of the
191 district?]
192 [ YES] [ NO]
193 [If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
194 "YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
195 opposite "NO".]
196
197 If a majority of the votes cast in each county that is part of the district favor the proposal, then
198 the real property tax shall become effective in the district on the first day of the year following
199 the year of the election. If a majority of the votes cast in each county that is a part of the
200 district oppose the proposal, then that county shall not impose the real property tax authorized
201 in this section until after the county governing body has submitted another such real property
202 tax proposal and the proposal is approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting thereon.
203 However, if a real property tax proposal is not approved, the governing body of the county
204 shall not resubmit a proposal to the voters under this section sooner than twelve months from
205 the date of the last proposal submitted under this section.

HCS HB 2925 87
206 12. The real property tax authorized by this section is in addition to all other real
207 property taxes allowed by law.
208 13. Once the real property tax authorized by this section is abolished or terminated by
209 any means, all funds remaining in the trust fund shall be used solely for the purposes
210 approved in the ballot question authorizing the tax. The tax shall not be abolished or
211 terminated while the district has any financing or other obligations outstanding. Any funds in
212 the trust fund which are not needed for current expenditures may be invested by the district in
213 the securities described in subdivisions (1) to (12) of subsection 1 of section 30.270 or
214 repurchase agreements secured by such securities.
215 14. The governing body of any county included in the Upper White River Basin
216 watershed improvement district established in this section may designate groundwater
217 depletion areas within specific areas of the county and may require well volume monitoring.
218 However, any county included in this district may choose not to require well volume
219 monitoring.
250.060. 1. Bonds of any such sewer district, payable from taxes, may be issued for
the purpose of improving and extending the sewerage system of the district upon the approval
of a proposition to issue such bonds by the constitutionally required percentage of the voters
voting on the question as provided in section 115.706.
2. The question shall be submitted [in substantially the following form:] as provided
in section 115.706.
[Shall ______ (name of city or district) issue bonds payable from taxes?]
3. Before any sewer district shall incur any indebtedness evidenced by bonds payable
from taxes as hereby authorized, such sewer district shall provide for the collection of an
annual tax on all taxable tangible property therein sufficient to pay the interest and principal
of the indebtedness as they fall due and to retire the same within twenty years from the date
contracted.
256.445. 1. Any political subdivision which contains a sponsor which has submitted
a plan which has been approved by the director pursuant to sections 256.435 to 256.445 may
submit to the qualified voters of the political subdivision [the following] a question[:] as
provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the political subdivision of ______ (name of political
subdivision) incur indebtedness and issue general obligation bonds to
pay for all or part of the costs of establishing and maintaining a water
resource project with the political subdivision, the cost of all
indebtedness so incurred to be assessed by the governing body of ____
__ (name of political subdivision) on property within the political
subdivision?]

HCS HB 2925 88
[ YES] [ NO]
2. If it appears that the required percentage of the voters of such political subdivision
voting on the proposition of incurring indebtedness submitted at the election were in favor of
incurring such indebtedness, the election authority shall make an order reciting the holding of
such election and the results thereof, both for and against the proposition, and if the result of
the election as certified shall be in favor of incurring the indebtedness and issuing the bonds,
then the governing body of the political subdivision shall direct the issuance thereof to the
amount of the debt authorized to be incurred, or any portion thereof, and shall either before or
at the time of doing so provide for the collection of an annual ad valorem tax upon all of the
taxable property within the political subdivision, which tax shall be sufficient to pay the
interest on such indebtedness as it falls due and also to create a sinking fund for the payment
of the principal thereof within twenty years from the date of contracting the same, such tax to
be levied and collected as provided for in chapter 137.
3. The governing body of the political subdivision shall have no power to levy or
collect any taxes for the payment of any indebtedness incurred by the political subdivision
pursuant to this section unless and until the voters of the political subdivision shall have
authorized the incurring of indebtedness at an election, but all such expenses and
indebtedness incurred by the political subdivision may be paid out of funds which may be
received by the political subdivision from the sale of bonds authorized by the voters at any
such election.
4. Such bonds shall be issued in denominations of one hundred dollars or some
multiple thereof; shall be payable to bearer, not later than twenty years from their date; shall
bear interest from their date at a rate not exceeding six percent per annum, payable annually
or semiannually; such interest payments to be evidenced by annexed coupons, and such bonds
shall not be sold for less than ninety-five percent of the face value thereof and together with
existing indebtedness of the political subdivision, if any, shall not exceed in the aggregate five
percent of the value of all of the taxable property in the political subdivision to be ascertained
by the assessment next before the last assessment for state and county purposes previous to
the incurring of such indebtedness.
5. Such bonds shall be signed by the presiding officer of the governing body of the
political subdivision attested by the signature of the secretary of the governing body with the
seal of the political subdivision affixed thereto. The bonds may be sold under the same
conditions as are provided for the sale of county road bonds.
6. All bonds issued under this section shall be registered in the office of the state
auditor as provided by law for the registration of bonds of cities and in the office of the
governing body of the political subdivision in a book kept for that purpose for registry, shall

HCS HB 2925 89
show the number, date, amount, date of sale, name of the purchaser and the amount for which
the bond was sold.
7. The governing body of the political subdivision wherein such project is situate
shall certify the amount of money that will be required during the next succeeding year to pay
interest falling due on bonds issued and the principal of bonds maturing in such year, and the
amount necessary to cover the estimated expenses of maintaining such project in good
condition. The governing body shall, at the time it makes the levy for other taxes, by order
made, levy such a rate of taxes upon all the taxable property in the political subdivision as
will produce a sum of money sufficient for the purposes of the water resource project;
provided, that the governing body shall have no authority to levy such tax until the voters of
the political subdivision shall have voted to incur an indebtedness under the provisions of this
section.
8. On such order being made it shall be the duty of the governing body to cause such
rate of taxation to be extended upon the tax books against all the taxable property in the
political subdivision and the same shall be collected and remitted to the governing board of
the water project by the collector of the revenue of the political subdivision at the time, in the
manner, and by the same means as state, county, school and other taxes are collected and
remitted. All of the laws, rights and remedies provided by the laws of this state for the
collection of state, county, school and other taxes shall be applicable to the collection of taxes
herein authorized to be collected.
9. All taxes levied pursuant to this section shall be based upon the assessed valuation
of lands and other property in the political subdivision in accordance with the current record
of the assessed valuations of all taxable property within the political subdivision as may be
determined by the records in the assessor's office of the political subdivision and such tax
shall be prorated and an equal amount levied upon each one hundred dollars assessed
valuation.
257.360. 1. The county clerk of each county within the district shall certify to the
secretary of the board of trustees the total assessed valuation of all taxable tangible property
lying within the district in his county. Thereupon, the board of trustees shall determine the
rates of taxation necessary to be levied for the amortization fund and for the general fund for
the year and shall direct the secretary to certify the rates to the county clerk of each county in
which the district is situated. The several county clerks shall thereupon extend the rates upon
and against the assessed valuation of all taxable tangible property lying within the district and
shall certify the taxes to the collectors of revenue of their respective counties, who shall
proceed to collect and enforce the taxes in like manner as state and county taxes are collected
and enforced and shall make remittances of their collections monthly to the treasurer of the
district.

HCS HB 2925 90
2. The rate levied for the general fund shall in no year exceed one mill on each one
dollar assessed valuation of taxable tangible property in such district, except as follows:
(1) When the board determines that needs for general fund moneys are greater than
the one mill tax will provide and thereupon determines the rate of taxation necessary to be
levied in excess of the authorized rate;
(2) When, accordingly, the question is submitted by the board to the electorate of the
district in the same manner as provided in this chapter for bond elections and as provided in
section 115.706;
(3) When, at such election, the increase is approved for a year, by a majority vote of
those voting, or, in excess of one year and not to exceed four years, by a two-thirds vote of
those voting; and provided that any such increase in the tax rate for the general fund shall in
no year exceed two mills on each one dollar assessed valuation of taxable tangible property in
the district.
3. In the event that an increase in the tax rate is voted as prescribed, the procedure for
collection shall be as for any general fund levy.
257.370. 1. The board of trustees of any river basin conservancy district may issue
general obligation bonds for and on behalf of the district for the purpose of providing funds to
carry out the official plan or plans of the district. The bonds shall not exceed, including
existing indebtedness of the district, an amount equal to five percent of the assessed valuation
of taxable tangible property in the district, to be ascertained by the last completed assessment
for state and county purposes made previous to the incurring of the indebtedness. The bonds
shall be issued in the denomination of one hundred dollars each, or some multiple thereof, to
bear interest at a rate not exceeding six percent per annum, payable semiannually, and to
become due and payable at the times the board of trustees determines by order of record, not
exceeding twenty years from date of issue. All bonds shall be signed by the president of the
board, and attested by the signature of the secretary of the board, with the seal of the district
affixed; and all interest coupons shall be executed by the lithographed facsimile signatures of
the officers.
2. Whenever a conservancy district proposes to issue bonds as aforesaid, it shall
submit the question to the voters of the district as provided in section 115.706. The notice of
election shall state the amount and purpose of bonds to be issued, the polling place at which
the election is to be held.
3. The results of the submission of the question shall be entered upon the records of
the board of trustees.
4. If it appears that the constitutionally required percentage of the voters voting on the
question have voted in favor of the issuance of the bonds, the board of trustees shall order and
direct the execution of the bonds for and on behalf of the district and shall provide for the levy

HCS HB 2925 91
and collection of a direct annual tax upon all the taxable property in the district sufficient to
provide for the payment of the principal and interest of the bonds so authorized as they
respectively become due.
5. It shall be the duty of the secretary of the board, on or before the first day of May in
each year, or the state auditor immediately thereafter, in case the secretary of the board fails or
neglects so to do, to certify to the respective county clerks of the counties within the district
the amount of money that will be required during the next succeeding year to pay interest
falling due on bonds issued and the principal of bonds maturing during such year. Upon
receipt of the certificate, it shall be the duty of the county clerks to levy and extend upon the
tax books such a rate of taxation upon all taxable tangible property in the district as will raise
the sum of money required for the purposes aforesaid.
6. All of the laws, rights and remedies of the state of Missouri for the collection of
state, county, school and other taxes shall be applicable to the collection of taxes herein
authorized to be collected.
262.598. 1. As used in this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Consolidated district", a district formed jointly by two or more councils;
(2) "Council", a University of Missouri extension council authorized under section
262.563;
(3) "District" or "extension district", a political subdivision formed by one or more
councils;
(4) "Governing body", the group of individuals who govern a district;
(5) "Single-council district", a district formed by one council.
2. University of Missouri extension councils, except for any council located in a
county with a charter form of government and with more than nine hundred fifty thousand
inhabitants, are hereby authorized to form extension districts made up of cooperating counties
for the purpose of funding extension programming. An extension district may be a single-
council district or a consolidated district. A single-council district shall be formed upon a
majority vote of the full council. A consolidated district shall be formed upon a majority vote
of each participating council.
3. In a single-council district, the council shall serve as the district's governing body.
In addition to any other powers and duties granted to the council under sections 262.550 to
262.620, the council shall also have the powers and duties provided under subsection 5 of this
section.
4. In a consolidated district, the governing body of the district shall consist of at least
three, but no more than five, representatives appointed by each participating council. The
term of office shall be two years. Representatives may be reappointed. The governing body

HCS HB 2925 92
shall elect officers, who shall serve as officers for two years, and establish a regular meeting
schedule which shall not be less than once every three months.
5. The governing body of a district shall have the following powers and duties:
(1) Review the activities and annual budgets of each participating council;
(2) Determine, by September first of each year, the tax rate necessary to generate
sufficient revenue to fund the extension programming in the district, which includes annual
funding for each participating council for the costs of personnel and the acquisition, supply,
and maintenance of each council's property, work, and equipment;
(3) Oversee the collection of any tax authorized under this section by ensuring the
revenue is deposited into a special fund and monitoring the use of the funds to ensure they are
used solely for extension programming in the district;
(4) Approve payments from the special fund in which the tax revenue is deposited;
and
(5) Work cooperatively with each participating council to plan and facilitate the
programs, equipment, and activities in the district.
6. The governing body of a district may submit a question to the voters of the district
to institute a property tax levy in the county or counties that compose the district. Questions
may be submitted to the voters of the district at any general municipal election as provided in
section 115.706. Any such proposed tax shall not exceed thirty cents per one hundred dollars
of assessed valuation. The costs of submitting the question to the voters at the general
municipal election shall be paid as provided in section 115.063. Such question shall be
submitted [in substantially the following form:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the Extension District in ______ County (insert name of county) be authorized
to levy an annual tax of ______ (insert amount not to exceed thirty) cents per one hundred
dollars of assessed valuation for the purpose of funding the University of Missouri Extension
District programs, equipment, and services in the district?]

In a single-council district, if a majority of the voters in the county approve the question, then
the district shall impose the tax. If a majority of the voters in a single-council district do not
approve the question, then no tax shall be imposed. In a consolidated district, if a majority of
voters in each county in the district approve the question, then the district shall impose the
tax. If a majority of the voters in a consolidated district do not approve the question, then no
tax shall be imposed in any county of the district. In a consolidated district, if a majority of
voters in a county do not approve the question, the council in the county that did not approve
the question may withdraw from the district. Upon such withdrawal, the district shall be
made up of the remaining counties and the tax shall be imposed in those counties. However,
if the county that did not approve the question does not withdraw from the district, the tax

HCS HB 2925 93
shall not be imposed. Revenues collected from the imposition of a tax authorized under this
section shall be deposited into a special fund dedicated only for use by the local district for
programming purposes.
7. The county commission of any county in which the tax authorized under this
section is levied and collected:
(1) Shall be exempt from the funding requirements under section 262.597 if revenue
derived from the tax authorized under this section is in excess of an amount equal to two
hundred percent of the average funding received under section 262.597 for the immediately
preceding three years; or
(2) May reduce the current year's funding amount under section 262.597 by thirty-
three percent of the amount of tax revenues derived from the tax authorized under this section
which exceed the average amount of funding received under section 262.597 for the
immediately preceding three years.
8. Any county that collects tax revenues authorized under this section shall transfer
all attributable revenue plus monthly interest for deposit into the district's special fund. The
governing body of the district shall comply with the prudent investor standard for investment
fiduciaries as provided in section 105.688.
9. In any county in which a single-council district is established, and for which a tax
has not been levied, the district may be dissolved in the same manner in which it was formed.
10. A county may withdraw from a consolidated district at any time by the filing of a
petition with the circuit court having jurisdiction over the district. The petition shall be
signed by not fewer than ten percent of those who voted in the most recent presidential
election in the county seeking to withdraw that is part of a consolidated district stating that
further operation of the district is contrary to the best interest of the inhabitants of the county
in which the district is located and that the county seeks to withdraw from the district. The
circuit court shall hear evidence on the petition. If the court finds that it is in the best interest
of the inhabitants of the county in which the district is located for the county to withdraw
from the district, the court shall make an order reciting the same and submit the question to
the voters. The costs of submitting the question to the voters at the general municipal election
shall be paid as provided in section 115.063. The question shall be submitted in substantially
the following format:
Shall the County of ______ (insert name of county) being part of ______ (insert name
of district) Extension District withdraw from the district?

The question shall be submitted at the next general municipal election date. The election
returns shall be certified to the court. If the court finds that two-thirds of the voters voting on
the question voted in favor of withdrawing from the district, the court shall issue an order

HCS HB 2925 94
withdrawing the county from the district, which shall contain a proviso that the district shall
remain intact for the sole purposes of paying all outstanding and lawful obligations and
disposing of the district's property. No additional costs or obligations for the withdrawing
100 county shall be created except as necessary. The withdrawal shall occur on the first day of the
101 following January after the vote. If the court finds that two-thirds of the voters voting on the
102 question shall not have voted favorably on the question to withdraw from the district, the
103 court shall issue an order dismissing the petition and the district shall continue to operate.
104 11. The governing body of any district may seek voter approval to increase its current
105 tax rate authorized under this section, provided such increase shall not cause the total tax to
106 exceed thirty cents per one hundred dollars of assessed valuation. To propose such an
107 increase, the governing body shall submit the question to the voters at the general municipal
108 election in the county in which the district is located as provided in section 115.706. The
109 costs of submitting the question to the voters at the general municipal election shall be paid as
110 provided in section 115.063. The question shall be submitted [in substantially the following
111 form:] as provided in section 115.706.
112 [Shall the Extension District in ______ (insert name of county or counties) be
113 authorized to increase the tax rate from ______ (insert current amount of tax) cents to ______
114 (insert proposed amount of tax not to exceed thirty) cents per one hundred dollars of assessed
115 valuation for the purpose of funding the University of Missouri Extension District programs,
116 equipment, and services in the district?]
117
118 In a single-council district, if a majority of the voters in the county approve the question, then
119 the district shall impose the tax. If a majority of the voters in a single-council district do not
120 approve the question, then the tax shall not be imposed. In a consolidated district, if a
121 majority of voters in the district approve the question, then the district shall impose the new
122 tax rate. If a majority of the voters in a consolidated district do not approve the question, then
123 the tax shall not be imposed in any county of the district. Revenues collected from the
124 imposition of the tax authorized under this section shall be deposited into the special fund
125 dedicated only for use by the district.
263.452. 1. Upon motion of the county commission, or upon the petition of one
hundred landowners in any county, the county commission shall declare that a threat exists to
the agricultural economy of the county by reason of the growth and infestation of noxious
weeds. After such declaration there shall be submitted to the qualified voters of the county at
the next general election, the question of enforcing the provisions of sections 263.450 to
263.474. The question shall be submitted [substantially as follows:] as provided in section
115.706.

HCS HB 2925 95
[Shall the county of ______ become a "Noxious Weed Control Area"
by adopting the provisions of sections 263.450 to 263.474, RSMo,
providing for the control of noxious weeds, and authorizing the county
commission to levy a tax of up to fifteen cents on each one hundred
dollars of assessed valuation to provide funds for the control of noxious
weeds?]
[ YES] [ NO]
[(Place an X in the square opposite the one for which you wish to
vote.)]
2. The election thereon shall be conducted, votes canvassed, and the results declared
in the manner provided in chapter 115 for county general elections. If a majority of the votes
cast at the election are in favor of enforcing the law controlling noxious weeds, the clerk of
the county commission shall enter upon the commission records the result of the election and,
within ten days after the election, shall notify the state director of agriculture of the result of
the election. If a majority of the votes cast at the election are not in favor of enforcing such
law, the question shall not be resubmitted for at least two years after the election.
263.472. 1. Upon the motion of the county commission or upon the petition of one
hundred landowners in any county which has elected to declare itself a Johnson grass
extermination area pursuant to sections 263.255 to 263.267, there shall be submitted to the
qualified voters of the county at the next general election the question of converting a Johnson
grass extermination program, established pursuant to sections 263.255 to 263.267, to a
noxious weed control program pursuant to sections 263.450 to 263.474. The question shall
be submitted [substantially as follows:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the county of ______ convert its Johnson grass extermination
program to a noxious weed control program pursuant to sections
263.450 to 263.474, RSMo, and authorize the county commission to
levy a tax of up to fifteen cents on each one hundred dollars of assessed
valuation to provide funds for the control of noxious weeds, and to use
taxes already collected under the Johnson grass extermination law for
these purposes?]
[ YES] [ NO]
[(Place an X in the square opposite the one for which you wish to
vote.)]
2. The election thereon shall be conducted, votes canvassed, and the results declared
in the manner provided in chapter 115 for county general elections.

HCS HB 2925 96
278.240. 1. The board of soil and water conservation district supervisors of the soil
and water conservation district in which the watershed district is formed shall act in an
advisory capacity to the watershed district board. When a watershed district lies in more than
one soil and water conservation district, the combined boards of soil and water conservation
district supervisors shall act in an advisory capacity to the watershed district board.
2. Five landowners within the watershed district shall be elected to serve as trustees
of the watershed district. The trustees shall be elected by a vote of landowners participating
in the referendum for the establishment of the watershed district, but the date of the election
shall not fall upon the date of any regular political election held in the county. The ballot
submitting the proposition to form the watershed district shall comply with section 115.706
and shall be so worded as to clearly state that a tax, not to exceed forty cents on one hundred
dollars valuation of all real estate within the watershed district, may be authorized if the
watershed district is formed. In watershed districts formed after September 28, 1977, two
trustees shall be elected for a term of six years, two shall be elected for a term of four years,
and one shall be elected for a term of two years. Their successors shall be elected for terms of
six years. In any district in existence on September 28, 1977, the three trustees holding office
shall continue as trustees. At the next scheduled election within the watershed district, two
additional trustees shall be elected. One of the additional trustees shall be elected for a term
of four years and one shall be elected for a term of six years. Each successor shall be elected
for a term of six years. In case of the death, loss of landowner standing within the watershed
district, or resignation from office of any elected watershed district trustee, his or her
successor to the unexpired term shall be appointed by the trustees of that watershed district.
A trustee may succeed himself or herself by reelection in this office. The trustees shall elect
one of their members as chairman and one of their members as secretary to serve for terms of
two years.
3. The trustees shall act in all matters pertaining to the watershed district, except those
concerning formation, consolidation, expansion or disestablishment of the watershed district.
It shall be the responsibility of the secretary of the trustees to see that each soil and water
district board included in the watershed district is provided a copy of the minutes of each
meeting held by the trustees. The trustees shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred relating
to the business of the watershed district.
278.280. 1. When a plan of work is approved the trustees of the watershed district,
pursuant to section 278.240, shall then by resolution propose that the cost of all works of
improvement contemplated in the plan be paid either by a general levy against all real estate
in the watershed district, subject to the limitations of section 278.250, or that such cost be
paid by special assessment against lands within the watershed district to be benefitted by the

HCS HB 2925 97
installation of the proposed works of improvement, or that such cost be paid by both such
general levy and special assessment stating the portion to be paid by each method.
2. If the resolution of financing provides that all or any part of the cost of the works of
improvement is to be paid by special assessment of benefits the trustees of the watershed
district, pursuant to section 278.240, shall appoint three appraisers, who shall be residents of
the state of Missouri, and who shall not be landowners in such watershed district, who shall
recommend apportionment of the special assessment to the tracts of land which will receive
benefits from the installation of the works of improvement proposed in the plan of work. The
appraisers shall have access to all available engineering reports and data pertaining to the
works contemplated and may request additional legal counsel or engineering data from a
registered professional engineer as found necessary to carry out their duties.
3. The appraisers shall proceed to view the premises and determine the value of all
land or other property within or without the watershed district, to be acquired and used for
rights-of-way or other works set out in the plan of work; they shall assess the amount of
benefits, and the amount of damage if any, that will accrue to each governmental lot, forty-
acre tract or other subdivision of land according to ownership, railroad and other rights-of-
way, railroad roadways, and other property from carrying out and putting into effect the plan
of work heretofore adopted, and shall make written reports of their findings to the trustees of
the watershed district. Each appraiser so appointed shall be paid for his or her services and
necessary expenses.
4. Upon receiving the report from the appraisers, the trustees of the watershed district,
pursuant to section 278.240, shall prepare a resolution which shall contain a list of the tracts
of land found to be benefitted and the amount of assessment to be levied against each such
tract, except that no such assessment against any tract of land shall exceed the estimated
benefits to such land by such project. Such tracts of land shall be legally described and the
names of the owners thereof shall be set forth beside the description of each tract so listed.
After adopting such resolution the trustees of the watershed district, pursuant to section
278.240, shall fix a time and place for hearing any complaint that may be made as to the
benefit to any tract of land appraised, notice of which hearing shall be given by the secretary
by publication pursuant to section 278.190. The board of trustees at the hearing may alter the
benefits to any tract if, in its judgment, the same has been appraised too high or too low. The
hearing shall be conducted in the manner set forth in section 278.200. The trustees of the
watershed district, pursuant to section 278.240, shall immediately after the hearing pass a
resolution fixing the benefit assessment as to each tract of land.
5. After the resolution fixing the benefit assessment has been adopted the trustees of
the watershed district, pursuant to section 278.240, shall submit the proposal for collection of
such assessed benefits to the owners of the lands so assessed for approval and if bonds are to

HCS HB 2925 98
be issued the amount of the issue so proposed, the rate of interest, and the amount of any
necessary tax levy in excess of the amount authorized in section 278.250. If two-thirds of the
owners of such lands voting favor the proposal as submitted, it shall be adopted. The
provisions of sections 278.190 to 278.210 and section 115.706 as to notice and procedure
and the question submitted shall apply to the referendum held pursuant to this section.
6. The trustees of the watershed district, pursuant to section 278.240, shall make the
necessary general levy against all real estate in the watershed district and the special
assessment against lands within the watershed district to be benefitted by the improvement
and shall certify the rate of levy and the amount of the special assessment to the county
commission of the county or counties in which the watershed district is located with
directions that at the time and in the same manner required by law for the levy of taxes for
county purposes the county commission shall levy a tax at the rate so fixed and determined
upon the assessed valuation of all real estate within the watershed district and shall levy the
amount of the special assessment, in addition to such other taxes as are levied by the county
commission.
7. The bond issue, authorized by this section in whole or part, may be offered for sale
to the United States Department of Agriculture's Rural Development or other federal agency
without public offering or the securing of competitive bids on such bond offering.
321.225. 1. A fire protection district may, in addition to its other powers and duties,
provide emergency ambulance service within its district if a majority of the voters voting
thereon approve a proposition to furnish such service and to levy a tax not to exceed thirty
cents on the one hundred dollars assessed valuation to be used exclusively to supply funds for
the operation of an emergency ambulance service. The district shall exercise the same powers
and duties in operating an emergency ambulance service as it does in operating its fire
protection service.
2. The proposition to furnish emergency ambulance service may be submitted by the
board of directors at any municipal general, primary or general election or at any election of
the members of the board as provided in section 115.706.
3. The question shall be submitted [in substantially the following form:] as provided
in section 115.706.
[Shall the board of directors of ______ Fire Protection District be
authorized to provide emergency ambulance service within the
district and be authorized to levy a tax not to exceed thirty cents
on the one hundred dollars assessed valuation to provide funds
for such services?]
4. If a majority of the voters casting votes thereon be in favor of emergency
ambulance service and the levy, the district shall forthwith commence such service.

HCS HB 2925 99
5. As used in this section "emergency" means a situation resulting from a sudden or
unforeseen situation or occurrence that requires immediate action to save life or prevent
suffering or disability.
6. In addition to all other taxes authorized on or before September 1, 1990, the board
of directors of any fire protection district may, if a majority of the voters of the district voting
thereon approve, levy an additional tax of not more than forty cents per one hundred dollars
of assessed valuation to be used for the support of the ambulance service or partial or
complete support of a paramedic first responder program. The proposition to levy the tax
authorized by this subsection may be submitted by the board of directors at the next annual
election of the members of the board or at any regular municipal or school election conducted
by the county clerk or board of election commissioners in such district or at a special election
called for the purpose, or upon petition of five hundred registered voters of the district as
provided in section 115.706. A separate ballot containing the question shall [read as
follows:] be submitted as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the board of directors of the ______ Fire Protection
District be authorized to levy an additional tax of not more than
forty cents per one hundred dollars assessed valuation to provide
funds for the support of an ambulance service or partial or
complete support of a paramedic first responder program?]
[FOR THE PROPOSITION]
[AGAINST THE PROPOSITION]
[(Place an X in the square opposite the one for which you wish to
vote.)]

If a majority of the qualified voters casting votes thereon be in favor of the question, the board
of directors shall accordingly levy a tax in accordance with the provisions of this subsection,
but if a majority of voters casting votes thereon do not vote in favor of the levy authorized by
this subsection, any levy previously authorized shall remain in effect.
321.240. 1. To levy and collect taxes as herein provided, the board shall in each year
determine the amount of money necessary to be raised by taxation, and shall fix a rate of levy
which, when levied upon every dollar of the taxable tangible property within the district as
shown by the last completed assessment, and with other revenues, will raise the amount
required by the district annually to supply funds for paying the expenses of organization and
operation and the costs of acquiring, supplying and maintaining the property, works and
equipment of the district, and maintain the necessary personnel, which rate of levy shall not
exceed thirty cents on the one hundred dollars valuation[;].

HCS HB 2925 100
2. The board may fix an additional rate, not to exceed ten cents on the hundred
dollars valuation, the revenues from which shall be deposited in a special fund and used only
for the pension program of the district, by submitting the [following] question to the voters[:]
as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the board of directors of ______ Fire Protection District be authorized to
increase the annual tax rate from ______ cents to ______ cents per one hundred dollars
valuation, the revenues from which shall be deposited in a special fund and used only for the
pension program of the district?

provided, that] If the question fails to receive a majority of the votes cast, it shall not be
resubmitted to the voters within one year after the election[; except, that ].
3. Any district may impose a tax not to exceed ten cents on the one hundred dollars
valuation, in addition to the rate which the board may levy under this section, by submitting
the [following] question to the voters at any election in such district at which a member of the
board of directors is to be elected[:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the board of directors of ______ Fire Protection District be authorized to
increase the annual tax rate from ______ cents to ______ cents on the hundred dollars
assessed valuation?
and] 4. In addition [thereto] to other requirements of this section, [to] the board
mayfix a rate of levy which will enable it to promptly pay in full when due all interest on and
principal of bonds and other obligations of the district, and to pay any indebtedness
authorized by a vote of the people as provided in this chapter; and in the event of accruing
defaults or deficiencies in the bonded or contractual indebtedness, an additional levy may be
made as provided in section 321.260.
321.241. 1. The board of directors of any fire protection district may levy, if a
majority of the voters of the district voting thereon approve, in addition to all other taxes
heretofore approved, an additional tax of not more than twenty-five cents per one hundred
dollars of assessed valuation to be used for the support of the district. The proposition to levy
the tax authorized by this subsection may be submitted by the board of directors at the next
annual election of the members of the board or at any regular municipal or school election
conducted by the county clerk or board of election commissioners in such district or at a
special election called for the purpose, as provided in section 115.706 or upon petition of
five hundred registered voters of the district. A separate ballot containing the question shall
[read as follows:] be submitted as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the board of directors of the ______ Fire Protection District be
authorized to levy an additional tax of not more than twenty-five cents

HCS HB 2925 101
on the one hundred dollars assessed valuation to provide funds for the
support of the district?]
[FOR THE PROPOSITION]
[AGAINST THE PROPOSITION]
[(Place an X in the square opposite the one for which you wish to
vote.)]

If a majority of the qualified voters casting votes thereon be in favor of the question, the board
of directors shall accordingly levy a tax in accordance with the provisions of this subsection,
but if a majority of the voters casting votes thereon do not vote in favor of the levy authorized
by this subsection, any levy previously authorized shall remain in effect.
2. After August 13, 1982, the board of directors of any fire protection district may
levy, if a majority of the voters of the district voting thereon approve, in addition to all other
taxes heretofore approved, an additional tax of not more than ten cents per one hundred
dollars of assessed valuation to be used for the support of the district. The proposition to levy
the tax authorized by this subsection may be submitted by the board of directors at the next
annual election of the members of the board or at any regular municipal or school election
conducted by the county clerk or board of election commissioners in such district or at a
special election called for the purpose, as provided in section 115.706 or upon petition of
five hundred registered voters of the district. A separate ballot containing the question shall
[read as follows:] be submitted as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the board of directors of the ______ Fire Protection District be
authorized to levy an additional tax of not more than ten cents on the
one hundred dollars assessed valuation to provide funds for the support
of the district?]
[FOR THE PROPOSITION]
[AGAINST THE PROPOSITION]
[(Place an X in the square opposite the one for which you wish to
vote.)]

If a majority of the qualified voters casting votes thereon be in favor of the question, the board
of directors shall accordingly levy a tax in accordance with the provisions of this subsection,
but if a majority of the voters casting votes thereon do not vote in favor of the levy authorized
by this subsection, any levy previously authorized shall remain in effect.
3. In addition to all other taxes authorized on or before September 28, 1985, the board
of directors of any fire protection district may, if a majority of the voters of the district voting

HCS HB 2925 102
thereon approve, levy an additional tax of not more than twenty-five cents per one hundred
dollars of assessed valuation to be used for the support of the district. The proposition to levy
the tax authorized by this subsection may be submitted by the board of directors at the next
annual election of the members of the board or at any regular municipal or school election
conducted by the county clerk or board of election commissioners in such district or at a
special election called for the purpose, as provided in section 115.706 or upon petition of
five hundred registered voters of the district. A separate ballot containing the question shall
[read as follows:] be submitted as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the board of directors of the ______ Fire Protection District be
authorized to levy an additional tax of not more than twenty-five cents
on the one hundred dollars assessed valuation to provide funds for the
support of the district?]
[FOR THE PROPOSITION]
[AGAINST THE PROPOSITION]
[(Place an X in the square opposite the one for which you wish to
vote.)]

If a majority of the qualified voters casting votes thereon be in favor of the question, the board
of directors shall accordingly levy a tax in accordance with the provisions of this subsection,
but if a majority of the voters casting votes thereon do not vote in favor of the levy authorized
by this subsection, any levy previously authorized shall remain in effect.
4. The board of directors of any fire protection district may levy, if a majority of the
voters of the district voting thereon approve, in addition to all other taxes heretofore
approved, an additional tax of not more than fifty cents per one hundred dollars of assessed
valuation to be used for the support of the district. The proposition to levy the tax authorized
by this subsection may be submitted by the board of directors at the next annual election of
the members of the board or at any regular municipal or school election conducted by the
county clerk or board of election commissioners in such district or at a special election called
for that purpose, as provided in section 115.706 or upon petition of five hundred registered
voters of the district. A separate ballot containing the question shall [read as follows:] be
submitted as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the board of directors of the ______ Fire Protection District be
authorized to levy an additional tax of not more than fifty cents on the
one hundred dollars assessed valuation to provide funds for the support
of the district?]
[FOR THE PROPOSITION]
[AGAINST THE PROPOSITION]

HCS HB 2925 103
[(Place an X in the square opposite the one for which you wish to
vote.)]

If a majority of the qualified voters casting votes thereon be in favor of the question, the board
of directors shall accordingly levy a tax in accordance with the provisions of this subsection,
but if a majority of the voters casting votes thereon do not vote in favor of the levy authorized
by this subsection, any levy previously authorized shall remain in effect.
321.243. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, an additional
tax of not to exceed three cents per one hundred dollars of assessed valuation may be levied
and collected by any city, town, village, county, or fire protection district, or a central fire and
emergency services board established in subsection 4 of this section as provided in section
115.706. All the funds derived from such tax, including any existing surplus funds, shall be
used for the purpose of establishing and providing a joint central fire and emergency
dispatching service and for expenditures for equipment and services, except for salaries,
wages, and benefits, by cities, towns, villages, counties, or fire protection districts which
contract with such joint central fire and emergency dispatching service.
2. The additional tax prescribed by this section shall be levied only when the
governing body of the city, town, village, county, fire protection district, or central fire and
emergency services board determines that a central fire and emergency dispatching center
will meet the minimum requirements set by section 321.245, and, except where a central fire
and emergency services board is established in accordance with subsection 4 of this section,
when the governing body has entered into a contract with the center for fire and emergency
dispatching services. The funds from the tax shall be kept separate and apart from all other
funds of the city, town, village, county, fire protection district, or central fire and emergency
services board and shall be paid out only on order of the governing body. Except as provided
in subsection 4 of this section, all funds received by such center, and all operations of such
center shall be governed and controlled by a board of directors consisting of one member
from each such agency using the joint central fire and emergency dispatching service. Except
as otherwise provided in subsection 4 of this section, in any county, city, town, or village,
where a tax-supported fire protection district is provided emergency dispatching services by
any form of joint communication organization or emergency dispatching center, receiving
directly or indirectly any funds so levied and collected as provided in this section including
any funds or tariffs paid by telephone subscribers for 911 emergency service, such joint
communication organization, however organized, shall be governed by a board of directors,
and the board of directors shall consist in part of one member appointed by each county, city,
town, village or tax-supported fire protection district so served. The members shall be an

HCS HB 2925 104
elected official of a fire protection district, ambulance district or city council appointed by
each such agency to serve for a one-year term or until a successor is duly appointed.
3. In addition to the tax prescribed by subsections 1 and 2 of this section, an
additional tax of not to exceed two cents per one hundred dollars of assessed valuation which
has been approved by the voters as provided in section 115.706 may be levied and collected
by any city, town, village, county, or fire protection district, or a central fire and emergency
services board established in subsection 4 of this section of a county of the first classification
with a charter form of government which has a population between two hundred thousand and
five hundred thousand inhabitants, but all of the funds derived from such tax shall be used
solely for the purpose of establishing and providing a joint central fire and emergency
dispatching service.
4. A central fire and emergency services board shall be established in any county of
the first classification with a charter form of government which has a population between two
hundred thousand and five hundred thousand inhabitants in the manner prescribed in this
subsection. The board shall have all powers and duties prescribed in this section and section
321.245 to establish and provide a joint central fire and emergency dispatching service. The
initial board shall be established at the April, 1996, election. The election authority shall be
ordered to conduct such election, which shall be conducted as a nonpartisan election. The
board shall consist of one member elected from each county council district. All board
members shall serve for four-year terms, except that of the initial members elected, the
members elected from odd-numbered county council districts shall serve for terms of two
years and the members elected from even-numbered county council districts shall serve for
terms of four years. Each member shall be a resident of the county council district from
which the member is elected. No person who is a paid employee of any fire protection
district, ambulance district, joint central fire and emergency dispatch board, or a paid
employee of a fire or ambulance department of a municipality shall be elected to the joint
central fire and emergency dispatch board. At such election, the election authority of the
county shall submit to the qualified voters of the county a proposal for the board to levy and
collect the taxes prescribed in this section as provided in section 115.706, and such tax shall
be conditioned on the replacement of the tax levied in such county by the county under this
section with the new tax levied by the board. A portion of the funds derived from the tax
levied pursuant to this subsection shall be used to reimburse the county for the cost of the
election held in April, 1996, and any subsequent elections that are necessary for the operation
of the board and the board's duties. In addition, if such a tax is approved, any funds
remaining in the separate fund kept by the county, as required by subsection 2 of this section,
and any property and equipment purchased with moneys in such separate fund held by the
county shall be transferred to the fund maintained by the board for the same purpose. The

HCS HB 2925 105
board shall abide by section 50.660 in the letting of contracts. The board shall be audited by
the state auditor pursuant to section 29.230. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
the board shall meet as established in the bylaws. Any other meeting may be called by four of
the seven members voting in favor of having an additional meeting.
5. Any fire protection district in any county with a charter form of government and
with more than one hundred ninety-eight thousand but fewer than one hundred ninety-nine
thousand two hundred inhabitants that has levied any tax under this section and has levied and
imposed any communications tax for central fire and emergency dispatching services may
submit a proposal to the voters of the fire protection district to use the revenue derived from
the tax imposed under this section for general revenue purposes. No revenues derived from
any such tax imposed under this section shall be used for any purpose other than the stated
purpose unless and until such proposal to use the revenue for general revenue purposes has
been submitted to and approved by the voters of the fire protection district in the same manner
as other proposals are submitted to and approved by the voters of the fire protection district.
321.244. 1. Any fire protection district which has revised or reduced any levy which
it has been authorized to impose under the provisions of section 321.225, 321.240, 321.241,
321.243, 321.246, 321.610, or 321.620, under any provision of the constitution or laws of this
state, may increase each such revised or reduced levy up to, but not in excess of, the
maximum limits allowed under the section authorizing the rate of levy sought to be increased
by submitting the following proposition to the voters of the district at any primary, general or
special election[:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the board of directors of the ______ Fire Protection District be
authorized to increase the rate of levy for ______ (insert purpose of
which tax is levied) from ______ cents to ______ cents on each one
hundred dollars of assessed valuation?]
[ YES] [ NO]
2. If any of the propositions submitted under subsection 1 of this section is approved
by a majority of the voters of the district voting thereon, the board of directors may increase
the levy which was the subject of such proposition to the amount authorized by such
proposition.
321.610. 1. In addition to all other limits set forth in this chapter, the board in
counties of the first classification shall in each year determine the amount of money necessary
to be raised by taxation, and shall fix a rate of levy as provided in section 115.706 which,
when levied upon every dollar of the taxable tangible property within the district as shown by
the last completed assessment, and with other revenues, will raise the amount required by the
district annually to supply funds for paying the expenses of organization and operation and
the costs of acquiring, supplying and maintaining the property, works and equipment of the

HCS HB 2925 106
district, and maintain the necessary personnel, which rate of levy shall not exceed forty cents
on the one hundred dollars valuation. The board in any county of the first classification
having a population in excess of nine hundred thousand may fix an additional rate not to
exceed twenty-five cents on the hundred dollars valuation and the board in all other first
classification counties may fix an additional rate, not to exceed fifteen cents on the hundred
dollars valuation, the revenues from which shall be deposited in a special fund and used only
for the pension program of the district, by submitting the [following] question to the voters at
the municipal general, primary or general election in such district or at any election at which a
member of the board of directors is to be elected[:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the board of directors of ______ Fire Protection District be authorized to levy
an annual tax rate of ______ cents per one hundred dollars valuation, the revenues from
which shall be deposited in a special fund and used only for the pension program of the
district?]
2. Any district approving a tax levy rate pursuant to the provisions of subsection 1 of
this section shall transfer all revenue collected plus interest monthly for deposit in the district
retirement fund. The board of directors for the fire protection district shall comply with the
prudent investor standard for investment fiduciaries as provided in section 105.688 when
investing the assets of the pension program.
3. (1) Any district may impose a tax not to exceed ten cents on the one hundred
dollars valuation, in addition to the rate which the board may levy pursuant to this section, by
submitting the [following] question to the voters at any election in such district held on the
first Tuesday in April of any year[:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the board of directors of ______ Fire District be authorized to increase the
annual tax rate from ______ cents to ______ cents on the hundred dollars assessed valuation?
and] (2) In addition [thereto,] to subdivision (1) of this subsection, a district may
fix a rate of levy which will enable it to promptly pay in full when due all interest on and
principal of bonds and other obligations of the district, and to pay any indebtedness
authorized by a vote of the people as provided by sections 321.010 to 321.450[;] and section
115.706.
(3) In the event of accruing defaults or deficiencies in the bonded or contractual
indebtedness, an additional levy may be made as provided in section 321.260 and section
115.706.
321.620. 1. Fire protection districts in first class counties may, in addition to their
other powers and duties, provide ambulance service within their district if a majority of the
voters voting thereon approve a proposition to furnish such service and to levy a tax not to
exceed thirty cents on the one hundred dollars assessed valuation to be used exclusively to
supply funds for the operation of an emergency ambulance service. The district shall exercise

HCS HB 2925 107
the same powers and duties in operating an ambulance service as it does in operating its fire
protection service. As used in this section "emergency" means a situation resulting from a
sudden or unforeseen situation or occurrence that requires immediate action to save life or
prevent suffering or disability.
2. The proposition to furnish ambulance service may be submitted by the board of
directors at any municipal general, primary or general election or at any election of the
members of the board as provided in section 115.706or upon petition by five hundred voters
of such district.
3. The question shall be submitted [in substantially the following form:] as provided
in section 115.706.
[Shall the board of directors of ______ Fire Protection District be
authorized to provide ambulance service within the district and
be authorized to levy a tax not to exceed thirty cents on the one
hundred dollars assessed valuation to provide funds for such
services?]
4. If a majority of the voters casting votes thereon be in favor of ambulance service
and the levy, the district shall forthwith commence such service.
5. In addition to all other taxes authorized on or before September 1, 1990, the board
of directors of any fire protection district may, if a majority of the voters of the district voting
thereon approve, levy an additional tax of not more than forty cents per one hundred dollars
of assessed valuation to be used for the support of the ambulance service, or partial or
complete support of a paramedic first responder program. The proposition to levy the tax
authorized by this subsection may be submitted by the board of directors at the next annual
election of the members of the board or at any regular municipal or school election conducted
by the county clerk or board of election commissioners in such district or at a special election
called for the purpose, as provided in section 115.706 or upon petition of five hundred
registered voters of the district. A separate ballot containing the question shall [read as
follows:] be submitted as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the board of directors of the ______ Fire Protection
District be authorized to levy an additional tax of not more than
forty cents per one hundred dollars assessed valuation to provide
funds for the support of an ambulance service or partial or
complete support of a paramedic first responder program?]
[FOR THE PROPOSITION]
[AGAINST THE PROPOSITION]
[(Place an X in the square opposite the one for which you wish to
vote).]

HCS HB 2925 108

If a majority of the qualified voters casting votes thereon be in favor of the question, the board
of directors shall accordingly levy a tax in accordance with the provisions of this subsection,
but if a majority of voters casting votes thereon do not vote in favor of the levy authorized by
this subsection, any levy previously authorized shall remain in effect.
650.399. 1. The board of commissioners may, by a majority vote of its members,
request that the governing body of the county submit to the qualified voters of such county at
a general, primary or special election either of the questions a question relating to a sales
tax as contained in subsection 2 of this section or a question related to a property tax as
provided in section 115.706. The governing body may approve or deny such request. The
governing body may also vote to submit such question without a request of the board of
commissioners. The county election official shall give legal notice of the election pursuant to
chapter 115.
2. The [questions] property tax question shall be submitted as provided in section
115.706 and the sales tax question shall be put in substantially the following form:
[(1) Shall (name of county) establish an emergency communications
system fund to establish (and/or) maintain an emergency
communications system, and for which the county shall levy a tax of
(insert exact amount, not to exceed six cents) per each one hundred
dollars assessed valuation therefor, to be paid into the fund for that
purpose?]
[ YES] [ NO]
[; or]
[(2)] Shall (name of county) establish an emergency communications
system fund to establish (and/or) maintain an emergency
communications system, and for which the county shall levy a sales tax
of (insert exact amount, not to exceed one-tenth of one percent), to be
paid into the fund for that purpose?
YES NO
3. The election shall be conducted and vote canvassed in the same manner as other
county elections. If the majority of the qualified voters voting thereon vote in favor of such
tax, then the county shall levy such tax in the specified amount, beginning in the tax year
immediately following its approval. The tax so levied shall be collected along with other
county taxes in the manner provided by law. If the majority of the qualified voters voting
thereon vote against such tax, then such tax shall not be imposed unless such tax is
resubmitted to the voters and a majority of the qualified voters voting thereon approve such
tax.

HCS HB 2925 109
4. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon
are in favor of the question authorizing a sales tax, then the tax shall become effective on the
first day of the second calendar quarter after the director of revenue receives notification of
adoption of the local sales tax. Any sales tax levied under this section shall apply to all retail
sales made within the county which are subject to sales tax under chapter 144, except sales of
food as defined in section 144.014. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the
qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the question authorizing the sales tax, then the
tax shall not become effective unless and until the question is resubmitted under this section
to the qualified voters and such question is approved by a majority of the qualified voters
voting on the question, but no question shall be resubmitted under this section sooner than
twelve months from the date of the last question submitted to and opposed by the voters under
this section.
5. Except as modified in this section, all provisions of sections 32.085 and 32.087
shall apply to the tax imposed under this section.
6. All revenue collected under this section by the director of the department of
revenue on behalf of any county, except for one percent for the cost of collection which shall
be deposited in the state's general revenue fund, shall be deposited in a special trust fund,
which is hereby created and shall be known as the "County Emergency Communications
Sales Tax Fund", and shall be used solely for the designated purposes. Moneys in the fund
shall not be deemed to be state funds, and shall not be commingled with any funds of the
state. The director may make refunds from the amounts in the fund and credited to the county
for erroneous payments and overpayments made, and may redeem dishonored checks and
drafts deposited to the credit of such county. Any funds in the special fund which are not
needed for current expenditures shall be invested in the same manner as other funds are
invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be credited to the fund.
Not later than the tenth day of each month, the director of revenue shall distribute all moneys
deposited in the fund during the preceding month by distributing the sum due the county as
certified by the director of revenue to the county treasurer, or such other officer as may be
designated by the county ordinance or order, of each county imposing the tax authorized by
this section.
7. If the tax is repealed or terminated by any means, all funds remaining in the special
trust fund shall continue to be used solely for the designated purposes, and the county shall
notify the director of the department of revenue of the action at least ninety days before the
effective date of the repeal and the director may order retention in the trust fund, for a period
of one year, of two percent of the amount collected after receipt of such notice to cover
possible refunds or overpayment of the tax and to redeem dishonored checks and drafts
deposited to the credit of such accounts. After one year has elapsed after the effective date of

HCS HB 2925 110
abolition of the tax in such county, the director shall remit the balance in the account to the
county and close the account of that county. The director shall notify each county of each
instance of any amount refunded or any check redeemed from receipts due the county.
650.408. 1. The funds necessary for payment of any obligation of the county in
connection with the establishment, operation and maintenance of the emergency
communications system may be paid by the county out of the fund established pursuant to
section 650.402, or from bonds issued pursuant to this section.
2. For the purpose of supporting the operation and other purposes of the commission
and the emergency communications system, the county may issue bonds for and on behalf of
the county, payable out of funds derived from the sales tax authorized in sections 650.396 and
650.399 or from taxation of all taxable real property in the county, up to an amount not
exceeding six percent of the assessed valuation of such property, with such evaluation to be
ascertained by the assessment immediately prior to the most recent assessment for state and
county purposes, or from revenue generated from any other tax or fee authorized and
approved by the voters pursuant to section 650.399. Such bonds shall be issued in
denominations of one hundred dollars, or some multiple thereof, and the provisions of section
108.170 to the contrary notwithstanding, such bonds may bear interest at a rate determined by
the emergency communications system commissioners, payable semiannually, to become
payable no later than twenty years after the date of the bonds.
3. Whenever the board of commissioners of any such emergency communications
district proposes to issue bonds pursuant to subdivision (3) of subsection 2 of this section,
they shall submit the question to the voters in the district pursuant to this section and section
115.706. The notice for any such election shall, in addition to the requirements of chapter
115, state the amount of bonds to be issued.
4. The question shall be submitted [in substantially the following form:] as provided
in section 115.706.
[Shall ______ County issue bonds in the amount of ______ dollars, the
purpose of which are to support the construction, repair and
maintenance of the ______ Emergency Communications System?]
[ YES] [ NO]
5. The result of the election on the question shall be entered upon the records of the
county. If it shall appear that four-sevenths of the voters voting on the question shall have
voted in favor of the issue of the bonds, the commissioners shall order and direct the
execution of the bonds for and on behalf of such county and the commission. If the general
law of the state is such that an amount other than a four-sevenths majority is required on
ballot measures of such type, the amount set by the general law of the state shall control.

HCS HB 2925 111
6. The county shall not sell such bonds for less than ninety-five percent of the par
value thereof, and the proceeds shall be paid over to the county treasurer, and disbursed on
warrants drawn by the president or vice president of the board of commissioners and attested
by the secretary. The proceeds of the sale of such bonds shall be used for the purpose only of
paying the cost of holding such election, and constructing, repairing and maintaining the
emergency communications system and its appurtenances.
7. Such bonds shall be payable and collectible only out of moneys derived from tax
revenues authorized by section 650.399, from the sale of such bonds or from interest that may
accrue on funds so derived while on deposit with any county depositary. The county treasurer
shall hold in reserve, for payment of interest on such bonds, a sufficient amount of the money
so derived that may come into his or her hands in excess of the amount then necessary to pay
all bonds and interest then past due, to pay all interest that will become payable before the
next installment of such special tax becomes payable, and three percent of the principal
amount of the bonds not then due. The county treasurer shall, whenever any of the bonds or
interest thereon become due, apply such money as may be in his or her custody and applicable
thereto, or that may thereafter come into his or her custody and be applicable thereto, to
payment of such bonds and interest as may be due and unpaid.
8. All money derived from the tax authorized pursuant to section 650.399 shall be
used in paying the bonds and the interest thereon, except that the money that may be collected
pursuant to such tax in excess of the amount necessary to pay all bonds then past due and such
bonds and interest as will become payable before another assessment of such tax becomes
payable may, less an amount equal to three percent of the principal amount of the bonds not
then due, be used for the purposes authorized in section 650.411.
9. The county treasurer shall, as such bonds are sold, deliver them to the purchaser
upon being ordered to do so by the commissioners. The county treasurer shall cancel bonds
as such bonds are paid, and shall deliver them to the clerk of the county.
[137.570. The question shall be submitted in substantially the
following form:
Shall the ______ road district of ______ County levy an additional tax
rate of ______ cents on the hundred dollars valuation, for a period of ______
years?]
✔